CHAPTER I.
An innDebts paid in advance, and a singular touch of human
nature found closely incorporated with monikin nature.
We
soon secured rooms, ordered dinner, brushed
our clothes, and made the other little arrangements
that it was necessary to observe for the credit of
the species. Everything being ready, we left the
inn, and hurried towards the
Palais des Arts et des
Sciences
. We had not got out of sight of the inn,
however, before one of its
garons
was at our heels
with a message from his mistress. He told us, in
very respectful tones, that his master was out, and
that he had taken with him the key of the
strong-box
;
that there was not actually money enough in
the drawer to furnish an entertainment for such
great persons as ourselves, and she had taken the
liberty to send us a bill receipted, with a request
that we would make a small advance, rather than
reduce her to the mortification of treating such
distinguished
guests in an unworthy manner. The
bill read as follows:
No. 1 parti-color and friends
To No. 82,763 grape color
Dr.
To use of apartments, with meals and lights, as
per agreement,
p. p.
300 per diemone day,
p. p.
300
By cash advanced,
50
Balance due
p. p.
250
This seems all right, I observed to Noah; but
I am, at this moment, as penniless as the good woman
herself. I really do not see what we are to do,
unless Bob sends her back his store of nuts
Harkee, my nimble-go-hop, put in the seaman,
what is your pleasure?
The waiter referred to the bill, as expressing his
mistress's wants.
What are these p. p. that I find noted in the
billplay or pay, hey?
Promises, of course, your honor.
Oh! then you desire fifty promises, to provide
our dinner.
Nothing more, sir. With that sum you shall
dine like noblemenay, sir, like aldermen.
I was delighted to find that this worthy class of
beings have the same propensities in all countries.
Here, take a hundred. answered Noah,
snapping
his fingers, and make no bones of it. And
harkee, my worthylay out every farthing of
them in the fare. Let there be good cheer, and no
one will grumble at the bill. I am ready to buy the
inn, and all it holds, at need.
The waiter departed well satisfied with these
assurances, and apparently in the anticipation of
good vails for his own trouble.
We soon got into the current that was setting
towards our place of destination. On reaching the
gate, we found we were anxiously expected; for
there was an attendant in waiting, who instantly
conducted us to the seats that were provided for
our special reception. It is always agreeable to be
among the privileged, and I must own that we were
all not a little flattered, on finding that an elevated
tribune had been prepared for us, in the centre of
the rotunda in which the academy held its sittings,
so that we could see, and be seen by, every
individual
of the crowded assembly. The whole crew,
even to the negro-cook, had preceded us; an
additional
compliment, that I did not fail to acknowledge,
by suitable salutations to all the members present.
After the first feelings of pleasure and surprise were
a little abated, I had leisure to look about me and
to survey the company.
The academicians occupied the whole of the
body of the rotunda, the space taken up by the
erection of our temporary tribune alone excepted;
while there were sofas, chairs, tribunes and benches
arranged for the spectators, in the outer circles,
and along the side-walls of the hall. As the edifice
itself was very large, and mind had so essentially
reduced matter in the monikin species, there could
not have been less than fifty thousand tails present.
Just before the ceremonies commenced, Dr.
Reasono
approached our tribune, passing from one to
another of the party, saying a pleasant and an
encouraging
word to each, in a way to create high
expectations
in us all, as to what was to follow. We
were so very evidently honored and distinguished,
that I struggled hard to subdue any unworthy
feeling
of pride, as unbecoming human meekness, and
in order to maintain a philosophical equanimity
under the manifestations of respect and gratitude
that I knew were about to be lavished upon even
the meanest of our party. The Doctor was yet in
the midst of his pointed attentions, when the King's
eldest first-cousin of the masculine gender entered,
and the business of the meeting immediately began.
I profited by a short pause, however, to say a few
words to my companions. I told them there would
soon be a serious demand on their modesty. We
had performed a great and generous exploit, and it
did not become us to lessen its merit by betraying
a vain-glorious self-esteem. I implored them all to
take pattern by me; promising, in the end, that
their new friends would trebly prize their hardihood,
self-denial and skill.
There was a new member of the academy of
Latent Sympathies to be received and installed. A
long discourse was read by one of this department
of the monikin learning, which pointed out and
enlarged on the rare merits of the new academician.
He was followed by the latter; who, in a very
elaborate
production, that consumed just fifty-five
minutes in the reading, tried all he could to persuade
the audience that the defunct was a loss to the world,
that no accident or application would ever repair;
and that he himself was precisely the worst person
who could have been selected to be his successor.
I was a little surprised at the perfect coolness with
which the learned body listened to a reproach, that
was so very distinctly and perseveringly thrown,
as it were, into their very teeth. But a more
intimate
acquaintance with monikin society satisfied
me, that any one might say just what he pleased,
so long as he allowed that every one else was an
excellent fellow, and he himself the poorest devil
going. When the new member had triumphantly
established his position, and just as I thought his
colleagues were bound, in common honesty, to
reconsider their vote, he concluded and took his
seat among them, with quite as much assurance as
the best philosopher of them all.
After a short pause, and an abundance of
felicitations
on his excellent and self-debasing discourse,
the newly-admitted member again rose, and began
to read an essay on some discoveries he had made
in the science of Latent Sympathies. According to
his account of the matter, every monikin possessed
a fluid which was invisible, like the animalcula
which pervade nature, and which required only
to be brought into command, and to be reduced to
more rigid laws, to become the substitutes for the
senses of sight, touch, taste, hearing and smelling.
This fluid was communicable; and had already been
so far rendered subject to the will, as to make it of
service in seeing in the dark, in smelling when the
operator had a bad cold, in tasting when the palate
was down, and in touching by proxy. Ideas had
been transmitted, through its agency, sixty-two
leagues in one minute and a half. Two monikins,
who were afflicted with diseased tails, had, during
the last two years, been insulated and saturated,
and had then lost those embellishments, by
operations
;
a quantity of the fluid having been substituted
in their places so happily, that the patients fancied
themselves more than ever conspicuous for the
length and
finesse
of their
caud
. An
experiment
had also been successfully tried on a member
of the lower house of parliament, who, being
married
to a monikina of unusual mind, had for a long
time been supplied with ideas from this source,
although his partner was compelled to remain
at home, in order to superintend the management
of their estate, forty-two miles from town, during
the whole session. He particularly recommended
to government the promotion of this science, as it
might be useful in obtaining evidence for the
purposes
of justice, in detecting conspiracies, in
collecting
the taxes, and in selecting candidates for
trusts of a responsible nature. The suggestion was
well received by the King's cousin, more especially
those parts that alluded to sedition and the revenue.
This essay was also perfectly well received by
the
savans
, for I afterwards found very little came
amiss to the academy: and the members named
a committee forthwith to examine into the facts
concerning invisible and unknown fluids, their
agency
,
importance, and relations to monikin happiness.
We were next favored with a discussion on the
different significations of the word
gorstchwzyb;
which, rendered into English, means eh! The
celebrated philologist who treated the subject,
discovered
amazing ingenuity in expatiating on its
ramifications and deductions. First, he tried the
letters by transpositions, by which he triumphantly
proved that it was derived from all the languages
of the ancients; the same process showed that it
possessed four thousand and two different
significations
;
he next reasoned most ably and
comprehensively
for ten minutes, backwards and forwards,
using no other word but this, applied in its various
senses; after which, he incontrovertibly established
that this important part of speech was so useful as
to be useless, and he concluded by a proposition,
in which the academy coincided by acclamation,
that it should be for ever and incontinently expunged
from the Leaphigh vocabulary. As the vote was
carried by acclamation, the King's cousin arose,
and declared that the writer who should so far
offend against good taste, as hereafter to make use of
the condemned word, should have two inches cut off
the extremity of his tail. A shudder among the
ladies, who, I afterwards ascertained, loved to carry
their
caud
as high as our women like to carry their
heads, proved the severity of the decree.
An experienced and seemingly much respected
member now arose to make the following
proposal
.
He said it was known that the monikin species
was fast approaching perfection; that the increase
of mind and the decrease of matter was so very
apparent as to admit of no denial; that, in his own
case, he found his physical powers diminish daily,
while his mental acquired new distinctness and
force; that he could no longer see without
spectacles
,
hear without a tube, or taste without
highseasoning
:
from all this he inferred that they were
drawing near to some important change, and he
wished that portion of the science of Latent
Sympathies
which was connected with the unknown
fluid, just treated on, might be referred to a
committee
of the whole, in order to make some
provision
for the wants of a time when monikins should
finally lose their senses. There was nothing to say
against a proposition so plausible and it was
accepted
nemine contradicente
, with the exception of
a few in the minority.
There was now a good deal of whispering, much
wagging of tails, and other indications that the real
business of the meeting was about to be touched
upon. All eyes were turned on Dr. Reasono, who,
after a suitable pause entered a tribune prepared
for solemn occasions, and began his discourse.
The philosopher, who having committed his essary
to memory, spoke extempore, commenced with a
beautiful and most cloquent apostrophe to
learning
,
and to the enthusiasm which glows in the
breasts of all her real votaries, rendering them
alike indifferent to their personal ease, their
temporal
interests, danger, suffering, and tribulations of
the spirit. After this exordium, which was
pronounced
to be
unique
for its simplicity and truth,
he entered, at once, on the history of his own
recent
adventures.
First alluding to the admirable character of that
Leaphigh usage which prescribes the Journey of
Trial, our philosopher spoke of the manner in which
he had been selected to accompany my Lord
Chatterino
on an occasion so important to his future
hopes. He dwelt on the physical preparations, the
previous study, and the moral machinery that he
had employed with his pupil, before they quitted
town; all of which, there is reason to think, were
well fitted to their objects, as he was constantly
interrupted by murmurs of applause. After some
time spent in dilating on these points, I had, at
length, the satisfaction to find him, Mrs. Lynx, and
their two wards, fairly setting out on a journey
which as he very justly mentioned, proved to be
pregnant with events of so much importance to
knowledge in general, to the happiness of the
species
,
and to several highly interesting branches of
monikin science, in particular. I say the
satisfaction
,
for, to own the truth, I was eager to witness
the effect that would be made on the monikin
sensibilities
,
when he came to speak of my own
discernment
in detecting their real characters beneath
the contumely and disgrace in which it had been
my good fortune to find them, the promptitude with
which I had stepped forward to their relief, and the
liberality and courage with which I had furnished
the means and encountered the risks, that were
necessary
to restore them to their native land. The
anticipation of this human triumph could not but
diffuse a general satisfaction in our tribune,even
the common mariners, as they recalled the dangers
through which they had passed, feeling a
consciousness
of deserving, mingled with that soothing
sentiment
which is ever the companion of a merited
reward. As the philosopher drew nearer to the
time when it would be necessary to speak of us, I
threw a look of triumph at Lord Chatterino, which,
however, failed of its intended effect,the young
peer continuing to whisper to his noble companions
with just as much self-importance and coolness as
if he had not been one of the rescued captives.
Dr. Reasono was justly celebrated, among his
colleagues, for ingenuity and eloquence. The
excellent
Vol. II. 2
morals that he threw into every possible
opening of his subject, the beauty of the figures
with which they were illustrated, and the
masculine
tendencies of his argument, gave general
delight
to the audience. The Journey of Trial was
made to appear, what it had been intended to be
by the fathers and sages of the Leaphigh institutions,
a probation replete with admonitions and
instruction
.
The aged and experienced, who had grown
callous by time, could not conceal their exultation;
the mature and suffering looked grave and full of
meditation; while the young and sanguine fairly
trembled, and, for once, doubted. But, as the
philosopher
led his party from precipice to precipice
in safety, as rocks were scaled and seductive
valleys
avoided, a common feeling of security began
to extend itself among the audience; and we all
followed him in his last experiment among the ice,
with that sort of blind confidence which the soldier
comes, in time, to entertain in the orders of a tried
and victorious general.
The Doctor was graphic in his account of the
manner in which he and his wards plunged among
these new trials. The lovely Chatterissa (for all his
travelling companions were present,) bent aside her
head and blushed, as the philosopher alluded to the
manner in which the pure flame that glowed in her
gentle bosom resisted the chill influence of that cold
region; and when he recited an ardent declaration
that my Lord Chatterino had made on the centre
of a floe, and the kind and amorous answer of his
mistress, I thought the applause of the old
academicians
would have actually brought the vaulted
dome clattering about our ears.
At length he reached the point in the narrative,
where the amiable wanderers fell in with the
sealers
,
on that unknown island to which chance and
an adverse fortune had unhappily led them, in their
pilgrimage. I had taken measures secretly to
instruct
Mr. Poke and the rest of my companions, as
to the manner in which it became us to demean
ourselves, while the Doctor was acquainting the
academy with that first outrage committed by
human
cupidity, or the seizure of himself and friends.
We were to rise, in a body, and, turning our faces
a little on one side, veil our eyes in sign of shame.
Less than this, it struck me, could scarcely be done,
without manifesting an improper indifference to
monikin rights; and more than this, might have
been identifying ourselves with the particular
individuals
of the species who had perpetrated the
wrong. But there was no occasion to exhibit this
delicate attention to our learned hosts. The
Doctor
,
with a refinement of feeling that did credit,
indeed, to monikin civilization, gave an ingenious
turn to the whole affair, which at once removed all
cause of shame from our species; and which, if it
left reason for any to blush, by a noble act of
disinterestedness
,
threw the entire onus of the
obligation
on himself. Instead of dwelling on the
ruthless
manner in which he and his friends had been
seized, the worthy Doctor very tranquilly informed
his listeners that, finding himself, by hazard, brought
in contact with another species, and that the means
of pushing important discoveries were unexpectedly
placed in his power; conscious it had long been
a desideratum with the
savans
to obtain a nearer
view and more correct notions of human society;
believing he had a discretion in the matter of his
wards, and knowing that the inhabitants of
Leaplow
,
a republic which all disliked, were seriously
talking of sending out an expedition for this very
purpose, he had promptly decided to profit by
events, to push inquiry to the extent of his abilities,
and to hazard all in the cause of learning and truth,
by at once engaging the vessel of the sealers, and
sailing, without dread of consequences, forthwith
into the very bosom of the world of man!
I have listened with awe to the thunder of the
tropics,I have held my breath as the artillery of
a fleet vomited forth its fire, and rent the air with
sudden concussions,I have heard the roar of the
tumbling river of the Canadas, and I have stood
aghast at the crashing of a forest in a tornado;
but never before did I feel so life-stirring, so
thrilling
an emotion, of surprise, alarm and sympathy,
as that which arose within me, at the burst of
commendation
and delight with which this
announcement
of self-devotion and enterprise was received
by the audience. Tails waved,
pattes
met each other
in ecstasy, voice whistled to voice, and there was
one common cry of exultation, of rapture and of
glorification, at this proof, not of monikin, for that
would have been frittering away the triumph, but
at this proof of Leaphigh courage!
During the clamor, I took an opportunity to
express my satisfaction at the handsome manner
in which our friend the Doctor had passed over
an acknowledged human delinquency, and the
ingenuity
with which he had turned the whole of the
unhappy transaction to the glory of Leaphigh.
Noah answered that the philosopher had certainly
shown a knowledge of human natur', and he
presumed
of monikin natur', in the matter; no one
would now dispute his statement, since, as he knew
by experience, no one was so likely to be set down
as a liar, as he who endeavored to unsettle the
good opinion that either a community or an
individual
entertained of himself. This was the way at
Stunin'tun, and he believed this was pretty much
the way at New-York, or he might say with the
whole 'arth, from pole to pole. As for himself,
however, he owned he should like to have a few
minutes' private conversation with the sealer in
question, to hear his account of the matter; he
didn't know any owner in his part of the world,
who would bear a captain out, should he abandon
a v'yage in this way, on no better security than the
promises of a monkey, and of a monkey, too, who
must, of necessity, be an utter stranger to him.
When the tumult of applause had a little abated,
Dr. Reasono proceeded with his narrative. He
touched lightly on the accommodations of the
schooner, which he gave us reason to think were
altogether of a quality beneath the condition of her
passengers; and he added that, falling in with a
larger and fairer vessel, which was making a passage
between Bombay and Great Britain, he profited by
the occasion, to exchange ships. This vessel touched
at the island of St. Helena, where, according to the
Doctor's account of the matter, he found means to
pass the greater part of a week on shore.
Of the island of St. Helena he gave a long,
scientific
,
and certainly an interesting account. It was
reported to be volcanic, by the human
savans
, he
said, but a minute examination and a comparison
of the geological formation, &c., had quite satisfied
him that their own ancient account, which was
contained in the mineralogical works of Leaphigh,
was the true one; or, in other words, that this rock
was a fragment of the polar world that had been
blown away at the great eruption, and which had
become separated from the rest of the mass at this
spot, where it had fallen and become a fixture of
the ocean. Here the Doctor produced certain
specimens
of rock, which he submitted to the learned
present, inviting their attention to its character, and
asking, with great mineralogical confidence, if it did
2 *
not intimately resemble a well-known stratum of a
mountain within two leagues of the very spot they
were in? This triumphant proof of the truth of his
proposition was admirably received; and the
philosopher
was in particular rewarded by the smiles
of all the females present; for ladies usually are
well pleased with any demonstration that saves
them the trouble of comparison and reflection.
Before quitting this branch of his subject, the
Doctor observed that, interesting as were these
proofs of the accuracy of their histories, and of the
great revolutions of inanimate nature, there was
another topic connected with St. Helena, which, he
felt certain, would excite a lively emotion in the
breasts of all who heard him. At the period of his
visit, the island had been selected as a prison for a
great conqueror and disturber of his
fellow-creatures
;
and public attention was much drawn to the
spot by this circumstance, few
men
coming there
who did not permit all their thoughts to be absorbed
by the past acts, and the present fortunes, of the
individual in question. As for himself, there was
of course no great attraction in any events
connected
with mere human greatness, the little
struggles
and convulsions of the species containing no
particular interest for a devotee of the monikin
philosophy; but the manner in which all eyes were
drawn in one direction, afforded him a liberty of
action that he had eagerly improved, in a way that,
he humbly trusted, would not be thought altogether
unworthy of their approbation. While searching
for minerals among the cliffs, his attention had been
drawn to certain animals that are called monkeys,
in the language of those regions; which, from very
obvious affinities of a physical nature, there was
some reason to believe might have had a common
origin with the monikin species. The academy
would at once see how desirable it was to learn
all the interesting particulars of the habits,
language
,
customs, marriages, funerals, religious
opinions
,
traditions, state of learning, and general
moral condition of this interesting people, with a
view to ascertain whether they were merely one
of those abortions to which, it is known, nature is
in the practice of giving birth, in the outward
appearance
of their own species, or whether, as
several
of their best writers had plausibly maintained,
they were indeed a portion of those whom they
had been in the habit of designating as the Lost
Monikins. He had succeeded in getting access
to a family of these beings, and in passing an entire
day in their society. The result of his investigations
was, that they were truly of the monikin family,
retaining much of the ingenuity and many of the
spiritual notions of their origin, but with their
intellects
sadly blunted, and perhaps their improvable
qualities annihilated, by the concussion of the
elements
that had scattered them abroad upon the
face of the earth, houseless, hopeless, regionless
wanderers. The vicissitudes of climate, and a great
alteration of habits, had certainly wrought some
physical changes; but there still remained a
sufficient
scientific identity to prove they were monikins.
They even retained, in their traditions, some
glimmerings
of the awful catastrophe by which they
were separated from the rest of their
fellow-creatures
;
but they necessarily were vague and profitless.
Having touched on several other points connected
with these very extraordinary facts, the Doctor
concluded by saying that he saw but one way in
which this discovery could be turned to any
practical
advantage, beyond the confirmation it afforded
of the truth of their own annals. He suggested the
expediency of fitting out expeditions to go among
these islands and seize upon a number of families,
which, being transported into Leaphigh, might found
a race of useful menials, who, while they would
prove much less troublesome than those who
possessed
all the knowledge of monikins, would
probably
be found more intelligent and useful than any
domestic animal which they at present owned.
This happy application of the subject met with
decided commendation. I observed that most of
the elderly females put their heads together on the
spot, and appeared to be congratulating each other
on the prospect of being speedily relieved from their
household cares.
Dr. Reasono next spoke of his departure from
St. Helena, and of his finally landing in Portugal.
Here, agreeably to his account, he engaged
certain
Savoyards to act as his
couriers
and guides,
during a tour he intended to make through
Portugal
,
Spain, Switzerland, France, &c. &c. &c. I
listened with admiration. Never before had I
so lively a perception of the vast difference that
is effected in our views of matters and things, by
the agency of an active philosophy, as was now
furnished by the narrative of the speaker. Instead
of complaining of the treatment he had received,
and of the degradations to which he and his
companions
had been subjected, he spoke of it all as so
much prudent submission, on his part, to the
customs
of the countries in which he happened to find
himself, and as the means of ascertaining a
thousand
important facts, both moral and physical,
which he proposed to submit to the academy in a
separate memoir, another day. At present, he
was admonished by the clock to conclude, and he
would therefore hasten his narrative, as much as
possible.
The Doctor, with great ingenuousness, confessed
that he could gladly have passed a year or two
longer in those distant and highly interesting
portions
of the earth; but he could not forget that he
had a duty to perform to the friends of two noble
families. The Journey of Trial had been completed
under the most favorable auspices, and the ladies
naturally became anxious to return home. They
had accordingly passed into Great Britain, a
country
remarkable for maritime enterprise, where he
immediately commenced the necessary
preparations
for their sailing. A ship had been procured
under the promise of allowing it to be freighted,
free of custom-house charges, with the products
of Leaphigh. A thousand applications had been
made to him for permission to be of his party, the
natives naturally enough wishing to see a civilized
country; but prudence had admonished him to
accept of those only who were the most likely to
make themselves useful. The King of Great
Britain
,
no mean prince in human estimation, had
committed his only son and heir-apparent to his
care, with a view to his improvement by
travelling
;
and the Lord High Admiral himself had
asked permission to take command of an
expedition
that was of so much importance to knowledge
in general, and to his own profession in particular.
Here Dr. Reasono ascended our tribune, and
presented Bob to the academy as the Prince-Royal
of Great Britain, and Captain Poke as her Lord
High Admiral! He pointed out certain
peculiarities
about the former, the smut in particular,
which had become pretty effectually incorporated
with the skin, as so many signs of royal birth;
and ordering the youngster to uncase, he drew
forth the union-jack that the lad carefully kept
about his nether part as a fender, and exhibited it
as his armorial bearingsa modification of its
uses that would not have been very far out of the
way, had another limb been substituted for the
agent. As for Captain Poke, he requested the
academicians to study his nautical air, in general,
as furnishing sufficient proof of his pursuits, and
of the ordinary appearance of human seamen.
Turning to me, I was then introduced to all
present as the travelling governor and personal
attendant of Bob, and as a very respectable
person
in my way. He added, that he believed, also,
I had some pretension to be the discoverer of
something that was called the social-stake system;
which, he dared to say, was a very creditable
discovery
for one of my opportunities.
By this prompt substitution of employments, I
found I had effectually changed places with the
cabin-boy; who, instead of waiting on me, was, in
future, to receive that trifling attention at my
hands. The mates were presented as two
rear-admirals
at nurse, and the crew was said to be
composed of so many post-captains in the navy
of Great Britain. To conclude, the audience was
given to understand that we were all brought to
Leaphigh, like the minerals from St. Helena, as
so many specimens of the human species!
I shall not deny that Dr. Reasono had taken a
very different view of himself and his acts, as well
as of me and my acts, from those I had all along
entertained myself; and yet, on reflection, it is so
common to consider ourselves in lights very
different
from those in which we are viewed by
others, that I could not, on the whole, complain as
much of his representations as I had at first thought
it might become me to do. At all events, I was
completely spared the necessity of blushing for my
generosity and disinterestedness, and in other
respects
was saved the pain of viewing any part
of my own conduct under a consciousness of its
attracting attention by its singularity on the score
of merit. I must say, nevertheless, that I was both
surprised, and a little indignant; but the sudden and
unexpected turn that had been given to the whole
affair threw me so completely off my centre, that,
for the life of me, I could not say a word in my own
behalf. To make the matter worse, that monkey
Chatterino nodded to me kindly, as if he would
show the spectators that, on the whole, he thought
me a very good sort of a fellow!
After the lecture was over, the audience
approached
to examine us, taking a great many
amiable liberties with our persons, and otherwise
showing that we were deemed curiosities
worthy
of their study. The King's cousin, too, was
not neglectful of us, but he had it announced to
the assembly that we were entirely welcome to
Leaphigh; and that, out of respect to Dr. Reasono,
we were all promoted to the dignity of Honorary
Monikins, for the entire period of our stay in the
country. He also caused it to be proclaimed, that
if the boys annoyed us in the streets, they should
have their tails curled with birch curling-irons. As
for the Doctor himself, it was proclaimed that, in
addition to his former title of F.U.D.G.E., he was
now preferred to be even M.O.R.E., and that he
was also raised to the dignity of an H.O.A.X., the
very highest honor to which any savant of
Leaphigh
could attain.
At length curiosity was appeased, and we were
permitted to descend from the tribune; the
company
ceasing to attend to us, in order to pay
attention to each other. As I had time, now, to
recollect myself, I did not lose a moment in taking
the two mates aside, to present a proposition that
we should go, in a body, before a notary, and enter
a protest against the unaccountable errors into
which Dr. Reasono had permitted himself to fall,
whereby the truth was violated, the rights of
persons
invaded, humanity dishonored, and the
Leaphigh
philosophy misled. I cannot say that my
arguments
were well received; and I was compelled
to quit the two rear-admirals, and to go in quest of
the crew, with the conviction that the former had been
purchased. An appeal to the reckless, frank, loyal
natures of the common seamen, I thought, would
not fail to meet with better success. Here, too, I was
fated to encounter disappointment. The men swore
a few hearty oaths, and affirmed that Leaphigh was
a good country. They expected pay and rations,
as a matter of course, in proportion to their new
rank; and having tasted the sweets of command,
they were not yet prepared to quarrel with their
good fortune, and to lay aside the silver tankard
for the tar-pot.
Quitting the rascals, whose heads really
appeared
to be turned by their unexpected elevation, I
determined to hunt up Bob, and, by dint of Mr.
Poke's ordinary application, compel him, at least,
in despite of the union-jack, to return to a sense of
his duty, and to reassume his old post as the
servitor
of my wants. I found the little blackguard in
the midst of a bevy of monikinas of all ages, who
were lavishing their attentions on his worthless
person
,
and otherwise doing all they could to eradicate
everything like humility, or any good quality that
might happen to remain in him. He certainly gave
me a fair opportunity to commence the attack, for
he wore the union-jack over his shoulder, in the
manner of a royal mantle, while the females of
inferior
rank pressed about him to kiss its hem! The
air with which he received this adulation, fairly
imposed on even me; and, fearful that the monikinas
might mob me, should I attempt to undeceive them,
for monikinas, let them be of what species they
may, always hug a delusion,I abandoned my
hostile intentions, for the moment, and hurried after
Mr. Poke, little doubting my ability of bringing
one of his natural rectitude of mind, to a right way
of thinking.
The Captain heard my remonstrances with a
decent respect. He even seemed to enter into my
feelings with a proper degree of sympathy. He
very frankly admitted that I had not been well
treated by Dr. Reasono, and he appeared to think
that a private conversation with that individual
might yet possibly have the effect of bringing him
to a more reasonable representation of facts. But,
as to any sudden and violent appeal to public
opinion
for justice, or an ill-advised recourse to a
notary
,
he strenuously objected to both. The purport
of his remarks was somewhat as follows:
He was not acquainted with the Leaphigh law
of protests, and, in consequence, we might spend
our money in paying fees, without reaping any
advantage
;
the Doctor, moreover, was a philosopher,
an F.U.D.G.E., and an H.O.A.X., and these were
fearful odds to contend against in any country, and
more especially in a foreign country; he had an
innate dislike for law-suits; the loss of my station
was certainly a grievance, but, still, it might be
borne; as for himself, he never asked for the office
of Lord High Admiral of Great Britain, but, as it
had been thrust upon him, why, he would do his
best to sustain the character; he knew his friends
at Stunin'tun would be glad to hear of his
promotion
,
for, though in his country there were no Lords,
nor even any Admirals, his countrymen were always
exceedingly rejoiced whenever any of their
fellow-citizens
were preferred to those stations by any body
but themselves, seeming to think an honor
conferred
on one, was an honor conferred on the whole
Vol. II. 3
nation; he liked to confer honor on his own nation,
for no people on 'arth tuck up a notion of this sort,
and divided it among themselves in a way to give
each a share, sooner than the people of the States,
though they were very cautious about leaving any
portion of the credit in first hands, and, therefore,
he was disposed to keep as much as he could, while
it was in his power; he believed he was a better
seaman than most of the Lord High Admirals who
had gone before him, and he had no fears on that
score; he wondered whether his promotion made
Miss Poke Lady High Admiral; as I seemed
greatly
put out
about my own rank, he would give me
the acting appointment of a chaplain, (he did n't
think I was qualified to be a sea-officer,) and no
doubt I had interest enough at home to get it
confirmed
;
a great statesman in his country had said,
that few die and none resigned, and he did n't
like to be the first to set new fashions; for his part,
he rather looked upon Dr. Reasono as his friend,
and it was unpleasant to quarrel with one's friends;
he was willing to do any thing, in reason, but
resign
,
and if I could persuade the Doctor to say he
had fallen into a mistake in my particular case, and
that I had been sent to Leaphigh as a Lord High
Ambassador, Lord High Priest, or Lord High any
thing else, except Lord High Admiral, why, he was
ready to swear to itthough he now gave notice
that, in the event of such an arrangement, he should
claim to rank me in virtue of the date of his own
commission; if he gave up his appointment a minute
sooner than was absolutely necessary, he should
lose his own self-respect, and never dare look Miss
Poke in the face, again; on the whole, he should
do no such thing; and, finally, he wished me a
good morning, as he was about to make a call on
the Lord High Admiral of Leaphigh.
CHAPTER II.
New lords, new lawsGyration, rotation, and another
nation
;also
an invitation.
I FELT that my situation had now become
exceedingly
peculiar. It is true that my modesty had
been unexpectedly spared, by the very ingenious
turn Dr. Reasono had given to the history of our
connexion with each other; but I could not see that
I had gained any other advantage by the expedient.
All my own species had, in a sense, cut me; and I
was obliged to turn despondingly, and not without
humiliation, towards the inn, where the banquet
ordered by Mr. Poke waited our appearance.
I had reached the great square, when a tap on
the knee drew my attention to one at my side. The
applicant for notice was a monikin, who had all the
physical peculiarities of a subject of Leaphigh, and
yet, who was to be distinguished from most of the
inhabitants of that country, by a longer and less
cultivated nap to his natural garment, greater
shrewdness about the expression of the eyes and
the mouth, a general air of business, and, for a
novelty, a bob-
cauda
. He was accompanied by
positively
the least well-favored being of the species I
had yet seen. I was addressed by the former.
Good morning, Sir John Goldencalf, he
commenced
,
with a sort of jerk, that I afterwards
learned was meant for a diplomatic salutation;
you have not met with the very best treatment
to-day, and I have been waiting for a good
opportunity
to make my condolences, and to offer my
services.
Sir, you are only too good. I do feel a little
wronged; and I must say, sympathy is most
grateful
to my feelings. You will, however, allow me
to express my surprise at your being acquainted
with my real name, as well as with my
misfortunes
?
Why, sir, to own the truth, I belong to an
examining
people. The population is very much
scattered in my country, and we have fallen into a
practice of inquiry that is very natural to such a
state of things. I think you must have observed
that in passing along a common highway, you
rarely meet another without a nod; while
thousands
are met in a crowded street without even a
glance of the eye. We develop this principle, sir;
and never let any fact escape us, for the want of a
laudable curiosity.
You are not a subject of Leaphigh, then?
God forbid!No, sir, I am a citizen of
Leaplow
,
a great and a glorious republic that lies three
days' sail from this island; a new nation, which is
in the enjoyment of all the advantages of youth and
vigor, and which is a perfect miracle for the
boldness
of its conceptions, the purity of its institutions,
and its sacred respect for the rights of monikins. I
have the honor to be, moreover, the Envoy
Extraordinary
and Minister Plenipotentiary of the
republic
to the King of Leaphigh, a nation from which
we originally sprung, but which we have left far
behind us in the race of glory and usefulness. I
ought to acquaint you with my name, sir, in return
for the advantage I possess on this head, in relation
to yourself.
Hereupon my new acquaintance put into my
hand one of his visiting-cards, which contained as
follows:
General-Commodore-Judge-Colonel,
People
's
Friend
:
Envoy Extraordinary and Minister
Plenipotentiary
from the Republic of Leaplow
near his Majesty the King of Leaphigh.
Sir, said I, pulling off my hat with a profound
reverence, I was not aware to whom I had the
honor of speaking. You appear to fill a variety
of employments, and I make no doubt, with equal
skill.
Yes, sir, I believe I am about as good at one
of my professions, as at another.
You will permit me to observe, however,
General
aaJudgeaaI
scarcely know, dear
sir, which of these titles is the most to your taste?
Use which you please, sir.I began with
General
,
but had got as low as Colonel before I left
home. People's Friend is the only appellation of
which I am at all tenacious. Call me People's
Friend, sir, and you may call me anything else you
find most convenient.
Sir, you are only too obliging. May I venture
to ask if you have really,
propri person
, filled all
these different stations in life?
Certainly, sirI hope you do not mistake me
for an impostor!
As far from it as possible.But a judge and a
commodore, for instance, are characters whose
duties are so utterly at variance, in human affairs,
that I will allow I find the conjunction, even in a
monikin, a little extraordinary.
Not at all, sir. I was duly elected to each,
served my time out in them all, and have honorable
discharges to show in every instance.
You must have found some perplexity in the
performance of duties so very different?
3 *
AhI see you have been long enough in
Leaphigh
to imbibe some of its prejudices! It is a sad
country for prejudice. I got my foot mired in some
of them myself, as soon as it touched the land.
Why, sir, my card is an illustration of what we
call, in Leaplow, rotation in office.
Rotation in office!
Yes, sir, rotation in office; a system that we
invented for our personal convenience, and which
is likely to be firm, as it depends on principles that
are eternal.
Will you suffer me to inquire, Colonel, if it has
any affinity to the social-stake system?
Not in the least. That, as I understand it, is a
stationary, while this is a rotatory system. Nothing
is simpler. We have in Leaplow two enormous
boxes made in the form of wheels. Into one we
put the names of the citizens, and into the other the
names of the offices. We then draw forth, in the
manner of a lottery; and the thing is settled for a
twelvemonth.
I find this rotatory plan exceedingly simple
pray, sir, does it work as well as it promises?
To perfection.We grease the wheels, of
course, periodically.
And are not frauds sometimes committed by
those who are selected to draw the tickets?
Oh! they are chosen precisely in the same
way.
But those who draw
their
tickets?
All rotatorythey are drawn exactly on the
same principle.
But there must be a beginning. Those, again,
who draw
their
ticketsthey may betray their
trusts?
Impossible
they
are always the most Patriotic
Patriots of the land! No, no, sirwe are not such
dunces as to leave anything to corruption. Chance
does it all. Chance makes me a commodore
today
a
judge to-morrow. Chance makes the lottery
boys, and chance makes the patriots. It is
necessary
to see in order to understand how much purer
and useful is your chance patriot, for instance, than
one that is bred to the calling.
Why, this savors, after all, of the doctrine of
descents, which is little more than a matter of
chance.
It would be so, sir, I confess, were it not
that our chances centre in a system of patriots.
Our approved patriots are our guarantees against
abuses
Hem!interrupted the companion of
Commodore
People's Friend, with an awkward
distinctness
,
as if to recall himself to our recollection.
Sir John, I crave pardon for great remissness
allow me to present my fellow-citizen, Brigadier
Downright, a gentleman who is on his travels, like
yourself; and as excellent a fellow as is to be found
in the whole monikin region.
Brigadier Downright, I crave the honor of your
acquaintance.But, gentlemen, I too have been
sadly negligent of politeness. A banquet that has
cost a hundred promises is waiting my appearance;
and, as some of the expected guests are
unavoidably
absent, if you would favor me with your
excellent
society, we might spend an agreeable hour
in the further discussion of these important
interests
.
As neither of the strangers made the smallest
objection to the proposal, we were all soon
comfortably
seated at the dinner-table. The
Commodore
,
who, it would seem, was habitually well fed,
merely paid a little complimentary attention to the
banquet; but Mr. Downright attacked it tooth and
nail, and I had no great reason to regret the
absence of Mr. Poke. In the mean time, the
conversation
did not flag.
I think I understand the outline of your system,
Judge People's Friend, I resumed, with the
exception
of the part that relates to the Patriots.
Would it be asking too much to request a little
explanation on that particular point?
Not in the least, sir. Our social arrangement
is founded on a hint from nature; a base, as you
will concede, that is broad enough to sustain the
universe. As a people, we are a hive that formerly
swarmed from Leaphigh; and finding ourselves
free and independent, we set about forthwith
building
the social system on not only a sure foundation,
but on sure principles. Observing that nature dealt
in duplicates, we pursued the hint, as the leading
idea
In duplicates, Commodore!
Certainly, Sir Johna monikin has two eyes,
two ears, two nostrils, two lungs, two arms, two
hands, two legs, two feet, and so on to the end of
the chapter. On this hint, we ordered that there
should be drawn, morally, in every district of
Leaplow
,
two distinct and separate lines, that should
run at right angles to each other. These were
termed the political land-marks of the country;
and it was expected that every citizen should range
himself along one or the other.All this you will
understand, however, was a moral contrivance, not
a physical one.
Is the obligation of this moral contrivance
imperative
?
Not legally, it is true; but then, he who does not
respect it is like one who is out of fashion, and he is so
generally esteemed a poor devil, that the usage has
a good deal more than the force of a law. At first,
it was intended to make it a part of the
constitution
;
but one of our most experienced
statesmen
so clearly demonstrated that, by so doing, we
should not only weaken the nature of the
obligation
,
but most probably raise a party against it, the
idea was abandoned. Indeed, if any thing, both the
letter and the spirit of the fundamental law have
been made to lean a little against the practice; but
having been cleverly introduced, in the way of
construction
,
it is now bone of our bone, and flesh of
our flesh. Well, sir, these two great political
land-marks
being fairly drawn, the first effort of one
who aspires to be thought a Patriot, is to acquire
the practice of `toeing the mark' promptly and
with facility. But should I illustrate my positions
by a few experiments, you might comprehend the
subject all the better.For though, in fact, the true
evolutions are purely moral, as I have just had the
honor to explain, yet we have instituted a physical
parallel that is very congenial to our habits, with
which the neophyte always commences.
Here the Commodore took a bit of chalk and
drew two very distinct lines, crossing each other
at right angles, through the centre of the room.
When this was done, he placed his feet together,
and then he invited me to examine if it were
possible
to see any part of the planks between the
extremities
of his toes and the lines. After a rigid look,
I was compelled to confess it was not.
This is what we call `toeing the mark;' it is
`Social Position, No. 1.' Almost every citizen gets
to be expert in practising it, on one or the other of
the two great political lines. After this, he who
would push his fortunes further, commences his
career on the great rotatory principle.
Your pardon, Commodore;we call the word
rotary, in English.
Sir, it is not expressive enough for our
meaning
;
and therefore we term it `rotatory.' I shall
now give you an example of Position No. 2.
Here the Commodore made a spring, throwing
his body, as a soldier would express it, to the right
about, bringing, at the same time, his feet entirely
on the other side of the line; always rigidly
toeing
the mark.
Sir, said I, this was extremely well done;
but is this evolution as useful as certainly it is
dexterous?
It has the advantage of changing front, Sir
John; a manuvre quite as useful in politics as in
war. Most all in the line get to practise this, too,
as my friend Downright, there, could show you,
were he so disposed.
I don't like to expose my flanks, or my rear,
more than another, growled the Brigadier.
If agreeable, I will now show you Gyration
2d, or Position No. 3.
On my expressing a strong desire to see it, the
Commodore put himself again in Position No. 1;
and then he threw what Captain Poke was in the
habit of calling a `flap-jack,' or a summerset;
coming down in a way tenaciously to toe the
mark.
I was much gratified with the dexterity of the
Commodore, and frankly expressed as much;
inquiring
,
at the same time, if many attained to the
same skill. Both the Commodore and the
Brigadier
laughed at the simplicity of the question; the
former answering that the people of Leaplow
were exceedingly active and adventurous, and both
lines had got to be so expert, that, at the word of
command, they would throw their summersets in
as exact time, and quite as promptly, as a
regiment
of guards would go through the evolution
of slapping their cartridge-boxes.
What, sir, I exclaimed, in admiration, the
entire population!
Virtually, sir. There is, now and then, a
stumbler; but he is instantly kicked out of sight,
and uniformly counts for nothing.
But as yet, Commodore, your evolutions are
altogether too general to admit of the chance
selection of patriots, since patriotism is usually a
monopoly.
Very true, Sir John; I shall therefore come to
the main point without delay. Thus far, it is
pretty much an affair of the whole population, as
you say; few refusing to toe the mark, or to
throw the necessary flap-jacks, as you have
ingeniously
termed them. The lines, as you may
perceive
,
cross each other at right angles; and there
is consequently some crowding, and, occasionally,
a good deal of jostling, at and near the point of
junction. We begin to term a monikin a Patriot,
when he can perform this evolution.
Here the Commodore threw his heels into the
air with such rapidity that I could not very well
tell what he was about, though it was sufficiently
apparent that he was acting entirely on the
rotatory
principle. I observed that he alighted, with
singular accuracy, on the very spot where he had
stood before, toeing the mark with beautiful
precision
.
That is what we call Gyration 3d, or Position
No. 4. He who can execute it is considered an
adept in our politics; and he invariably takes his
position near the enemy, or at the junction of the
hostile lines.
How, sir, are these lines, then, manned as they
are with citizens of the same country, deemed
hostile!
Are cats and dogs hostile, sir?Certainly,
although standing, as it might be, face to face,
acting on precisely the same principle, or the
rotatory
impulse, and professing to have exactly the
same object in view, viz. the common good, they
are social, political, and I might almost say, the
moral antipodes of each other. They rarely
intermarry
,
never extol, and frequently refuse to speak
to one another. In short, as the Brigadier could tell
you, if he were so disposed, they are antagonist,
body and soul. To be plain, sir, they are enemies.
This is very extraordinary for fellow-citizens!
'Tis the monikin nature, observed Mr.
Downright
;
no doubt, sir, men are much wiser?
As I did not wish to divert the discourse from
the present topic, I merely bowed to this remark,
and begged the Judge to proceed.
Well, sir, continued the latter, you can
easily imagine that they who are placed near the
point where the two lines meet, have no sinecures.
To speak the truth, they blackguard each other
with all their abilities, he who manifests the most
inventive genius in this high accomplishment, being
commonly thought the cleverest fellow. Now, sir,
none but a patriot could, in the nature of things,
endure this without some other motive than his
country's good, and so we esteem them.
But the most Patriotic Patriots, Commodore?
The minister of Leaphigh now toed the mark
again, placing himself within a few feet of the
point of junction between the two lines; and then
he begged me to pay particular attention to his
evolution. When all was ready, the Commodore
threw himself, as it were, invisibly into the air
again, head over heels, so far as I could discover,
and alighted on the antagonist line, toeing the
mark with a most astonishing particularity. It was
a clever gyration, beyond a doubt; and the
performer
looked towards me, as if inviting
commendation
.
Admirably executed, Judge, and in a way to
induce one to believe that you must have paid great
attention to the practice.
I have performed this manuvre, Sir John, five
times in real life; and my claim to be a Patriotic
Patriot is founded on its invariable success. A
single false step might have ruined me; but as
you say, practice makes perfect, and perfection is
the parent of success.
And yet I do not rightly understand how so
sudden a desertion of one's own side, to go over, in
this active manner, head over heels, I may say, to
another side, constitutes a fair claim to be deemed
so pure a character as that of a patriot.
What, sir, is not he who throws himself
defencelessly
into the very middle of the ranks of the
enemy, the hero of the combat? Now, as this is a
political struggle, and not a warlike struggle, but
one in which the good of the country is alone
uppermost
,
the monikin who thus manifests the greatest
devotion to the cause, must be the purest patriot. I
give you my honor, sir, all my own claims are
founded entirely on this particular merit.
He is right, Sir John; you may believe every
word he says, observed the Brigadier, nodding.
I begin to understand your system, which is
certainly well adapted to the monikin habits, and
must give rise to a noble emulation in the practice
of the rotatory principle. But I understood you to
say, Colonel, that the people of Leaplow are from
the hive of Leaphigh?
Just so, sir.
Vol. II. 4
How happens it then, that you dock yourselves
of the nobler member, while the inhabitants of this
country cherish it as the apple of the eyenay, as
the seat of reason itself?
You allude to our tails?Why, sir, Nature has
dealt out these ornaments with a very unequal
hand, as you may perceive on looking out of the
window. We agree that the tail is the seat of
reason
,
and that the extremities are the most
intellectual
parts; but, as governments are framed to
equalize these natural inequalities, we denounce
them as anti-republican. The law requires,
therefore
,
that every citizen, on attaining his majority,
shall be docked agreeably to a standard measure,
that is kept in each district. Without some such
expedient, there might be an aristocracy of intellect
among us, and there would be an end of our
liberties
.
This is the qualification of a voter, too, and
of course we all seek to obtain it.
Here the Brigadier leaned across the table and
whispered that a great patriot, on a most trying
occasion, had succeeded in throwing a summerset
out of his own into the antagonist line, and that, as
he carried with him all the sacred principles for
which his party had been furiously contending for
many years, he had been unceremoniously dragged
back by his tail, which unfortunately came within
reach of those quondam friends on whom he had
turned his back; and that the law had, in truth, been
passed in the interests of the patriots. He added,
that the lawful measure allowed a longer stump
than was commonly used; but that it was considered
under-bred for any one to wear a dock that reached
more than two inches and three quarters of an inch
into society, and that most of their political
aspirants
,
in particular, chose to limit themselves to one
inch and one quarter of an inch, as a proof of
excessive
humility.
Thanking Mr. Downright for his clear and
sensible
explanation, the conversation was resumed.
I had thought, as your institutions are founded
on reason and nature, Judge, I continued, that
you would be more disposed to cultivate this
member than to mutilate it; and this the more
especially, as I understand all monikins believe it
to be the very quintessence of reason.
No doubt, sir; we do cultivate our tails, but it
is on the vegetable principle, or as the skilful
gardener
lops the branch that it may throw out more
vigorous shoots. It is true, we do not expect to see
the tail itself sprouting out anew; but then we look
to the increase of its reason, and to its more
general
diffusion in society. The extremities of our
caud
, as fast as they are lopped, are sent to a great
intellectual mill, where the mind is extracted from
the matter, and the former is sold, on public
account
,
to the editors of the daily journals. This is
the reason our Leaplow journalists are so
distinguished
for their ingenuity and capacity, and the
reason, too, why they so faithfully represent the
average of the Leaplow knowledge.
And honesty, you ought to add, growled the
Brigadier.
I see the beauty of the system, Judge, and very
beautiful it is! This essence of lopped tails
represents
the average of Leaplow brains, being a
compound
of all the tails of the country; and as a daily
journal is addressed to the average intellect of the
community, there is a singular fitness between the
readers and the readees. To complete my stock
of information on this head, however, will you just
allow me to inquire what is the effect of this system
on the totality of Leaplow intelligence?
Wonderful! As we are a commonwealth, it is
necessary to have a unity of sentiment on all
leading
matters, and by thus compounding all the
extremes
of our reasons, we get what is called `
public
opinion;' which public opinion is uttered through
the public journals
And a most Patriotic Patriot is always chosen
to be the inspector of the mill, interrupted the
Brigadier
.
Better and better! you send all the finer parts
of your several intellects to be ground up and
kneaded together; the compound is sold to the
journalists, who utter it anew, as the results of the
united wisdom of the country!
Or, as public opinion.We make great
account
of reason in all our affairs, invariably calling
ourselves the most enlightened nation on earth;
but then we are especially averse to anything like
an insulated effort of the mind, which is offensive,
anti-republican, aristocratic and dangerous. We
put all our trust in this representation of brains,
which is singularly in accordance with the
fundamental
base of our society, as you must perceive.
We are a commercial people, too, put in
the Brigadier; and being much accustomed to
the laws of insurance, we like to deal in
averages
.
Very true, brother Downright; very true. We
are particularly averse to anything like inequality.
Ods zooks! it is almost as great an offence for a
monikin to know more than his neighbors, as it
is for him to act on his own impulses. Nono
we are truly a free and an independent
commonwealth
,
and we hold every citizen as amenable to
public opinion, in all he does, says, thinks or
wishes.
Pray, sir, do both of the two great political
lines send their tails to the same mills, and respect
the same general sentiments?
No, sir; we have two public opinions, in
Leaplow
.
Two
public opinions!
Certainly, sir; the horizontal and the
perpendicular
.
This infers a most extraordinary fertility of
thought, and one that I hold to be almost
impossible
!
Here the Commodore and the Brigadier
incontinently
both laughed as hard as they could; and
that, too, directly in my face.
Dear me, Sir Johnwhy, my dear Sir John!
you are really the drollest creature!gasped the
Judge, holding his sides,the very funniest
question
I have evevever encountered! He
now stopped to wipe his eyes; after which he
was better able to express himself. The same
public opinion, forsooth!Dear medear me,
that I should not have made myself understood!
I commenced, my good Sir John, by telling you
that we deal in duplicates, on a hint from Nature;
and that we act on the rotatory principle. In
obedience to the first, we have always
two
public
opinions; and, although the great political
land-marks are drawn in what may be called a
stationary sense, they, too, are in truth rotatory.
One, which is thought to lie parallel to the
fundamental
law, or the constitutional meridian of
the country, is termed the horizontal, and the other
the perpendicular line. Now, as nothing is really
stationary in Leaplow, these two great land-marks
are always acting, likewise, on the rotatory
principle
,
changing places periodically; the perpendicular
becoming the horizontal, and
vice vers;
they who
toe their respective marks, necessarily taking new
4 *
views of things, as they vary the line of sight.
These great revolutions are, however, very slow,
and are quite as imperceptible to those who
accompany
them, as are the revolutions of our planet to
its inhabitants.
And the gyrations of the patriots, of which the
Judge has just now spoken, added the Brigadier,
are much the same as the eccentric movements
of the comets that embellish the solar system,
without deranging it by their uncertain courses.
No, sir, we should be poorly off, indeed, if we
had but
one
public opinion, resumed the Judge.
Ecod, I do not know what would become of the
most Patriotic Patriots, in such a dilemma!
Pray, sir, let me ask, as you draw for places,
if you have as many places as there are citizens?
Certainly, sir. Our places are divided, firstly,
into the two great subdivisions of the inner and
the outer. Those who toe the mark on the most
popular line occupy the former, and those who toe
the mark on the least popular line take all the rest,
as a matter of course. The first, however, it is
necessary to explain, are the only places worth
having. As great care is had to keep the
community
pretty nearly equally divided
Excuse the interruptionbut in what manner
is this effected?
Why, as only a certain number can
toe the
mark
, we count all those who are not successful
in getting up to the line, as outcasts; and, after
fruitlessly hanging about our skirts for a time,
they invariably go over to the other line; since it
is better to be first in a village, than second in
Rome. We thus keep up something like an
equilibrium
in the state, which, as you must know, is
necessary to liberty. The minority take the outer
places, and all the inner are left to the majority.
Then comes another subdivision of the places;
that is to say, one division is formed of the
honorary
,
and another of the profitable places. The
honorary, or about nine-tenths of all the inner
places, are divided, with great impartiality, among
the mass of those who have toed the mark on the
strongest side, and who usually are satisfied with
the glory of the victory. The names of the
remainder
are put into the wheels to be drawn for
against the prizes, on the rotatory principle.
And the patriots, sir;are they included in this
chance-medley?
Far from it. As a reward for their dangers,
they have a little wheel to themselves, although
they, also, are compelled to submit to the rotatory
principle. Their cases differ from those of the
others, merely in the fact that they always get
something
.
I would gladly have pursued the conversation,
which was opening a flood of light upon my
political
understanding; but, just then, a fellow with
the air of a footman entered, carrying a packet
tied to the end of his
cauda
. Turning round, he
presented his burthen, with profound respect, and
withdrew. I found that the packet contained three
notes, with the following addresses:
To his Royal Highness Bob, Prince of Wales, &c. &c. &c.
To my Lord High Admiral Poke, &c. &c. &c.
To Master Goldencalf, Clerk, &c. &c. &c.
Apologizing to my guests, the seal of my own
note was eagerly opened. It read as follows:
The Right Honorable the Earl of Chatterino, Lord of the
Bed-Chamber in waiting on his Majesty, informs Master
John Goldencalf, Clerk, that he is commanded to attend the
drawing-room, this evening, when the nuptial ceremony will
take place between the Earl of Chatterino and the Lady
Chatterissa, the first Maid of Honor to her Majesty the
Queen.
N. B.
The gentlemen will appear in full dress
.
On explaining the contents of my note to the
Judge, he informed me that he was aware of the
approaching ceremony, as he had also an
invitation
to be present, in his official character. I
begged, as a particular favor, England having no
representative at Leaphigh, that he would do me
the honor to present me, in his capacity of a
foreign minister. The Envoy made no sort of
objection, and I inquired as to the costume
necessary
to be observed; as, so far as I had seen, it
was good breeding at Leaphigh to go naked. The
Envoy had the goodness to explain, that, although,
in point of mere attire, clothing was extremely
offensive to the people of both Leaphigh and
Leaplow
,
yet, in the former country, no one could
present
himself at court, foreign ministers excepted,
without a
cauda
. As soon as we understood each
other on these points, we separated, with an
understanding
that I was to be in readiness (together
with my companions, of whose interest I had not
been forgetful) to attend the Envoy and the
Brigadier
,
when they should call for me, at an hour
that was named.
CHAPTER III.
A court, a court-dress, and a courtierJustice in various
aspects, as well as honor.
My
guests were no sooner gone, than I sent for
the landlady, to inquire if any court-dresses were
to be had in the neighborhood. She told me,
plenty might certainly be had, that were suited to
the monikin dimensions, but she much doubted
whether there was a tail in all Leaphigh, natural
or artificial, that was at all fit for a person of my
stature. This was vexatious; and I was in a
brown-study, calling up all my resources for the
occasion, when Mr. Poke entered the inn,
carrying
in his hand two as formidable ox-tails as I
remember ever to have seen. Throwing one
towards
me, he said the Lord High Admiral of
Leaphigh had acquainted him, that there was an
invitation out for the Prince and himself, as well
as for the governor of the former, to be present
at court within an hour. He had hurried off
from what he called a very good dinner,
considering
there was nothing solid, (the Captain was
particularly
fond of pickled pork,) to let me know the
honor that was intended us; and, on the way
home, he had fallen in with Dr. Reasono, who, on
being acquainted with his errand, had not failed
to point out the necessity of the whole party
coming
en habit de cour
. Here was a dilemma, with a
vengeance; for the first idea that struck the
Captain
was the utter impossibility of finding
anything
in this way, in all Leaphigh, befitting a Lord
High Admiral of his length of keel; for, as to going
in an ordinary monikin
queue
, why, he should look
like a three-decked ship, with a brig's spar
stepped
for a lower mast! Dr. Reasono, however,
had kindly removed the embarrassment, by
conducting
him to the Cabinet of Natural History,
where three suitable appendages had been found,
viz. two fine relics of oxen,
[1]
[1]
Caud Bovm
.
Buf
.
and another, a capital
specimen, that had formerly been the mental lever,
or, as the Captain expressed it, the steering oar
of a kangaroo. The latter had been sent off,
express
,
with a kind consideration for the honor of
Great Britain, to Prince Bob, who was at a villa
of one of the royal family, in the neighborhood of
Aggregation.
I was greatly indebted to Noah, for his dexterity
in helping me to a good fit with my court-dress.
There was not time for much particularity, for
we were in momentary expectation of Judge
People's
Friend's return. All we could do, therefore,
was to make a belt of canvas, (the Captain being
always provided with needles, palm, &c., in his
bag,) and to introduce the smaller end of the tail
through a hole in the belt, drawing its base tight
up to the cloth, which, in its turn, was stitched
round our bodies. This was but an indifferent
substitute
for the natural appendage, it is true; and
the hide had got to be so dry and unyielding, that
it was impossible for the least observant person to
imagine there was a particle of brains in it. The
arrangement had, also, another disadvantage. The
cauda
stuck out nearly at right angles with the
position of the body, and, besides occupying much
more space than would probably be permitted in
the royal presence, it gave any jackanapes, as
Noah observed, the great advantage over us, of
making us yaw at pleasure, since he might use
the outriggers as levers. But a seaman is
inexhaustible
in expedients. Two back-stays, or
bob-stays, (for the Captain facetiously gave
them both appellations,) were soon turned in,
and the tails were stayed in, in a way to bring
them as upright as try-sail-masts; to which spars,
indeed, according to Noah's account of the
matter
,
they bore no small resemblance.
The Envoy Extraordinary of Leaplow,
accompanied
by his friend, Brigadier Downright, arrived
just as we were dressed; and a most extraordinary
figure the former cut, if truth must be said.
Although
obliged to be docked, according to the
Leaplow law, to six inches, and brought down to
a real bob, by both the public opinions of his
country
,
for this was one of the few points on which
these antagonist sentiments were perfectly agreed,
he now appeared in just the largest brush I
remember
to have seen appended to a monikin! I felt a
strong inclination to joke the rotatory republican
on this coquetry; but then I remembered how
sweet any stolen indulgence becomes; and, for
the life of me, I could not give utterance to a
bon mot
. The elegance of the Minister was
rendered
the more conspicuous by the simplicity of
the Brigadier, who had contrived to
moustache
his
dock, a very short one at the best, in such a
manner
as to render it nearly invisible. On my
expressing
a doubt to Mr. Downright about his being
admitted in such a costume, he snapped his fingers,
and gave me to understand he knew better. He
appeared as a Brigadier of Leaplow, (I found
afterwards that he was in truth no soldier, but
that it was a fashion among his countrymen to
travel under the title of Brigadier,) and this was
his uniform; and he should like to see the
chamberlain
who would presume to call in question the
state of his wardrobe! As it was no affair of
mine, I prudently dropped the subject, and we
were soon in the court of the palace.
I shall pass over the parade of guards, the state
bands, the sergeant-trumpeters, the crowd of
footmen
and pages, and conduct the reader at once to
the antechamber. Here we found the usual throng
composed of those who live in the smiles of
princes. There was a great deal of politeness,
much bowing and curtseying, and the customary
amount of genteel
empressement
to be the first to
bask in the sunshine of royalty. Judge People's
Friend, in his character of a foreign minister, was
privileged; and we had enjoyed the private
entre
,
and were now, of right, placed nearest to the
great doors of the royal apartments. Most of the
diplomatic corps were already in attendance, and,
quite as a matter of course, there were a great
many cordial manifestations of the ardent
attachment
that bound them and their masters together,
in the inviolable bonds of a most sacred amity.
Judge People's Friend, according to his own
account
of the matter, represented a great nation
a very great nationand yet I did not perceive
that he met with a warma very warm
reception
.
However, as he seemed satisfied with
himself
,
and all around him, it would have been
unkind, not to say rude, in a stranger to disturb
his self-esteem; and I took especial care, therefore,
not to betray, by the slightest hint, my opinion
that a good many near his person seemed to think
him and his artificial
queue
somewhat in the way.
The courtiers of Leaphigh, in particular, who are
an exceedingly exclusive and fastidious corps,
appeared
to regard the privileges of the Judge with
an evil eye; and one or two of them actually held
their noses as he flourished his brush a little too
near their sacred faces, as if they found its odor
out of fashion. While making these silent
observations
,
a page cried out from the lower part of the
saloon, Room for his Royal Highness the Crown
Prince of Great Britain! The crowd opened, and
that young blackguard Bob walked up the avenue,
in state. He wore the turnspit garment as the
base of his toilet; but the superstructure was
altogether more in keeping with the rascal's
assumed
character. The union-jack was thrown
over his shoulder in the fashion of a mantle, and
it was supported by the cook and steward of the
Walrus, (two blacks,) both clothed as alligators.
The kangaroo's tail was rigged in a way to excite
audible evidences of envy in the heart of Mr.
Poke. The stepping of it, the Captain whispered,
did the young dog great credit, for it looked as
natural as the best wig he had ever seen; and then,
in addition to the bob-stay, it had two guys, which
acted like the yoke-lines of a boat, or in such a
way, that by holding one in each hand, the brush
could be worked `starboard and larboard' like a
rudder. I have taken this description mainly from
the mouth of the Captain, and most sincerely do
I hope it may be intelligible to the reader.
Bob appeared to be conscious of his advantages;
for, on reaching the upper end of the room, he
began whisking his tail, and flourishing it to the
right and left, so as to excite a very perceptible
and lively admiration in the mind of Judge People's
Friend,an effect that so much the more proved
the wearer's address, for that high functionary
was bound
ex officio
to entertain a sovereign
contempt
for all courtly vanities. I saw the eye of
the Captain kindle, however; and when the
insolent
young coxcomb actually had the temerity to
turn his back on his master, and to work his brush
under his very nose, human nature could endure
Vol. II. 5
no more. The right leg of my Lord High Admiral
slowly retired, with somewhat of the caution of
the cat about to spring, and then it was projected
forward, with a rapidity that absolutely lifted the
Crown Prince from the floor.
The royal self-possession of Bob could not
prevent
an exclamation of pain, as well as of
surprise
;
and some of the courtiers ran forward
involuntarily
to aid him,for courtiers always run
involuntarily to the succor of princes. At least a
dozen of the ladies offered their smelling-bottles,
with the most amiable assiduity and concern. To
prevent any disagreeable consequences, however,
I hastened to acquaint the crowd that, in Great
Britain, it is the usage to cuff and kick the
whole royal family; and that, in short, it is no
more than the customary tribute of the subject
to the prince. In proof of what I said, I took good
care to give the saucy young seoundrel a touch of
my own homage. The monikins, who know that
different customs prevail in different nations,
hastened
to compliment the young scion of royalty
in the same manner; and both the cook and
steward
relieved their
ennui
by falling into the track
of imitation. Bob could not stand the last
applications
;
and he was about to beat a retreat, when
the master of ceremonies appeared, to conduct him
to the royal presence.
The reader is not to be misled by the honors
that were paid to the imaginary Crown Prince,
and to suppose that the court of Leaphigh
entertained
any peculiar respect for that of Great
Britain
.
It was merely done on the principle that
governed the conduct of our own learned
sovereign
,
King James I., when he refused to see the
amiable Pocahontas of Virginia, because she had
degraded royalty by intermarrying with a subject.
The respect was paid to the caste, and not to the
individual, to his species, or to his nation.
Let his privileges come from what cause they
would, Bob was glad enough to get out of the
presence
of Captain Poke,who had already pretty
plainly threatened, in the Stunnin'tun dialect, to
unship his
cauda
,into that of the Majesty of
Leaphigh
.
A few minutes afterwards, the doors were
thrown open, and the whole company advanced
into the royal apartments.
The etiquette of the court of Leaphigh differs,
in many essential particulars, from the etiquette
of any other court in the monikin region.
Neither
the King, nor his royal consort, is ever
visible
to any one in the country, so far as is vulgarly
known. On the present occasion, two thrones
were placed at opposite extremities of the saloon,
and a magnificent, crimson, damask curtain was
so closely drawn before each, that it was quite
impossible to see who occupied it. On the lowest
step there stood a chamberlain or a lady of the
bed-chamber, who, severally, made all the speeches,
and otherwise enacted the parts of the illustrious
couple. The reader will understand, therefore, that
all which is here attributed to either of these great
personages, was in fact performed by one or the
other of the substitutes named, and that I never
had the honor of actually standing, face to face,
with their Majesties. Every thing that is now
about to be related, in short, was actually done by
deputy, on the part of the monarch and his wife.
The King himself merely represents a
sentiment
,
all the power belonging to his eldest
first-cousin
of the masculine gender, and any
intercourse
with him is entirely of a disinterested or
of a sentimental character. He is the head of the
church,after a very secular fashion, however;
all the bishops and clergy therefore got down
on their knees and said their prayers; though the
Captain suggested that it might be their
catechisms
:
I never knew which. I observed, also,
that all his law officers did the same thing; but as
they
never pray, and do not know their
catechisms
,
I presume the genuflections were to beg
something better than the places they actually
filled. After this, came a long train of military
and naval officers, who, soldier-like, kissed his
paw. The civilians next had a chance, and then
it was our turn to be presented.
I have the honor to present the Lord High
Admiral of Great Britain, to your Majesty, said
Judge People's Friend, who had waived his official
privilege of going first, in order to do us this favor
in person; it having been decided, on a review of
all the principles that touched the case, that
nothing
human could take precedence of a monikin
at court, always making the exception in favor of
royalty, as in the case of Prince Bob.
I am happy to see you at my court, Admiral
Poke, the King politely rejoined, manifesting the
tact of high rank in recognizing Noah by his
family name, to the great surprise of the old sealer.
King!
You were about to remark? most
graciously
inquired his Majesty, a little at a loss to
understand what his visiter would be at.
Why, I could not contain my astonishment at
your memory, Mr. King, which has enabled you
to recall a name that you probably never before
heard!
There was now a great, and, to me, a very
unaccountable
confusion in the circle. It would
seem, that the Captain had unwittingly trespassed
on two of the most important of the rules of
etiquette
,
in very mortal points. He had confessed
to the admission of an emotion as vulgar as that
of astonishment in the royal presence, and he had
intimated that his Majesty had a memory; a
property
of the mind which, as it might prove
dangerous
to the liberties of Leaphigh, were it left in
the keeping of any but a responsible minister, it
had long been decided it was felony to impute to
the King. By the fundamental law of the land,
the King's eldest first-cousin of the masculine
gender
may have as many memories as he please,
and he may use them, or abuse them, as he shall
see fit, both in private or in the public service; but
it is held to be utterly unconstitutional and
unparliamentary
,
and, by consequence, extremely
underbred, to insinuate, even in the most remote
manner, that the King himself has either a
memory
,
a will, a determination, a resolution, a desire,
a conceit, an intention, or, in short, any other
intellectual
property, that of a royal pleasure
alone excepted. It is both constitutional and
parliamentary to say the King has a royal
pleasure
,
provided the context goes to prove that this
royal pleasure is entirely at the disposition of
his eldest first-cousin of the masculine gender.
When Mr. Poke was made acquainted with his
mistake, he discovered a proper contrition; and
the final decision of the affair was postponed, in
order to have the opinion of the judges on the
propriety
of taking bail, which I promptly offered to
put in, in behalf of my old ship-mate. This
disagreeable
little interruption temporarily disposed of,
the business of the drawing-room went on.
Noah was next conducted to the Queen, who
was much inclined (always by deputy) to overlook
the little mistake into which he had fallen with
her royal consort, and to receive him graciously.
May it please your Majesty, I have the honor
to present to your Majesty's royal notice, the Lord
Noah Poke, the Lord High Admiral of a distant
5 *
and but little known country, called Great
Britain
,
said the gold stick of the evening,Judge
People's Friend being afraid of committing
Leaplow
,
and declining to introduce the Captain to any
one else.
Lord Poke is a countryman of our royal
cousin
the Prince Bob! observed the Queen, in an
exceedingly gracious manner.
No marm, put in the sealer, promptly, your
cousin Bob is no cousin of mine; and if it were
lawful for your Majesty to have a memory, or an
inclination, or any thing else in that way, I should
beg the favor of you, to order the young
blackguard
to be soundly threshed.
The Majesty of Leaphigh stood aghast, by
proxy! It would seem Noah had now actually
fallen into a more serious error, than the mistake
he had made with the King. By the law of
Leaphigh
,
the Queen is not a
femme couverte
. She
can sue and be sued in her own name, holds her
separate estate, without the intervention of trustees,
and
is
supposed to have a memory, a will, an
inclination
,
or any thing else in that way, except a
royal pleasure, to which she cannot, of right,
lay claim. As to her, the King's first-cousin is
a dead letter; he having no more control over her
conscience, than he has over the conscience of an
apple-woman. In short, her Majesty is quite as
much the mistress of her own convictions and
conscience
,
as it probably ever falls to the lot of
women
in such high stations to be the mistress of
interests that are of so much importance to those
around them. Noah, innocently enough, I do
firmly
believe, had seriously wounded all those nice
sensibilities which are naturally dependent on such
an improved condition of society. Forbearance
could go no farther, and I saw, by the dark looks
around me, that the Captain had committed a
serious crime. He was immediately arrested, and
conducted from the presence to an adjoining room,
into which I obtained admission, after a good deal
of solicitation and some very strong appeals to
the sacred character of the rights of hospitality.
It now appeared, that in Leaphigh, the merits
of a law are decided on a principle very similar
to the one we employ in England in judging of the
quality of our wines; viz., its age. The older a
law, the more it is to be respected, no doubt
because, having proved its fitness by outlasting all
the changes of society, it has become more
mellow
,
if not more palatable. Now, by a law of
Leaphigh, that is coeval with the monarchy, he
who offends the Queen's Majesty at a levee, is to
lose his head; and he who, under the same
circumstances
,
offends the King's Majesty,
necessarily
the more heinous offence, is to lose his
tail. In consequence of the former punishment,
the criminal is invariably buried, and he is
consigned
to the usual course of monikin
regeneration
and resuscitation; but in consequence of the
latter, it is thought that he is completely thrown
without the pale of reason, and is thereby consigned
to the class of the retrogressive animals. His mind
diminishes, and his body increases; the brain, for
want of the means of development, takes the
ascending
movement of sap again; his forehead
dilates; bumps re-appear; and, finally, after
passing
gradually downward in the scale of intellect,
he becomes a mass of insensible matter. Such,
at least, is the theory of his punishment.
By another law, that is even older than the
monarchy
,
any one who offends in the King's palace
may be tried by a very summary process, the
King's pages acting as his judges; in which case,
the sentence is to be executed without delay.
Such was the dilemma to which Noah, by an
indiscretion at court, was suddenly reduced; and,
but for my prompt interference, he would
probably
have been simultaneously decapitated at both
extremities, in obedience to an etiquette which
prescribes
that, under the circumstances of a court
trial, neither the King's nor the Queen's rights shall
be entitled to precedence. In defence of my client
I urged his ignorance of the usages of the country,
and, indeed, of all other civilized countries,
Stunnin'tun
alone excepted. I stated that the criminal
was an object altogether unworthy of their notice;
that he was not a Lord High Admiral at all, but a
mere pitiful sealer; I laid some stress on the
importance
of maintaining friendly relations with the
sealers, who cruise so near the monikin region;
I tried to convince the judges that Noah meant no
harm in imputing moral properties to the King,
and that so long as he did not impute immoral
properties
to his royal consort, she might very well
afford to pardon him. I then quoted Shakspeare's
celebrated lines on mercy, which seemed to be
well enough received, and committed the whole
affair to their better judgment.
I should have got along very creditably, and
most probably obtained the immediate discharge
of my friend, had not the Attorney-General of
Leaphigh been drawn by curiosity into the room.
Although he had nothing to say to the merits of
my arguments, he objected to every one of them,
on the ground of formality. This was too long,
and that was too short; one was too high, and
another too low; a fifth was too broad, and a
sixth too narrow; in short, there was no figure of
speech of this nature, to which he did not resort,
in order to prove their worthlessness, with the
exception that I do not remember he charged any
of my reasons with being too deep.
Matters were now beginning to look serious
for poor Noah, when a page came skipping in,
to say that the wedding was about to take place,
and that if his comrades wished to witness it, they
must sentence the prisoner without delay. Many
a man, it is said, has been hanged, in order that
the judge might dine; but, in the present instance,
I do believe Captain Poke was spared, in order
that his judges might not miss a fine spectacle. I
entered into recognizance, in fifty thousand
promises
,
for the due appearance of the criminal on
the following morning; and we all returned, in a
body, to the presence-chamber, treading on each
other's tails, in the eagerness to be foremost.
Any one who has ever been at a human court,
must very well know that, while it is the easiest
thing in the world to throw it into commotion by
a violation of etiquette, matters of mere life and
death are not at all of a nature to disturb its
tranquillity
.
There, everything is a matter of routine
and propriety; and, to judge from experience,
nothing is so unseemly as to appear to possess
human
sympathies. The fact is not very different at
Leaphigh, for the monikin sympathies, apparently,
are quite as obtuse as those of men; although
justice compels me to allow, that in the case of
Captain Poke, the appeal was made in behalf of a
creature of a different species. It is also a
settled
principle of Leaphigh jurisprudence, that it
would be monstrous for the King to interfere in
behalf of justice,justice, however, being always
administered in his name; although it certainly is
not held to be quite so improper for him to
interfere
in behalf of those who have offended justice.
As a consequence of these nice distinctions,
which it requires a very advanced stage of
civilization
fully to comprehend, both the King and
Queen received our whole party, when we came
back into the presence, exactly as if nothing
particular
had occurred. Noah wore both head and
tail erect, like another; and the Lord High
Admiral
of Leaphigh dropped into a familiar
conversation
with him, on the subject of ballasting ships,
in just as friendly a manner as if he were on the
best possible terms with the whole royal family.
This moral
sang froid
is not to be ascribed to
phlegm, but is, in fact, the result of high mental
discipline, which causes the courtier to be utterly
destitute of all feeling, except in cases that affect
himself.
It was high time, now, that I should be
presented
.
Judge People's Friend, who had witnessed
the dilemma of Noah with diplomatic unconcern,
very politely renewed the offer of his services in
my favor, and I went forward and stood before
the throne.
Sire, allow me to present a very eminent
literary
character among men, a cunning clerk, by
name Goldencalf, said the envoy, bowing to his
Majesty.
He is welcome to my court, returned the
King by proxy. Pray, Mr. People's Friend, is
not this one of the human beings who have lately
arrived in my dominions, and who have shown
so much cleverness in getting Chatterino and his
governor through the ice?
The very same, please your Majesty; and a
very arduous service it was, and right cleverly
performed.
This reminds me of a duty.Let my cousin
be summoned.
I now began to see a ray of hope, and to feel
the truth of the saying which teaches us that
justice
,
though sometimes slow, never fails to arrive
at last. I had also, now, and for the first time, a
good view of the King's eldest first-cousin of the
masculine gender, who drew near at the
summons
;
and, while he had the appearance of
listening
with the most profound attention to the
instructions
of the King of Leaphigh, was very
evidently
telling that potentate what he ought to do.
The conference ended, his Majesty's proxy spoke
in a way to be heard by all who had the good
fortune to be near the royal person.
Reasono did a good thing, he said; really,
a very good thing, in bringing us these specimens
of the human family. But for his cleverness, I
might have died without ever dreaming that
men were gifted with tails. (Kings never get
hold of the truth at the right end.) I wonder if the
Queen knew it. Pray, did you know, my Augusta,
that men had tails?
Our exemption from state affairs gives us
females
better opportunities than your Majesty
enjoys
,
to study these matters, returned his royal
consort, by the mouth of her Lady of the
Bed-Chamber
.
I dare say I'm very silly,but our cousin,
here, thinks it might be well to do something for
these good people, for it may encourage their
King himself to visit us some day.
An exclamation of pleasure escaped the ladies;
who declared, one and all, it would be delightful to
see a real human King,it would be so funny!
Well, well, added the good-natured monarch,
Heaven knows what may happen, for I have seen
stranger things. Really, we ought to do
something
for these good people; for, although we owe
the pleasure of their visit, in a great degree, to the
cleverness of Reasono,who, by the way, I'm
glad to hear is declared an H. O. A. X.,yet
he very handsomely admits, that but for their
exertions
none
of our seamikins being within reach
it would have been quite impossible to get
through the ice. I wish I knew, now, which was
the cleverest and the most useful of their party.
Here the Queen, always thinking and speaking
by proxy, suggested the propriety of leaving the
point to Prince Bob.
It would be no more than is due to his rank;
for though they are men, I dare say they have
feelings like ourselves.
The question was now submitted to Bob, who
sat in judgment on us all, with as much gravity
as if accustomed to such duties from infancy. It
is said that men soon get to be familiar with
elevation
,
and that, while he who has fallen never fails
to look backward, he who has risen invariably
limits his vision to the present horizon. Such
proved to be the case with the princely Bob.
This person, observed the jack-a-napes,
pointing
to me, is a very good sort of a person, it is
true, but he is hardly the sort of person your
Majesty
wants just now. There is the Lord High
Admiral, too,but (Bob's but was envenomed
by a thousand kicks!)butyou wish, sire, to
know which of my father's subjects was the most
useful in getting the ship to Leaphigh?
That is precisely the fact I desire to know.
Bob, hereupon, pointed to the cook; who, it will
be remembered, was present as one of his
train-bearers
.
I believe I must say, sire, that this is the man.
He fed us all; and without food, and that in
considerable
quantities, too, nothing could have been done.
The little blackguard was rewarded for his
impudence
,
by exclamations of pleasure from all
around him.It was so clever a distinction,
it showed so much reflection,it was so very
profound,it proved how much he regarded
the base of society,in short, it was evident
England would be a happy country, when he
should be called to the throne! In the mean
time, the cook was required to come forth, and
kneel before his Majesty.
What is your name? whispered the Lord of
the Bed-Chamber, who now spoke for himself.
Jack Coppers, your honor.
The Lord of the Bed-Chamber made a
communication
to his Majesty, when the sovereign turned
round by proxy, with his back towards Jack, and,
giving him the
accolade
with his tail, he bade him
rise, as Sir Jack Coppers.
I was a silent, an admiring, an astounded
witness
of this act of gross and flagrant injustice.
Some one pulled me aside, and then I recognized
the voice of Brigadier Downright.
You think that honors have alighted where
they are least due. You think that the saying of
your Crown Prince has more smartness than truth,
more malice than honesty. You think that the
court has judged on false principles, and acted on
an impulse rather than on reason; that the King
has consulted his own ease in affecting to do
justice
;
that the courtiers have paid a homage to their
master, in affecting to pay a homage to merit; and
that nothing in this life is pure or free from the
taint of falsehood, selfishness or vanity. Alas!
this is too much the case with us monikins, I must
allow; though, doubtless, among men you manage
a vast deal more cleverly.
CHAPTER IV.
About the humility of professional saints, a succession of tails,
a bride and bridegroom, and other heavenly matters,
diplomacy
included.
Perceiving
that Brigadier Downright had an
observant mind, and that he was altogether
superior
Vol. II. 6
to the clannish feeling which is so apt to
render
a particular species inimical to all others, I
asked permission to cultivate his acquaintance;
begging, at the same time, that he would kindly
favor me with such remarks as might be
suggested
by his superior wisdom and extensive travels,
on any of those customs or opinions that would
naturally present themselves in our actual
situation
.
The Brigadier took the request in good part,
and we began to promenade the rooms in
company
.
As the Archbishop of Aggregation, who was
to perform the marriage ceremony, was shortly
expected, the conversation very naturally turned
on the general state of religion in the monikin
region.
I was delighted to find that the clerical dogmas
of this insulated portion of the world were based
on principles absolutely identical with those of all
Christendom. The monikins believe that they are
a miserable lost set of wretches, who are so
debased
by nature, so eaten up by envy,
uncharitableness
and all other evil passions, that it is quite
impossible they can do anything that is good of
themselves; that their sole dependence is on the
moral interference of the great superior power of
creation; and that the very first, and the one
needful
step of their own, is to cast themselves entirely
on this power for support, in a proper spirit of
dependence and humility. As collateral to, and
consequent on this condition of the mind, they lay
the utmost stress on a disregard of all the vanities
of life, a proper subjection of the lusts of the flesh,
and an abstaining from the pomp and vain-glory
of ambition, riches, power and the faculties. In
short, the one thing needful was humility
humility
humility.
Once thoroughly humbled to a
degree that put them above the danger of
backsliding
,
they obtained glimpses of security, and
were gradually elevated to the hopes and the
condition
of the just.
The Brigadier was still eloquently discoursing
on this interesting topic, when a distant door
opened, and a gold stick, or some other sort of
stick, announced the Right Reverend Father in
God, his Grace the most eminent and most serene
Prelate, the very puissant and thrice gracious and
glorified saint, the Primate of all Leaphigh!
The reader will anticipate the eager curiosity
with which I advanced to get a glimpse of a saint
under a system as sublimated as that of the great
monikin family. Civilization having made such
progress as to strip all the people, even to the
King and Queen, entirely of every thing in the
shape of clothes, I did not well see under what
new mantle of simplicity the heads of the church
could take refuge! Perhaps they shaved off all
the hair from their bodies in sign of supereminent
self-abasement, leaving themselves naked to the
cuticle, that they might prove, by ocular evidence,
what a poor ungainly set of wretches they really
were, carnally considered; or perhaps they went
on all-fours to heaven, in sign of their unfitness to
enter into the presence of the pure of mind, in an
attitude more erect and confident. Well, these
fancies of mine only went to prove how erroneous
and false are the conclusions of one whose
capacity
has not been amplified and concatenated by
the ingenuities of a very refined civilization! His
Grace, the most gracious Father in God, wore a
mantle of extraordinary fineness and beauty, the
material of which was composed of every tenth
hair taken from all the citizens of Leaphigh, who
most cheerfully submitted to be shaved, in order
that the wants of his most eminent humility might
be decently supplied. The mantle, wove from such
a warp and such a woof, was necessarily very
large; and it really appeared to me that the
prelate
did not very well know what to do with so
much of it, more especially as the contributions
include a new robe annually. I was now
desirous
of getting a sight of his tail; for, knowing
that the Leaphighers take great pride in the length
and beauty of that appurtenance, I very naturally
supposed that a saint who wore so fine and
glorious
a robe, by way of humility, must have
recourse to some novel expedient to mortify
himself
on this sensitive subject, at least. I found that
the ample proportions of the mantle concealed,
not only the person, but most of the movements
of the Archbishop; and it was with many doubts
of my success, that I led the Brigadier behind the
episcopal train to reconnoitre. The result
disappointed
expectation again. Instead of being
destitute
of a tail, or of concealing that with which
Nature had supplied him beneath his mantle, the
most gracious dignitary wore no less than six
caud
, viz. his own, and five others added to it, by
some subtle process of clerical ingenuity that I
shall not attempt to explain; one bent on to the
other, as the Captain described them, in a
subsequent
conversation. This extraordinary train was
allowed to sweep the floor; the only sign of
humility
,
according to my uninstructed faculties, I could
discern about the person and appearance of this
illustrious model of clerical self-mortification and
humility.
The Brigadier, however, was not tardy in
setting
me right. In the first place, he gave me to
understand that the hierarchy of Leaphigh was
illustrated by the order of their tails. Thus, a
deacon wore one and a half; a curate, if a minister,
one and three quarters, and a rector, two; a dean,
two and a half; an archdeacon, three; a bishop,
four; the Primate of Leaphigh, five, and the
Primate
of
all
Leaphigh, six. The origin of the
custom
,
which was very ancient, and of course very
much respected, was imputed to the doctrine of a
saint of great celebrity, who had satisfactorily
proved that as the tail was the intellectual, or the
spiritual part of a monikin, the farther it was
removed from the mass of matter, or the body,
the more likely it was to be independent,
consecutive
,
logical and spiritualized. The idea had
succeeded
astonishingly at first; but time, which will
wear out even a
cauda
, had given birth to schisms
in the church on this interesting subject; one party
contending that two more joints ought to be added
to the Archbishop's embellishment, by way of
sustaining
the church, and the other that two joints
ought to be incontinently abstracted, in the way
of reform.
These explanations were interrupted by the
appearance
of the bride and bridegroom, at different
doors. The charming Chatterissa advanced with
a most prepossessing modesty, followed by a
glorious
train of noble maidens, all keeping their eyes,
by a rigid ordinance of hymeneal etiquette,
dropped
to the level of the Queen's feet. On the other
hand, my Lord Chatterino, attended by that
coxcomb
Hightail, and others of his kidney, stepped
towards the altar with a lofty confidence, which the
same etiquette exacted of the bridegroom. The
parties were no sooner in their places, than the
prelate commenced.
The marriage ceremony, according to the
formula
of the established church of Leaphigh, is a
very solemn and imposing ceremony. The
bridegroom
is required to swear that he loves the bride
and none but the bride; that he has made his
choice solely on account of her merits,
uninfluenced
even by her beauty; and that he will so far
6 *
command his inclinations as, on no account, ever to
love another a jot. The bride, on her part, calls
heaven and earth to witness, that she will do just
what the bridegroom shall ask of her; that she will
be his bondwoman, his slave, his solace and his
delight; that she is quite certain no other monikin
could make her happy, but, on the other hand, she
is absolutely sure that any other monikin would
be certain to make her miserable. When these
pledges, oaths and asseverations were duly made
and recorded, the Archbishop caused the happy
pair to be wreathed together, by encircling them
with his episcopal tail, and they were then
pronounced
monikin and monikina. I pass over the
congratulations, which were quite in rule, to relate
a short conversation I held with the Brigadier.
Sir, said I, addressing that person, as soon as
the prelate said `amen,' how is this? I have
seen a certificate, myself, which showed that
there was a just admeasurement of the fitness of
this union, on the score of other considerations
than those mentioned in the ceremony!
That certificate has no connexion with this
ceremony.
And yet this ceremony repudiates all the
considerations
enumerated in the certificate!
This ceremony has no connexion with that
certificate.
So it would seem; and yet both refer to the
same solemn engagement!
Why, to tell you the truth, Sir John
Goldencalf
,
we monikins (for in these particulars Leaphigh
is Leaplow) have two distinct governing
principles
in all that we say or do, which may be
divided
into the theoretical and the practicalmoral
and immoral would not be inappositebut, by the
first we control all our interests, down as far as
facts, when we immediately submit to the latter.
There may possibly be something inconsistent in
appearance in such an arrangement; but then our
most knowing ones say that it works well. No
doubt among men, you get along without the
embarrassment
of so much contradiction.
I now advanced to pay my respects to the
Countess of Chatterino, who stood supported by
the Countess-dowager, a lady of great dignity and
elegance of demeanor. The moment I appeared,
the elaborate air of modesty vanished from the
charming countenance of the bride, in a look of
natural pleasure; and, turning to her new mother,
she pointed me out as a man! The courteous old
dowager gave me a very kind reception, inquiring
if I had enough good things to eat, whether I was
not much astonished at the multitude of strange
sights I beheld in Leaphigh, said I ought to be
much obliged to her son for consenting to bring
me over, and invited me to come and see her,
some fine morning.
I bowed my thanks, and then returned to join
the Brigadier, with a view to seek an introduction
to the Archbishop. Before I relate the particulars
of my interview with that pious prelate, however,
it may be well to say that this was the last I ever
saw of any of the Chatterino set, as they retired
from the presence immediately after the
congratulations
were ended. I heard, however, previously
to leaving the region, which was within a month
of the marriage, that the noble pair kept separate
establishments, on account of some disagreement
about an incompatibility of temperor a young
officer of the guardsI never knew exactly which;
but as the estates suited each other so well, there
is little doubt that, on the whole, the match was
as happy as could be expected.
The Archbishop received me with a great deal
of professional benevolence, the conversation
dropping
very naturally into a comparison of the
respective
religious systems of Great Britain and
Leaphigh. He was delighted when he found we
had an establishment; and I believe I was indebted
to his knowledge of this fact, for his treating me
more as an equal than he might otherwise have
done, considering the difference in species. I was
much relieved by this; for, at the commencement
of the conversation, he had sounded me a little on
doctrine, at which I am far from being expert,
never having taken an interest in the church, and
I thought he looked frowning at some of my
answers; but, when he heard that we really had
a national religion, he seemed to think all safe, nor
did he once, after that, inquire whether we were
pagans or presbyterians. But when I told him we
had actually a hierarchy, I thought the good old
prelate would have shaken my hand off, and
beatified
me on the spot!
We shall meet in heaven some day! he
exclaimed
,
with holy delight; men or monikins, it
can make no great difference, after all. We shall
meet in heaven; and that, too, in the upper
mansions
!
The reader will suppose that, an alien, and
otherwise unknown, I was much elated by this
distinction. To go to heaven in company with the
Archbishop of Leaphigh was in itself no small
favor; but to be thus noticed by him at court was
really enough to upset the philosophy of a stranger.
I was sorely afraid, all the while, he would descend
to particulars, and that he might have found some
essential points of difference to nip his new-born
admiration. Had he asked me, for instance, how
many
caud
our bishops wear, I should have been
badgered; for, as near as I could recollect, their
personal illustration was of another character.
The venerable prelate, however, soon gave me
his blessing, pressed me warmly to come to his
palace before I sailed, promised to send some
tracts by me to England, and then hurried away,
as he said,'to sign a sentence of excommunication
against an unruly presbyter, who had much
disturbed
the harmony of the church, of late, by an
attempt to introduce a schism that he called
piety.
The Brigadier and myself discussed the subject
of religion at some length, when the illustrious
prelate had taken his leave. I was told that the
monikin world was pretty nearly equally divided
into two parts, the old and the new. The latter
had remained uninhabited, until within a few
generations
,
when certain monikins, who were too
good to live in the old world, emigrated in a
body, and set up for themselves in the new. This,
the Brigadier admitted, was the Leaplow account
of the matter; the inhabitants of the old countries,
on the other hand, invariably maintaining that they
had peopled the new countries by sending all those
of their own communities there, who were not fit to
stay at home. This little obscurity in the history
of the new world, he considers of no great moment,
as such trifling discrepancies must always depend
on the character of the historian. Leaphigh was
by no means the only country in the elder monikin
region. There were among others, for instance,
Leapup and Leapdown; Leapover and
Leapthrough
;
Leaplong and Leapshort; Leapround
and Leapunder. Each of these countries had a
religious establishment, though Leaplow, being
founded on a new social principle, had none. The
Brigadier thought, himself, on the whole, that the
chief consequences of the two systems were, that
the countries which had establishments had a great
reputation for possessing religion, and those that
had no establishments were well enough off in the
article itself, though but indifferently supplied on
the score of reputation.
I inquired of the Brigadier if he did not think an
establishment had the beneficial effect of
sustaining
truth, by suppressing heresies, limiting and
curtailing
prurient theological fancies, and otherwise
setting limits to innovations. My friend did not
absolutely agree with me in all these particulars;
though he very frankly allowed that it had the effect
of keeping
two
truths from falling out, by separating
them. Thus, Leapup maintained one set of
religious
dogmas under its establishment, and
Leapdown
maintained their converse. By keeping
these truths apart, no doubt, religious harmony
was promoted, and the several ministers of the
gospel were enabled to turn all their attention to
the sins of the community, instead of allowing it
to be diverted to the sins of each other, as was
very apt to be the case when there was an
antagonist
interest to oppose.
Shortly after, the King and Queen gave us all
our congs. Noah and myself got through the
crowd without injury to our trains, and we
separated
in the court of the palace; he to go to his
bed and dream of his trial on the morrow, and I
to go home with Judge People's Friend and the
Brigadier, who had invited me to finish the
evening
with a supper. I was left chatting with the
last, while the first went into his closet to indite a
dispatch to his government, relating to the events
of the evening.
The Brigadier was rather caustic in his
comments
on the incidents of the drawing-room. A
republican himself, he certainly did love to give
royalty and nobility some occasional rubs; though
I must do this worthy, upright monikin the justice
to say, he was quite superior to that vulgar
hostility
which is apt to distinguish many of his caste,
and which is founded on a principle as simple as
the fact that they cannot be kings and nobles
themselves.
While we were chatting very pleasantly, quite
at our ease, and in undress, as it were, the
Brigadier
in his bob, and I with my tail laid aside, Judge
People's Friend rejoined us, with his dispatch open
in his hand. He read aloud what he had written,
to my great astonishment, for I had been
accustomed
to think diplomatic communications sacred.
But the Judge observed, that in this case it was
useless to affect secresy, for two very good
reasons
;
firstly, because he had been obliged to employ
a common Leaphigh scrivener to copy what he had
written,his government depending on a noble
republican economy, which taught it that, if it
did get into difficulties by the betrayal of its
correspondence
,
it would still have the money that a
clerk would cost, to help it out of the
embarrassment
;
and, secondly, because he knew the
government
itself would print it, as soon as it arrived. For
his part, he liked to have the publishing of his own
works. Under these circumstances, I was even
allowed to take a copy of the letter, of which I
now furnish a fac-simile.
Sir
,
The undersigned, Envoy Extraordinary and Minister
Plenipotentiary
of the North-Western Leaplow Confederate Union,
has the honor to inform the Secretary of State, that our
interests
in this portion of the earth are, in general, on the best
possible footing; our national character is getting every day
to be more and more elevated; our rights are more and more
respected, and our flag is more and more whitening every
sea. After this flattering and honorable account of the state
of our general concerns, I hasten to communicate the
following
interesting particulars.
The treaty between our beloved North-Western Confederate
Union and Leaphigh, has been dishonored in every one of its
articles; nineteen Leaplow seamen have been forcibly
impressed
into a Leapthrough vessel of war; the King of
Leapup
has made an unequivocal demonstration with a very
improper
part of his person, at us; and the King of Leapover
has caused seven of our ships to be seized and sold, and the
money to be given to his mistress.
Sir, I congratulate you on this very flattering condition of
our foreign relations; which can only be imputed to the
glorious
constitution of which we are the common servants, and
to the just dread which the Leaplow name has so universally
inspired in other nations.
The King has just had a drawing-room, in which I took
great care to see that the honor of our beloved country should
be faithfully attended to. My
cauda
was at least three inches
longer than that of the representative of Leapup, the
Minister
most favored by Nature in this important particular; and
I have the pleasure of adding, that her Majesty the Queen
deigned to give me a very gracious smile. Of the sincerity
of that smile there can be no earthly doubt, sir; for, though
there is abundant evidence that she did apply certain
unseemly
words to our beloved country, lately, it would quite
exceed the rules of diplomatic courtesy, and be unsustained
by proof, were we to call in question her royal sincerity on
this public occasion. Indeed, sir, at all the recent
drawing-rooms
I have received smiles of the most sincere and
encouraging
character, not only from the King, but from all his
ministers, his first-cousin in particular; and I trust they will
have the most beneficial effects on the questions at issue
between
the Kingdom of Leaphigh and our beloved country.
If they would now only do us justice in the very important
affair of the long-standing and long-neglected redress, which
we have been seeking in vain at their hands, for the last
seventy-two years, I should say that our relations were on
the best possible footing.
Sir, I congratulate you on the profound respect with which
the Leaplow name is treated, in the most distant quarters of
the earth, and on the benign influence this fortunate
circumstance
is likely to exercise on all our important interests.
I see but little probability of effecting the object of my
special mission, but the utmost credit is to be attached to the
sincerity of the smiles of the King and Queen, and of all
the royal family.
In a late conversation with his Majesty, he inquired in the
kindest manner after the health of the Great Sachem, [this
is the title of the head of the Leaplow government,] and
observed that our growth and prosperity put all other nations to
shame; and that we might, on all occasions, depend on his
most profound respect and perpetual friendship. In short, sir,
all nations, far and near, desire our alliance, are anxious to
open new sources of commerce, and entertain for us the
profoundest
respect, and the most inviolable esteem.You can
tell the Great Sachem that this feeling is surprisingly
aug-mented
under his administration, and that it has at least
quad-rupled
during my mission. If Leaphigh would only respect
its treaties, Leapthrough would cease taking our seamen,
Leapup have greater deference for the usages of good society,
and the King of Leapover would seize no more of our ships
to supply his mistress with pocket-money, our foreign
relations
might be considered to be without spot. As it is, sir, they
are far better off than I could have expected, or indeed, had
ever hoped to see them; and of one thing you may be
diplo-matically
certain, that we are universally respected, and that
Vol. II. 7
the Leaplow name is never mentioned without all in
company
rising and waving their
caud
.
(Signed.)
Judas People's Friend
.
Hon.  , &c
P. S. [Private.]
Dear Sir
,If you publish this dispatch, omit the part
where the difficulties are
repeated
. I beg you will see that
my name is put in with those of the other patriots, against
the periodical rotation of the little wheel; as I shall certainly
be obliged to return home soon, having consumed all my
means. Indeed, the expense of maintaining a tail, of which
our people have no notion, is so very great, that I think none
of our missions should exceed a week in duration.
I would especially advise that the message should dilate
on the subject of the high standing of the Leaplow character,
in foreign nations; for, to be frank with you, facts require
that this statement should be made as often as possible.
When this letter was read, the conversation
reverted
to religion. The Brigadier explained that
the law of Leaphigh had various peculiarities on
this subject, that I do not remember to have heard
of before. Thus, a monikin could not be born,
without paying something to the church, a
practice
which early initiated him into his duties
towards
that important branch of the public welfare;
and, even when he died, he left a fee behind him,
for the parson, as an admonition to those who still
existed in the flesh, not to forget their obligations.
He added that this sacred interest was, in short, so
rigidly protected, that, whenever a monikin refused
to be plucked for a new clerical or episcopal
mantle
,
there was a method of fleecing him, by the
application of red-hot iron rods, which generally
singed so much of his skin, that he was commonly
willing, in the end, to let the hair-proctors pick and
choose, at pleasure.
I confess I was indignant at this picture, and did
not hesitate to stigmatize the practice as barbarous.
Your indignation is very natural, Sir John, and
is just what a stranger would be likely to feel,
when he found mercy, and charity, and brotherly
love, and virtue, and, above all, humility, made the
stalking-horses of pride, selfishness, and avarice.
But this is the way with us monikins; no doubt,
men manage better.
CHAPTER V.
A very common caseor a great deal of law, and very little
justice. Heads and tailswith the dangers of each.
I WAS early with Noah on the following morning.
The poor fellow, when it is remembered that he
was about to be tried for a capital offence, in a
foreign country, under novel institutions, and before
a jury of a different species, manifested a
surprising
degree of fortitude. Still, the love of life was
strong within him, as was apparent by the way in
which he opened the discourse.
Did you observe how the wind was, this
morning
,
Sir John, as you came in? the straight-forward
sealer inquired, with a peculiar interest.
It is a pleasant gale from the southward.
Right off shore! If one knew where all them
blackguards of Rear Admirals and Post Captains
were to be foundI don't think, Sir John, that you
would care much about paying those fifty thousand
promises?
My recognizes?Not in the least, my dear
friend, were it not for our honor. It would
scarcely
be creditable for the Walrus to sail, however,
leaving an unsettled account of her Captain's
behind
us. What would they say at Stunnin'tun
what would your own consort think of an act so
unmanly?
Why, at Stunnin'tun, we think him the
smartest
who gets the easiest out of any difficulty; and
I don't well see why Miss Poke should know it,
or, if she did, why she should think the worse of
her husband, for saving his life.
Away with these unworthy thoughts, and brace
yourself to meet the trial. We shall, at least, get
some insight into the Leaphigh jurisprudence.
Come, I see you are already dressed for the
occasion
;
let us be as prompt as duellists.
Noah made up his mind to submit with dignity;
although he lingered in the great square, in order
to study the clouds, in a way to show he might
have settled the whole affair with the fore-topsail,
had he known where to find his crew. Fortunately
for the reputations of all concerned, however, he
did not; and, discarding everything like
apprehension
from his countenance, the sturdy mariner
entered
the Old Bailey with the tread of a man, and the
firmness of innocence. I ought to have said sooner,
that we had received notice early in the morning,
that the proceedings had been taken from before
the pages, on appeal, and that a new
venue
had been
laid in the High Criminal Court of Leaphigh.
Brigadier Downright met us at the door; where
also a dozen, grave, greasy-looking counsellors
gathered
about us, in a way to show that they were
ready to volunteer in behalf of the stranger, on
receiving no more than the customary fee. But I
had determined to defend Noah myself, (the court
consenting,) for I had forebodings that our safety
would depend more on an appeal to the rights of
hospitality, than on any legal defence it was in our
power to offer. As the Brigadier kindly volunteered
to aid me for nothing, I thought proper not to
refuse
his services, however.
I pass over the appearance of the court, the
empannelling
of the jury, and the arraignment; for, in
matters of mere legal
forms
, there is no great
difference between civilized countries, all of them
wearing the same semblance of justice. The first
indictment, for unhappily there were two, charged
Noah with having committed an assault, with malice
prepense, on the King's dignity, with sticks,
daggers
,
muskets, blunderbusses, air-guns, and other
unlawful weapons,
more especially with the tongue
,
in that he had accused his Majesty, face to face,
with having a memory, &c. &c. The other
indictment
,
repeating the formula of the first, charged the
honest sealer with feloniously accusing her
Majesty
the Queen, in defiance of the law, to the injury
of good morals and the peace of society, with
having no memory, &c. &c. To both these charges,
the plea of Not Guilty, was entered as fast as
possible, in behalf of our client.
I ought to have said before, that both Brigadier
Downright and myself had applied to be admitted
of counsel for the accused, under an ancient law
of Leaphigh, as next of kin; I as a fellow human
being, and the Brigadier by adoption.
The preliminary forms observed, the
Attorney-General
was about to go into proof, in behalf of
the crown, when my brother Downright arose and
said that he intended to save the precious time of
the court, by admitting the facts; and that it was
intended to rest the defence altogether on the law
of the case. He presumed that the jury was the
judge of the law as well as of the facts, according
to the rule of Leaplow, and that he and his
brother
Goldencalf were quite prepared to show that
7 *
the law was altogether with us, in this affair.
The court received the admission, and the facts
were submitted to the jury, by consent, as proven;
although the Chief-Justice took occasion to remark,
Longbeard dissenting, that, while the jury were
certainly judges of the law, in one sense, yet there
was another sense in which they were not judges
of the law. The dissent of Baron Longbeard went
to maintain that while the jury were the judges of
the law in the another sense mentioned, they
were not judges of the law in the one sense
named. This difficulty disposed of, Mr.
Attorney-General
arose and opened for the crown.
I soon found that we had one of a very
comprehensive
and philosophical turn of mind against us,
in the advocate of the other side. He commenced
his argument by a vigorous and lucid sketch of the
condition of the world previously to the
subdivisions
of its different inhabitants into nations, and
tribes, and clans, while in the human or chrysalis
condition. From this statement, he deduced the
regular gradations by which men became
separated
into communities, and subjected to the laws
of civilization, or what is called society. Having
proceeded thus far, he touched lightly on the
different
phases that the institutions of men had
presented
,
and descended gradually and consecutively
to the fundamental principles of the social
compact
,
as they were known to exist among monikins.
After a few general observations that properly
belonged
to the subject, he came to speak of those
portions of the elementary principles of society
that are connected with the rights of the sovereign.
These he divided into the rights of the King's
prerogative
,
the rights of the King's person, and the
rights of the King's conscience. Here he again
generalized a little, and in a very happy manner;
so well, indeed, as to leave all his hearers in doubt
as to what he would next be at; when, by a fierce
logical swoop, he descended suddenly on the latter
of the King's rights, as the one that was most
connected with the subject.
He triumphantly showed that the branch of the
royal immunities that was chiefly affected by the
offence of the prisoner at the bar, was very clearly
connected with the rights of the King's conscience.
The attributes of royalty, observed the sagacious
advocate, are not to be estimated in the same
manner
as the attributes of the subject. In the sacred
person of the King are centred many, if not most,
of the interesting privileges of monikinism. That
royal personage, in a political sense, can do no
wrong; official infallibility is the consequence. Such
a being has no occasion for the ordinary faculties
of the monikin condition. Of what use, for instance,
is a judgment, or a conscience, to a functionary
who can do no wrong? The law, in order to relieve
one on whose shoulders was imposed the burthen
of the state, had, consequently, placed the latter
especially in the keeping of another. His Majesty's
first-cousin is the keeper of his conscience, as
is known throughout the realm of Leaphigh. A
memory is the faculty of the least account to a
personage who has no conscience; and, while it
is not contended that the sovereign is relieved
from the possession of his memory by any positive
statute law, or direct constitutional provision, it
follows, by unavoidable implication, and by all
legitimate construction, that, having no occasion
to possess such a faculty, it is the legal
presumption
he is altogether without it.
That simplicity, lucidity and distinctness, my
Lords, continued Mr. Attorney-General, which
are necessary to every well-ordered mind, would
be impaired, in the case of his Majesty, were his
intellectual faculties unnecessarily crowded in this
useless manner, and the state would be the sufferer.
My Lords, the King reigns, but he does not govern.
This is a fundamental principle of the constitution;
nay, it is moreit is the palladium of our liberties!
My Lords, it is an easy matter to reign in
Leaphigh
.
It requires no more than the rights of
primogeniture
,
sufficient discretion to understand the
distinction between reigning and governing, and a
political moderation that is unlikely to derange the
balance of the state. But it is quite a different thing
to govern. His Majesty is required to govern
nothing
,
the slight interests just mentioned excepted;
no, not even himself. The case is far otherwise
with his first cousin. This high functionary is
charged with the important trust of governing. It
had been found, in the early ages of the monarchy,
that one conscience, or indeed one set of faculties
generally, scarcely sufficed for him whose duty it
was both to reign and to govern. We all know,
my Lords, how insufficient for our personal
objects
are our own private faculties; how difficult
we find it to restrain even ourselves, assisted merely
by our own judgments, consciences and memories;
and in this fact, do we perceive the great
importance
of investing him who governs others, with an
additional set of these grave faculties. Under a
due impression of the exigency of such a state of
things, the common lawnot statute law, my
Lords, which is apt to be tainted with the
imperfections
of monikin reason in its isolated or individual
state, usually bearing the impress of the single
cauda
from which it emanated; but the common law, the
known receptacle of all the common sense of the
nationin such a state of things, then, has the
common law long since decreed that his Majesty's
first-cousin should be the keeper of his Majesty's
conscience; and, by necessary legal implication,
endowed with his Majesty's judgment, his
Majesty's
reason, and, finally, his Majesty's
memory
.
My Lords, this is the legal presumption. It
would, in addition, be easy for me to show, in a
thousand facts, that not only the sovereign of
Leaphigh
,
but most other sovereigns, are and ever have
been, destitute of the faculty of a memory. It might
be said to be incompatible with the royal condition
to be possessed of this obtrusive faculty. Were a
prince endowed with a memory, he might lose
sight of his high estate, in the recollection that he
was born, and that he is destined, like another, to
die; he might be troubled with visions of the past;
nay, the consciousness of his very dignity might be
unsettled and weakened by a vivid view of the
origin
of his royal race. Promises, obligations,
attachments
,
duties, principles, and even debts, might
interfere with the due discharge of his sacred
trusts, were the sovereign invested with a memory;
and it has, therefore, been decided, from time
immemorial
,
that his Majesty is utterly without the
properties of reason, judgment, and memory, as a
legitimate inference from his being destitute of a
conscience.
Mr. Attorney-General now directed the attention
of the court and jury to a statute of the 3d of
First-born
6th, by which it was enacted that any person
attributing to his Majesty the possession of any
faculty, with felonious intent, that might endanger
the tranquillity of the state, should suffer
decaudisation
,
without benefit of clergy. Here he rested the
case on behalf of the crown.
There was a solemn pause, after the speaker had
resumed his seat. His argument, logic, and above
all his good sense and undeniable law, made a very
sensible impression; and I had occasion to observe
that Noah began to chew tobacco ravenously.
After a decent interval, however, Brigadier
Downright
,
who, it would seem, in spite of his military
appellation, was neither more nor less than a
practising
attorney and counsellor in the city of Bivouac,
the commercial capital of the republic of Leaplow,
arose and claimed a right to be heard in reply. The
court now took it into its head to start the
objection
,
for the first time, that the advocate had not
been duly qualified to plead, or to argue, at their
bar. My brother Downright instantly referred
their Lordships to the law of adoption, and to that
provision of the criminal code which permitted the
accused to be heard by his next of kin.
Prisoner at the bar, said the Chief-Justice,
you hear the statement of counsel. Is it your
desire to commit the management of your defence
to your next of kin?
To anybody, your honors, if the court please,
returned Noah, furiously masticating his beloved
weed; to anybody who will do it well, my
honorables
,
and do it cheap.
And do you adopt, under the provisions of the
statute in such cases made and provided, Aaron
Downright as one of your next of kin, and if so, in
what capacity?
I doI domy Lords and your honorsI do,
body and soulif you please, I adopt the Brigadier
as my father; and my fellow human being, and tried
friend, Sir John Goldencalf, here, I adopt him as
my mother.
The court now formally assenting, the facts were
entered of record, and my brother Downright was
requested to proceed with the defence.
The counsel for the prisoner, like
Dandin
, in
Racine's
comedy of
les Plaideurs
, was disposed to pass
over the deluge, and to plunge instantly into the core
of his subject. He commenced with a review of the
royal prerogatives, and with a definition of the words
to reign. Referring to the dictionary of the
academy
,
he showed triumphantly, that to reign, was no
other than to govern as a sovereign; while to
govern, in the familiar signification, was no more
than to govern in the name of a prince, or as a
deputy
.
Having successfully established this point, he
laid down the position, that the greater might
contain
the less, but that the less could not possibly
contain the greater. That the right to reign, or to
govern, in the generic signification of the term,
must include all the lawful attributes of him who
only governed, in the secondary signification; and
that, consequently, the King not only reigned, but
governed. He then proceeded to show that a
memory
was indispensable to him who governed, since,
without one, he could neither recollect the laws,
make a suitable disposition of rewards and
punishments
,
nor, in fact, do any other intelligent or
necessary
act. Again, it was contended that by the
law of the land the King's conscience was in the
keeping of his first-cousin; now, in order that the
King's conscience should be in such keeping, it was
clear that he must
have
a conscience, since a
nonentity
could not be in keeping, or even put in
commission
;
and, having a conscience, it followed,
ex
necessitate rei
, that he must have the attributes of
a conscience, of which memory formed one of the
most essential features. Conscience was defined to
be the faculty by which we judge of the
goodness
or wickedness of our own actions. [See
Johnson's Dictionary, page 163., letter C. London
edition. Rivington, publisher.] Now, in what
manner
can one judge of the goodness or wickedness
of his acts, or of those of any other person, if he
knows nothing about them?and how can he know
anything of the past, unless endowed with the
faculty of a memory?
Again; it was a political corollary from the
institutions
of Leaphigh, that the King could do no
wrong
I beg your pardon, my brother Downright,
interrupted the Chief Justice, it is not a corollary,
but a propositionand one, too, that is held to be
demonstrated. It is the paramount law of the land.
I thank you, my Lord, continued the
Brigadier
,
as your Lordship's high authority makes my
case so much the stronger. It is, then, settled law,
gentlemonikins of the jury, that the Sovereign of
this realm can do no wrong. It is also settled law,
their Lordships will correct me, if I misstate,
it is also settled law, that the Sovereign is the
fountain
of honor, that he can make was and peace,
that he administers justice, sees the laws
executed
I beg your pardon, again, brother Downright,
interrupted the Chief Justice. This is not the law,
but the prerogative. It is the King's prerogative
to be and do all this, but it is very far from being
law.
Am I to understand, my Lord, that the court
makes a distinction between that which is
prerogative
,
and that which is law?
Beyond a doubt, brother Downright! If all that
is prerogative, was also law, we could not get on
an hour.
Prerogative, if your Lordship pleases, or
prerogativa
,
is defined to be `an exclusive or peculiar
privilege.' [Johnson. Letter P. page 139., fifth
clause from bottom. Edition as aforesaid.
Speaking
slow, in order to enable Baron Longbeard to
make his notes.] Now, an
exclusive privilege
, I
humbly urge, must supersede all enactments,
and
Not at all, sirnot at all, sir, put in my Lord
Chief Justice, dogmatically,looking out of the
window at the clouds, in a way to show that his
mind was quite made up. Not at all, good sir.
The King has his prerogatives, beyond a question;
and they are sacred;a part of the constitution.
They are, moreover, exclusive and peculiar, as
stated by Johnson; but their exclusion and
peculiarity
are not to be construed in the vulgar
acceptations
.
In treating of the vast interests of a
state, the mind must take a wide range; and I hold,
brother Longbeard, there is no principle more
settled
than the fact, that
prerogativa
is one thing, and
lex
, or the law, another. The Baron bowed
assent
.
By exclusion, in this case, is meant that
the prerogative touches only his Majesty. The
prerogative is exclusively his property, and he
may do what he pleases with it; but the law is
made for the nation, and is altogether a different
matter. Again: by peculiar, is clearly meant
peculiarity
,
or that this case is analogous to no other,
and must be reasoned on by the aid of a peculiar
logic. No, sir,the King can make peace and
war, it is true, under his prerogative; but then his
conscience is hard and fast in the keeping of
another
,
who alone can perform all legal acts.
But, my Lord, justice, though administered by
others, is still administered in the King's name.
No doubt, in his name:this is a part of the
peculiar
privilege. War is made in his Majesty's
name, too,so is peace. What is war? It is the
personal conflicts between bodies of men of
different
nations. Does his Majesty engage in these
conflicts
?
Certainly not. The war is maintained by
taxes:does his Majesty pay them?No. Thus
Vol. II. 8
we see that while the war is constitutionally the
King's, it is practically the people's. It follows, as
a corollary,since you quote corollaries, brother
Downright,that there are
two
warsor the war
of the prerogative, and the war of the fact. Now,
the prerogative is a constitutional principlea very
sacred one, certainly;but a fact is a thing that
comes home to every monikin's fire-side; and,
therefore
,
the courts have decided, ever since the reign
of Timid II., or ever since they dared, that the
prerogative
was one thing, and the law another.
My brother Downright seemed a good deal
perplexed
by the distinctions of the court, and he
concluded
much sooner than he otherwise would have
done; summing up the whole of his arguments, by
showing, or attempting to show, that if the King
had even these
peculiar
privileges, and nothing
else, that he must be supposed to have a memory.
The court now called upon the
Attorney-General
to reply; but that person appeared to think his
case strong enough as it was; and the matter, by
agreement, was submitted to the jury, after a short
charge from the bench.
You are not to suffer your intellects to be
confused
,
gentlemonikins, by the argument of the
prisoner's
counsel, concluded the Chief Justice. He
has done his duty, and it remains for you to be
equally conscientious. You are, in this case, the
judges of the law and the fact; but it is a part
of my functions to inform you what they both are.
By the law, the King is supposed to have no
faculties
.
The inference drawn by counsel, that not
being capable of erring, the King must have the
highest possible moral attributes, and consequently
a memory, is unsound. The constitution says his
Majesty
can
do no wrong. This inability may
proceed
from a variety of causes. If he can do
nothing
,
for instance, he can do no wrong. The constitution
does not say that the Sovereign
will
do no wrong
but, that he
can
do no wrong. Now,
gentlemonikins
,
when a thing
cannot
be done, it becomes
impossible
;
and it is, of course, beyond the reach of
argument. It is of no moment whether a person
has a memory, if he cannot use it, and, in such a
case, the legal presumption is, that he is without a
memory; for, otherwise, Nature, who is ever wise
and beneficent, would be throwing away her gifts.
Gentlemonikins, I have already said you are
the judges, in this case, of both the law and the
fact. The fate of the prisoner is in your hands.
God forbid that it should be, in any manner,
influenced
by me; but this is an offence against the
King's dignity, and the security of the realm; the
law is against the prisoner, the facts are all
against the prisoner, and I do not doubt that your
verdict will be the spontaneous decision of your
own excellent judgments, and of such a nature as
will prevent the necessity of our ordering a new
trial.
The jurors put their tails together, and in less
than a minute, their foremonikin rendered a
verdict
of guilty. Noah sighed, and took a fresh
supply
of tobacco.
The case of the Queen was immediately opened
by her Majesty's Attorney-General; the prisoner
having been previously arraigned, and a plea
entered
of not guilty.
The Queen's advocate made a bitter attack on
the
animus
of the unfortunate prisoner. He
described
her Majesty as a paragon of excellencies;
as the depository of all the monikina virtues, and
the model of her sex. If she, who was so justly
celebrated for the gifts of charity, meekness,
religion
,
justice, and submission to feminine duties, had
no memory, he asked leave to demand, in the name
of God, who had? Without a memory, in what
manner was this illustrious personage to recall her
duties to her royal consort, her duties to her royal
offspring, her duties to her royal self? Memory
was peculiarly a royal attribute; and without its
possession
no one could properly be deemed of high and
ancient lineage. Memory referred to the past, and the
consideration due to royalty was scarcely ever a
present consideration, but a consideration connected
with the past. We venerated the past. Time was
divided into the past, present and future. The past
was invariably a monarchical interestthe present
was claimed by republicansthe future belonged
to fate. If it were decided that the Queen had no
memory, we should strike a blow at royalty. It
was by memory, as connected with the public
archives
,
that the King derived his title to his throne;
it was to memory, which recalled the deeds of his
ancestors, that he became entitled to our most
profound
respect.
In this manner did the Queen's Attorney-General
speak for about an hour, when he gave way to the
counsel for the prisoner. But, to my great surprise,
for I knew that this accusation was much the
gravest of the two, since the head of Noah would
be the price of conviction, my brother Downright,
instead of making a very ingenious reply, as I had
fully anticipated, merely said a few words, in which
he expressed so firm a confidence in the acquittal
of his client, as to appear to think a further defence
altogether unnecessary. He had no sooner seated
himself, than I expressed a strong dissatisfaction
with this course, and avowed an intention to make
an effort in behalf of my poor friend, myself.
Keep silence, Sir John, whispered my brother
Downright; the advocate who makes many
unsuccessful
applications gets to be disrespected. I
charge myself with the care of the Lord High
Admiral's
interests; at the proper time, they shall be
duly attended to.
Having the profoundest respect for the
Brigadier's
legal attainments, and no great confidence
in my own, I was fain to submit. In the mean time,
the business of the court proceeded; and the jury,
having received a short charge from the bench,
which was quite as impartial as a positive
injunction
to convict could very well be, again rendered
the verdict of Guilty.
In Leaphigh, although it is deemed indecent to
wear clothes, it is also esteemed exceedingly
decorous
for certain high functionaries to adorn their
persons with suitable badges of their official rank.
We have already had an account of the hierarchy
of tails, and a general description of the mantle
composed of tenth-hairs; but I had forgotten to say
that both my Lord Chief-Justice and Baron
Longbeard
had tail-cases made of the skins of deceased
monikins, which gave the appearance of greater
development to their intellectual organs, and most
probably had some influence in the way of coddling
their brains, which required great care and
attention
on account of incessant use. They now drew
over these tail-cases a sort of box-coat of a very
bloodthirsty color, which, we were given to
understand
,
was a sign that they were in earnest, and
about to pronounce sentence; justice in Leaphigh
being of singularly bloodthirsty habits.
Prisoner at the bar, the Chief-Justice began,
in a voice of reproof, you have heard the decision
of your peers. You have been arraigned and tried
on the heinous charge of having accused the
sovereign
of this realm of being in possession of the
faculty called a memory, thereby endangering
8 *
the peace of society, unsettling the social relations,
and setting a dangerous example of insubordination
and of contempt of the laws. Of this crime, after
a singularly patient and impartial hearing, you
have been found guilty. The law allows the court
no discretion in the case. It is my duty to pass
sentence forthwith; and I now solemnly ask you,
if you have anything to say why sentence of
decaudisation
should not be pronounced against you
Here the Chief-Justice took just time enough to
gape, and then proceededYou are right in
throwing yourself altogether on the mercy of the
court, which better knows what is fittest for you,
than you can possibly know for yourself. You will be
taken, Noah Poke, or No. 1, sea-water-color,
forthwith
,
to the centre of the public square, between the
hours of sunrise and sunset of this day, where your
cauda
will be cut off; and after it has been divided
into four parts, a part will be exposed towards each
of the cardinal points of the compass; and the brush
thereof being consumed by fire, the ashes will be
thrown into your face, and this without benefit of
clergy. And may the Lord have mercy on your
soul!
Noah Poke, or No. 1, sea-water-color, put in
Baron Longbeard, without giving the culprit
breathing-time
,
you have been indicted, tried, and found
guilty of the enormous crime of charging the
Queen-consort of this realm of being wanting in
the ordinary, important, and every-day faculty of a
memory. Have you anything to say why sentence
should not be forthwith passed against you?No
I am sure you are very right in throwing yourself
altogether on the mercy of the court, which is
quite disposed to show you all that is in its power,
which happens, in this case, to be none at all. I need
not dwell on the gravity of your offence. If the
law should allow that the Queen has no memory,
other females might put in claims to the same
privilege
,
and society would become a chaos.
Marriage
vows, duties, affections, and all our nearest
and dearest interests would be unhinged, and this
pleasant state of being would degenerate into a
moral, or rather an immoral, pandemonium.
Keeping
in view these all-important considerations, and
more especially the imperativeness of the law,
which does not admit of discretion, the court
sentences
you to be carried hence, without delay, to
the centre of the great square, where your head
will be severed from your body by the public
executioner
,
without benefit of clergy; after which,
your remains are to be consigned to the public
hospitals
for the purposes of dissection.
The words were scarcely out of Baron
Longbeard's
mouth, before both the Attorneys-General
started up, to move the court in behalf of the
separate
dignities of their respective principals. Mr.
Attorney-General of the crown prayed the court so
far to amend its sentence, as to give precedency to
the punishment on account of the offence against
the King; and Mr. Attorney-General for the Queen,
to pray the court it would not be so far forgetful
of her Majesty's rights and dignity, as to establish
a precedent so destructive of both. I caught a
glimpse of hope glancing about the eyes of my
brother
Downright, who, waiting just long enough to
let the two advocates warm themselves over these
points of law, arose and moved the court for a stay
of execution, on the plea that neither sentence was
legal; that delivered by my Lord Chief-Justice
containing a contradiction, inasmuch as it ordered
the decaudisation to take place between
the hours
of sunrise and sunset
, and also
forthwith:
and that
delivered by Baron Longbeard, on account of its
ordering the body to be given up to dissection,
contrary
to the law, which merely made that provision
in the case of condemned
monikins
, the prisoner at
the bar being entirely of another species.
The court deemed all these objections serious,
but decided on its own incompetency to take
cognizance
of them. It was a question for the twelve
Judges, who were now on the point of assembling,
and to whom they referred the whole affair on
appeal. In the mean time, justice could not be
stayed. The prisoner must be carried out into the
square, and matters must proceed; but, should either
of the points be finally determined in his favor, he
could have the benefit of it, so far as circumstances
would then allow. Hereupon, the court rose, and
the judges, counsel and clerks, repaired in a body
to the hall of the twelve Judges.
CHAPTER VI.
Better and betterMore law and more justiceTails and
heads; the importance of keeping each in its proper
place.
Noah
was incontinently transferred to the place
of execution, where I promised to meet him in time
to receive his parting sigh, curiosity inducing me
first to learn the issue on the appeal. The
Brigadier
told me in confidence, as we went to the other
hall, that the affair was now getting to be one of
great interest; that hitherto it had been mere boys'
play, but it would in future require counsel of great
reading and research to handle the arguments, and
that he flattered himself there was a good occasion
likely to present itself, for him to show what
monikin reason really was.
The whole of the twelve wore tail-cases, and
altogether they presented a formidable array of
intellectual development. As the cause of Noah
was admitted to be one of more than common
urgency
,
after hearing only three or four other short
applications on behalf of the crown, whose rights
always have precedence on such occasions, the
Attorney-General of the King was desired to open
his case.
The learned counsel spoke, in anticipation, to the
objections of both his adversaries, beginning with
those of my brother Downright.
Forthwith
, he
contended
,
might be at any period of the twenty-four
hours, according to the actual time of using the
term. Thus,
forthwith
of a morning, would mean
in the morning;
forthwith
at noon, would mean at
noon; and so on to the close of the legal day.
Moreover
,
in a legal signification,
forthwith
must mean
between sunrise and sunset, the statute commanding
that all executions shall take place by the light of
the sun, and consequently the two terms ratified
and confirmed each other, instead of conveying a
contradiction, or of neutralizing each other, as would
most probably be contended by the opposite counsel.
To all this my brother Downright, as is usual on
such occasions, objected pretty much the converse.
He maintained that
all
light proceeded from the
sun; and that the statute, therefore, could only
mean that there should be no executions during
eclipses, a period when the whole monikin race
ought to be occupied in adoration.
Forthwith
,
moreover
,
did not necessarily mean
forthwith
, for
forthwith
meant immediately; and between sunrise
and sunset meant between sunrise and sunset;
which might be immediately, or might not.
On this point the twelve Judges decided, firstly,
that
forthwith
did not mean
forthwith;
secondly,
that forthwith did mean forthwith; thirdly, that
forthwith
had two legal meanings; fourthly, that it was
illegal to apply one of these legal meanings to a
wrong legal purpose; and, fifthly, that the objection
was of no avail, as respected the case of No. 1,
sea-water-color
.
Ordered, therefore, that the criminal
lose his tail
forthwith
.
The objection to the other sentence met with
no better fate. Men and monikins did not differ
more than some men differed from other men, or
some monikins differed from other monikins.
Ordered
,
that the sentence be confirmed with costs.
I thought this decision the soundest of the two; for
I had often had occasion to observe, that there
were very startling points of resemblance between
monkeys and our own species.
The contest now commenced between the two
Attorneys-General in earnest; and, as the point at
issue was a question of mere rank, it excited a
livelyI may say an engrossinginterest in all the
hearers. It was settled, however, after a vigorous
discussion, in favor of the King, whose royal
dignity
the twelve Judges were unanimously of opinion
was entitled to precedency over that of the Queen.
To my great surprise, my brother Downright
volunteered
an argument on this intricate point, making
an exceedingly clever speech in favor of the King's
dignity, as was admitted by every one who heard
it. It rested chiefly on the point that the ashes of
the tail were, by the sentence, to be thrown into
the culprit's face. It is true this might be done
physically after decapitation, but it could not be
done morally. This part of the punishment was
designed for a moral effect; and to produce that
effect
,
consciousness and shame were both necessary.
Therefore, the moral act of throwing the ashes into
the face of the criminal could only be done while
he was living, and capable of being ashamed.
Meditation, Chief-Justice, delivered the opinion
of the bench. It contained the usual amount of
legal ingenuity and logic, was esteemed as very
eloquent in that part which touched on the sacred
and inviolable character of the royal prerogatives,
(
prerogativ
, as he termed them,) and was so
lucid in pointing out the general inferiority of the
Queen-consort, that I felt happy her Majesty was
not present to hear herself and sex undervalued.
As might have been expected, it allowed great
weight to the distinction taken by the Brigadier.
The decision was in the following words, viz.
Rex et Regina versus No. 1, sea-water-color:
Ordered
,
that the officers of justice shall proceed
forthwith
to decaudisate the defendant before they
decapitate
him; provided he has not been forthwith
decapitated before he can be decaudisated.
The moment this mandamus was put into the
hands of the proper officer, Brigadier Downright
caught me by the knee, and led me out of the hall
of justice, as if both our lives depended on our
expedition
.
I was about to reproach him for having
volunteered to aid the King's Attorney-General,
when, seizing me by the root of the tail, for the
want of a button-hole, he said, with evident
satisfaction
,
Affairs go on swimmingly, my dear Sir John!
I do not remember to have been employed, for some
years, in a more interesting litigation. Now this
cause, which, no doubt, you think is drawing to a
close, has just reached its pivot, or turning point;
and I see every prospect of extricating our client
with great credit to myself.
How! my brother Downright! I interrupted;
the accused is finally sentenced, if not actually
executed!
Not so fast, my good Sir Johnnot so fast, by
any means. Nothing is final in law, while there is
a farthing to meet the costs, or the criminal can
yet gasp. I hold our case to be in an excellent
way; much better than I have deemed it at any
time since the accused was arraigned.
Surprise left me no other power than that which
was necessary to demand an explanation.
All depends on the single fact, dear sir,
continued
my brother Downright, whether the head is
still on the body of the accused or not. Do you
proceed, as fast as possible, to the place of
execution
;
and, should our client still have a head, keep
up his spirits by a proper religious discourse, always
preparing him for the worst, for this is no more
than wisdom; but, the instant his tail is separated
from his body, run hither as fast as you can, to
apprize
me of the fact. I ask but two things of you
speed in coming with the news, and perfect
certainty
that the tail is not yet attached to the rest of
the frame, by even a hair.A hair often turns the
scales of justice!
The case seems desperatewould it not be as
well for me to run down to the palace, at once;
demand an audience of their Majesties, throw
myself
on my knees before the royal pair, and implore
a pardon?
Your project is impracticable, for three sufficient
reasons: firstly, there is not time; secondly, you
would not be admitted without a special
appointment
;
thirdly, there is neither a King nor a Queen.
No King in Leaphigh!
I have said it.
Explain yourself, brother Downright, or I shall
be obliged to refute what you say, by the evidence
of my own senses.
Your senses will prove to be false witnesses
then. Formerly there
was
a King in Leaphigh;
and one who governed, as well as reigned. But
the nobles and grandees of the country, deeming
it indecent to trouble His Majesty with affairs of
state any longer, took upon themselves all the
trouble
of governing, leaving to the sovereign the sole
duty of reigning. This was done in a way to save
his feelings, under the pretence of setting up a
barrier
to the physical force and abuses of the mass.
After a time, it was found inconvenient and
expensive
to feed and otherwise support the royal family,
and all its members were privately shipped to a
distant region, which had not yet got to be so far
advanced in civilization, as to know how to keep
up a monarchy without a monarch.
And does Leaphigh succeed in effecting this
prodigy?
Wonderfully well. By means of decapitations
and decaudisations enough, even greater exploits
may be performed.
But am I to understand literally, brother
Downright
,
there is no such thing as a monarch in this
country?
Literally.
And the presentations?
Are like these trials, to maintain the monarchy.
And the crimson curtains?
Conceal empty seats.
Why not, then, dispense with so much costly
representation?
In what way could the grandees cry out that
the throne is in danger, if there were no throne?
It is one thing to have no monarch, and another to
have no throne. But all this time our client is in
great jeopardy. Hasten, therefore, and be
particular
to act as I have just instructed you.
I stopped to hear no more, but in a minute was
flying towards the centre of the square. It was easy
enough to perceive the tail of my friend waving
Vol. II. 9
over the crowd; but grief and apprehension had
already rendered his countenance so rueful, that, at
the first glance, I did not recognize his head. He
was, however, still in the body; for, luckily for
himself, and more especially for the success of his
principal counsel, the gravity of his crimes had
rendered unusual preparations necessary for the
execution. As the mandate of the court had not
yet arrivedjustice being as prompt in Leaphigh
as her ministers are dilatorytwo blocks were
prepared, and the culprit was about to get down on
his hands and knees between them, just as I forced
my way through the crowd to his side.
Ah! Sir John, this is an awful predicament!
exclaimed the rebuked Noah; a ra'ally awful
situation for a human Christian to have his
enemies
lying athwart both bows and starn!
While there is life there is hope; but it is always
best to be prepared for the worsthe who is thus
prepared never can meet with a disagreeable
surprise
.
Messrs. Executioners,for there were two,
that of the King and that of the Queen, or one at
each end of the unhappy criminalMessrs.
Executioners
,
I pray you to give the culprit a moment
to arrange his thoughts, and to communicate his last
requests in behalf of his distant family and friends!
To this reasonable petition neither of the high
functionaries of the law made any objection,
although
both insisted if they did not forthwith bring
the culprit to the last stages of preparation, they
might lose their places. They did not see, however,
but a man might pause for a moment on the brink
of the grave. It would seem that there had been
a little misunderstanding between the executioners
themselves on the point of precedency, which had
been one cause of the delay, and which had been
disposed of by an arrangement that both should
operate at the same instant. Noah was now brought
down to his hands and knees, moored head and
starn, as that unfeeling blackguard Bob, who was
in the crowd, expressed it, between the two blocks,
his neck lying on one and his tail on the other.
While in this edifying attitude, I was permitted to
address him.
It may be well to bethink you of your soul, my
dear Captain, I said; for, to speak truth, these
axes have a very prompt and sanguinary
appearance
.
I know it, Sir John, I know it; and, not to
mislead
you, I will own that I have been repenting
with all my might, ever since that first vardict.
That affair of the Lord High Admiral, in
particular
,
has given me a good deal of consarn; and I
now humbly ask your pardon for being led away
by such a miserable deception, which is all owing
to that riptyle Dr. Reasono, who I hope will yet
meet with his desarts. I forgive everybody, and
hope everybody will forgive me. As for Miss
Poke, it will be a hard case; for she is altogether
past expecting another consort, and she must be
satisfied to be a relic the rest of her days.
Repentance, repentance, my dear Noah
repentance
is the one thing needful, for a man in your
extremity.
I doI do, Sir John, body and soulI repent,
from the bottom of my heart, ever having come on
this v'y'ge,nay, I don't know but I repent ever
having come outside of Montauk Point. I might,
at this moment, have been a schoolmaster or a
tavern-keeper in Stunin'tun; and they are both
good wholesome births, particularly the last. Lord
love you! Sir John, if repentance would do any
good, I should be pardoned on the spot.
Here Noah caught a glimpse of Bob grinning in
the crowd, and he asked of the executioners, as a
last favor, that they would have the boy brought
near, that he might take an affectionate leave of
him. This reasonable request was complied with,
in despite of poor Bob's struggles; and the
youngster
had quite as good reasons for hearty
repentance
as the culprit himself. Just at this trying
moment, the mandate for the order of the
punishments
arrived, and the officials seriously declared
that the condemned must prepare to meet his fate.
The unflinching manner in which Captain Poke
submitted to the mortal process of decaudisation,
extracted plaudits from, and awakened sympathy
in, every monikin present. Having satisfied myself
that the tail was actually separated from the body,
I ran, as fast as legs could carry me, towards the
hall of the twelve Judges. My brother Downright,
who was impatiently expecting my appearance,
instantly arose and moved the bench to issue a
mandamus for a stay of execution, in the case of
Regina versus Noah Poke, or No. 1,
sea-water-color
.
By the statute of the 2d of Longevity and
Flirtilla, it was enacted, my Lords, put in the
Brigadier
,
that in no case shall a convicted felon suffer
loss of life, or limb, while it can be established that
he is
non compos mentis
. This is also a rule, my
Lords, of common lawbut being common sense
and common monikinity, it has been thought
prudent
to enforce it by an especial enactment. I
presume
Mr. Attorney-General for the Queen will
scarcely dispute the law of the case
Not at all, my Lordsthough I have some
doubts as to the fact. The fact remains to be
established
,
answered the other, taking snuff.
The fact is certain, and will not admit of cavil.
In the case of Rex versus Noah Poke, the court
ordered the punishment of decaudisation to take
precedence
of that of decapitation, in the case of Regina
versus the same. Process had been issued from the
bench to that effect; the culprit has, in consequence,
lost his
cauda
, and with it his reason; a creature
without reason has always been held to be
non
compos mentis
, and by the law of the land is not
liable to the punishments of life or limb.
Your law is plausible, my brother Downright,
observed my Lord Chief Justice, but it remains
for the bench to be put in possession of the facts.
At the next term, you will perhaps be better
prepared
I pray you, my Lord, to remember that this is
a case which will not admit of three months' delay.
We can decide the principle a year hence, as
well as to-day; and we have now sat longer
in
banco
, looking at his watch, than is either usual,
agreeable, or expedient.
But, my Lords, the proof is at hand. Here is
a witness to establish that the
cauda
of Noah Poke,
the defendant of record, has actually been
separated
from his body
Naynaymy brother Downright, a barrister
of your experience must know that the twelve can
only take evidence on affidavit. If you had an
affidavit prepared, we might possibly find time to
hear it, before we adjourn,as it is, the affair must
lie over to another sitting.
I was now in a cold sweat, for I could distinctly
scent the peculiar odor of the burning tail; the
ashes of which being fairly thrown into Noah's face,
there remained no further obstacle to the process of
decapitation,the sentence, it will be remembered,
having kept his countenance on his shoulders,
expressly for that object. My brother Downright,
however, was not a lawyer to be defeated by so
simple a stumbling-block.Seizing a paper that was
already written over in a good legal hand, which
happened to be lying before him, he read it,
without
pause or hesitation, in the following manner:
9 *
Regina
versus
Noah Poke.
Kingdom of Leaphigh, Season of Nuts,
this fourth day of the Moon.
Personally
appeared
before me, Meditation, Lord Chief Justice
of the Court of King's Bench, John Goldencalf,
Baronet, of the Kingdom of Great Britain, who,
being duly sworn, doth depose and say, viz., That
he, the said deponent, was present at, and did
witness
the decaudisation of the defendant in this suit,
and that the tail of the said Noah Poke, or No. 1,
sea-water-color, hath been truly and physically
separated
from his body.And further this deponent
sayeth not. Signature, &c.
Having read, in the most fluent manner, the
foregoing
affidavit, (which existed only in his own brain,)
my brother Downright desired the court to take my
deposition to its truth.
John Goldencalf, Baronet, said the Chief
Justice
,
you have heard what has just been read; do
you swear to its truth?
I do.
Here, the affidavit was signed by both my Lord
Chief Justice and myself, and it was duly put on
file. I afterwards learned that the paper used by
my brother Downright on this memorable occasion,
was no other than the notes which the Chief
Justice
himself had taken on one of the arguments in
the case in question, and, that seeing the names and
title of the cause, besides finding it no easy matter
to read his own writing, that high officer of the
crown had, very naturally, supposed that all was
right. As to the rest of the bench, they were in
too great a hurry to go to dinner, to stop and read
affidavits, and the case was instantly disposed of,
by the following decision.
Regina
versus
Noah Poke, &c. Ordered, That
the culprit be considered
non compos mentis
, and
that he be discharged, on finding security to keep
the peace for the remainder of his natural life.
An officer was instantly dispatched to the great
square with this reprieve, and the court rose. I
delayed a little in order to enter into the necessary
recognizances in behalf of Noah, taking up, at the
same time, the bonds given the previous night, for
his appearance to answer to the indictments. These
forms being duly complied with, my brother
Downright
and myself repaired to the place of execution,
in order to congratulate our client,the former
justly elated with his success, which he assured me
was not a little to the credit of his own education.
We found Noah surprisingly relieved by his
liberation
from the hands of the Philistines; nor was
he at all backward in expressing his satisfaction at
the unexpected turn things had taken. According
to his account of the matter, he did not set a higher
value on his head than another; still, it was
convenient
to have one; had it been necessary to
part with it, he made no doubt he should have
submitted to do so like a man, referring to the
fortitude
with which he had borne the amputation of
his
cauda
, as a proof of his resolution; for his part,
he should take very good care how he accused any
one with having a memory, or any thing else, again,
and he now saw the excellence of those wise
provisions
of the laws, which cut up a criminal in
order to prevent the repetition of his offences; he
did not intend to stay much longer on shore,
believing
he should be less in the way of temptation on
board the Walrus than among the monikins; and,
as for his own people, he was sure of soon
catching
them on board again, for they had now been
off their pork twenty-four hours, and nuts were
but poor grub for fore-mast hands, after all;
philosophers
might say what they pleased about
governments
,
but, in his opinion, the only ra'al tyrant
on 'arth was the belly; he did not remember ever
to have had a struggle with his bellyand he had
a thousandthat the belly didn't get the better;
that it would be awkward to lay down the title of
Lord High Admiral, but it was easier to lay down
that than to lay down his head; that as for a
cauda
,
though it was certainly agreeable to be in the
fashion
,
he could do very well without one, and when
he got back to Stunnin'tun, should the worst come
to the worst, there was a certain saddler in the
place, who could give him as good a fit as the one
he had lost; that Miss Poke would have been
greatly
scandalized, however, had he come home after
decapitation; that it might be well to sail for
Leaplow
,
as soon as convenient, for in that country he
understood bobs were in fashion, and he admitted
that he should not like to cruise about Leaphigh,
for any great length of time, unless he could look
as other people look; for his part, he bore no one
a grudge, and he freely forgave everybody but Bob,
out of whom, the Lord willing, he proposed to have
full satisfaction, before the ship should be
twenty-four
hours at sea, &c. &c. &c.
Such was the general tendency of the remarks
of Captain Poke, as we proceeded towards the port,
where he embarked and went on board the Walrus,
with some eagerness, having learned that our
rear-admirals
and post-captains had, indeed, yielded to the
calls of nature, and had all gone to their duty,
swearing
they would rather be fore-mast Jacks in a
well-victualled
ship, than the King of Leaphigh upon nuts.
The Captain had no sooner entered the boat,
taking his head with him, than I began to make my
acknowledgments to my brother Downright, for the
able manner in which he had defended my fellow
human being; paying, at the same time, some
well-merited
compliments to the ingenious and truly
philosophical
distinctions of the Leaphigh system of
jurisprudence.
Spare your thanks and your commendations, I
beg of you, good Sir John, returned the Brigadier,
as we walked back towards my lodgings. We
did as well as circumstances would allow; though
our whole defence would have been upset, had not
the Chief Justice very luckily been unable to read
his own handwriting. As for the principles and
forms of the monikin law,for in these particulars
Leaplow is very much like Leaphigh,as you have
seen them displayed in these two suits, why, they
are such as we have. I do not pretend that they
are faultless; on the contrary, I could point out
improvements myselfbut we get on with them as
well as we can: no doubt, among men, you have
codes that will better bear examination.
CHAPTER VII.
A neophyte in diplomacydiplomatic introductiona
calculation
a
shipment of Opinionshow to choose an invoice,
with an assortment.
I
now
began seriously to think of sailing for
Leaplow
;
for I confess I was heartily tired of being
thought the governor of his Royal Highness Prince
Bob, and pined to be restored once more to my
proper
place in society. I was the more incited to make
the change, by the representations of the Brigadier,
who assured me that it was sufficient to come
from foreign parts, to be esteemed a nobleman
in Leaplow, and that I need not apprehend in his
country, any of the ill-treatment I had received in
the one in which I now was. After talking over the
matter, therefore, in a familiar way, we determined
to repair at once to the Leaplow legation, in order
to ask for our passports, and to offer, at the same
time, to carry any dispatches that Judge People's
Friend might have prepared for his government,
it being the custom of the Leaplowers to trust to
these God-sends in carrying on their diplomatic
correspondence.
We found the Judge in undress, and a very
different
figure he cut, certainly, from that which he
made when I saw him the previous night at court.
Then he was all
queue;
now, he was all
bob
. He
seemed glad to see us, however, and quite
delighted
when I told him of the intention to sail for
Leaplow, as soon as the wind served. He instantly
asked a passage for himself, with republican
simplicity
.
There was to be another turn of the great and
little wheels, he said, and it was quite important to
himself to be on the spot; for, although every thing
was, beyond all question, managed with perfect
republican propriety, yet, somehow, and yet he did
not know exactly how, but
somehow
, those who are
on the spot always get the best prizes. If I could
give him a passage, therefore, he would esteem it
a great personal favor; and I might depend on
it, the circumstance would be well received by the
party. Although I did not very well understand
what he meant by this party, which was to view the
act so kindly, I very cheerfully told the Judge that the
apartments lately occupied by my Lord Chatterino
and his friends were perfectly at his disposal. I
was then asked when I intended to sail; and the
answer was, the instant the wind hauled, so we
could lay out of the harbour. It might be within
half an hour. Hereupon Judge People's Friend
begged I would have the goodness to wait until he
could hunt up a charg d'affaires. His instructions
were most peremptory never to leave the legation
without a charg d'affaires; but he would just brush
his bob, and run into the street, and look up one in
five minutes, if I would promise to wait so long. It
would have been unkind to refuse so trifling a favor,
and the promise was given. The Judge must have
run as fast as his legs would carry him; for, in
about ten minutes, he was back again, with a
diplomatic
recruit. He told me his heart had
misgiven
him sadly. The three first to whom he
offered the place had plumply refused it, and, indeed,
he did not know but he should have a quarrel or
two on his hands; but, at last, he had luckily found
one who could get nothing else to do, and he pinned
him on the spot.
So far every thing had gone on swimmingly; but
the new charg had, most unfortunately, a very
long
cauda
, a fashion that was inexorably proscribed
by the Leaplow usages, except in cases where the
representative went to courtfor it seems the
Leaplow
political ethics, like your country buck, has
two dresses; one for every-day wear, and one for
Sundays. The Judge intimated to his intended
substitute
,
that it was absolutely indispensable he should
submit to an amputation, or he could not possibly
confer
the appointment,
queues
being proscribed at
home by both public opinions, the horizontal and
the perpendicular. To this the candidate objected
that he very well knew the Leaplow usages on this
head, but that he had seen his Excellency himself
going to court with a singularly apparent brush;
and he had supposed from that, and from sundry
other little occurrences he did not care to
particularize
,
that the Leaplowers were not so bigoted
in their notions, but they could act on the principle
of doing at Rome as is done by the Romans. To
this the Judge replied, that this principle was
certainly
recognized in all things that were agreeable;
and that he knew, from experience, how hard it
was to go in a bob, when all around him went in
caud
; but that tails were essentially
anti-republican
,
and as such had been formally voted down in
Leaplow, where even the Great Sachem did not
dare to wear one, let him long for it as much as he
would; and if it were known that a public charg
offended in this particular, although he might be
momentarily protected by one of the public opinions,
the matter would certainly be taken up by the
opposition
public opinion, and then the people might
order a new turn of the little wheel, which heaven
it knew!occurred now a great deal oftener than
was either profitable or convenient.
Hereupon the candidate deliberately undid the
fastenings and removed the
queue
, showing, to our
admiration, that it was false, and that he was, after
all, neither more nor less than a Leaplower in
masquerade
;
which, by the way, I afterwards learned,
was very apt to be the case with a great many of
that eminently original people, when they got
without
the limits of their own beloved land. Judge
People's Friend was now perfectly delighted. He
told us this was exactly what he could most have
wished for. Here is a bob, said he, for the
horizontals and perpendiculars, and there is a
capital
ready-made
cauda
for his Majesty and his
Majesty's
first-cousin! A Leaphighized Leaplower,
more especially if there be a dash of caricature
about him, is the very thing in our diplomacy.
Finding matters so much to his mind, the Judge
made out the letter of appointment on the spot, and
then proceeded to give his substitute the usual
instructions
.
You are on all occasions, he said, to take the
utmost care not to offend the court of Leaphigh, or
the meanest of the courtiers, by advancing any of
our peculiar opinions, all of which, beyond dispute,
you have at your finger-ends; on this score, you
are to be so particular, that you may even, in your
own person,
pro tempore
, abandon republicanism
yea, sacred republicanism itself!knowing that it
can easily be resumed on your return home again;
you are to remember there is nothing so
undiplomatic
,
or even vulgar, as to have an opinion on any
subject, unless it should be the opinion of the
persons
you may happen to be in company with; and,
as we have the reputation of possessing that quality
in an eminent degree, everywhere but at home,
take especial heed to eschew vulgarityif you can;
you will have the greatest care, also, to wear the
shortest bob in all your private, and the longest tail
in all your public, relations, this being one of the
most important of the celebrated checks and
balances
of our government; our institutions being
expressly formed by the mass, for the particular
benefit of all, you will be excessively careful not to
let the claims of any one citizen, or even any set
of citizens, interfere with that harmony which it is
so necessary, for the purposes of trade, to maintain
with all foreign courts; which courts being
accustomed
themselves to consider their subjects as
cattle
,
to be worked in the traces of the state, are
singulary
restive whenever they hear of any individual
being made of so much importance. Should any
Leaplower become troublesome on this score, give
him a bad name at once; and in order to effect that
object with your own single-minded and right-loving
countrymen, swear that he is a disorganizer, and,
my life on it, both public opinions at home will
sustain
you; for there is nothing on which our public
opinions agree so well as the absolute deference
which they pay to foreign public opinions,and
this the more especially, in all matters that are likely
to affect profits, by deranging commerce. You will,
above all things, make it a point to be in constant
Vol. II. 10
relations with some of the readiest
paragraph-writers
of the newspapers, in order to see that facts
are properly stated at home. I would advise you
to look out some foreigner who has never seen
Leaplow, for this employment; one that is also
paid to write for the journals of Leapup, or
Leapdown
,
or some other foreign country; by which
means you will be sure to get an impartial agent,
or one who can state things in your own way, who
is already half paid for his services, and who will
not be likely to make blunders by meddling with
distinctive thought. When a person of this
character
is found, let him drop a line now and then in
favor of your own sagacity and patriotism; and if
he should say a pleasant thing occasionally about
me, it will do no harm, but may help the little wheel
to turn more readily. In order to conceal his
origin
,
let your paragraph-agent use the word
our
freely; the use of this word, as you know, being
the only qualification of citizenship in Leaplow.
Let him begin to spell the word O-U-R, and then
proceed to pronounce it, and be careful that he
does not spell it H-O-U-R, which might betray
his origin. Above all things, you will be patriotic
and republican, avoiding the least vindication of
your country and its institutions, and satisfying
yourself with saying that the latter are, at least,
well suited to the former; if you should say this in
a way to leave the impression on your hearers,
that you think the former fitted for nothing else, it
will be particularly agreeable and thoroughly
republican
,
and most eminently modest and
praiseworthy
.
You will find the diplomatic agents of all
other states, sensitive on the point of their peculiar
political usages, and prompt to defend them; but
this is a weakness you will rigidly abstain from
imitating, for our polity being exclusively based on
reason, you are to show a dignified confidence in
the potency of that fundamental principle, nor in any
way lessen the high character that reason already
enjoys, by giving any one cause to suspect you think
reason is not fully able to take care of itself. With
these leading hints, and your own natural
tendencies
,
which I am glad to see are eminently fitted for
the great objects of diplomacy, being ductile,
imitative
,
yielding, calculating, and, above all, of a
foreign disposition, I think you will be able to get
on very cleverly. Cultivate, above all things, your
foreign dispositions, for you are now on foreign
duty, and your country reposes on your shoulders
and eminent talents, the whole burthen of its foreign
interests in this part of the world.
Here the Judge closed his address, which was
oral, apparently well satisfied with himself and with
his raw-hand in diplomacy. He then said,
That he would now go to court to present his
substitute, and to take leave himself; after which he
would return as fast as possible, and detain us no
longer than was necessary to put his
cauda
in pepper,
to protect it against the moths; for heaven knew
what prize he might draw in the next turn of the
little wheel!
We promised to meet him at the port, where a
messenger just then informed us, Captain Poke had
landed, and was anxiously waiting our appearance.
With this understanding we separated; the Judge
undertaking to redeem all our promises paid in at
the tavern, by giving his own in their stead.
The Brigadier and myself found Noah and the
cook bargaining for some private adventures, with
a Leaphigh broker or two, who, finding that the ship
was about to sail in ballast, were recommending
their wares to the notice of these two worthies.
It would be a ra'al sin, Sir John, commenced
the Captain, to neglect an occasion like this to
turn a penny. The ship could carry ten thousand
immigrunts, and they say there are millions of them
going over to Leaplow; or it might stow half the
goods in Aggregation. I'm resolved, at any rate,
to use my cabin privilege; and I would advise you,
as owner, to look out for suthin' to pay
portcharges
with, to say the least.
The idea is not a bad one, friend Poke; but, as
we are ignorant of the state of the market on the
other side, it might be well to consult some
inhabitant
of the country about the choice of articles.
Here is the Brigadier Downright, whom I have
found to be a monikin of experience and judgment,
and if you please, we will first hear what he has to
say about it.
I dabble very little in merchandise, returned
the Brigadier; but, as a general principle, I should
say that no article of Leaphigh manufacture would
command so certain a market in Leaplow as
Opinions
.
Have you any of these opinions for sale? I
inquired of the broker.
Plenty of them, sir, and of all qualitiesfrom
the very lowest to the very 'ighest pricesthose
that may be had for next to nothing, to those that
we think a great deal of ourselves. We always
keeps them ready packed for exportation, and send
wast invoices of them, hannually, to Leaplow in
particular
.
Opinions are harticles that help to sell each
other; and a ship of the tonnage of yours might
stow enough, provided they were properly
assorted
,
to carry all before them for the season.
Expressing a wish to see the packages, we were
immediately led into an adjoining warehouse, where,
sure enough, there were goodly lots of the
manufactures
in question. I passed along the shelves,
reading
the inscriptions of the different packages.
Pointing
to several bundles that had
Opinions on Free
Trade
written on their labels, I asked the
Brigadier
what he thought of that article.
Why, they would have done better, a year or
two since, when we were settling a new tariff; but
I should think there would be less demand for them
now.
You are quite right, sir, added the broker;
we
did
send large invoices of them to Leaplow
formerly, and they were all eagerly bought up,
the moment they arrived. A great many were
dyed over again, and sold as of 'ome manufacture.
Most of these harticles are now shipped for Leapup,
with whom we have negotiations that give them a
certain value.
`
Opinions on Democracy, and on the polity of
governments in general;
' I should think these would
be of no use in Leaplow?
Why, sir, they goes pretty much hover the whole
world. We sell powers on 'em on our own
continent
,
near by, and a great many do go even to
Leaplow; though what they does with 'em there, I
never could say, seeing they are all government
monikins in that queer country.
An inquiring look extorted a clearer answer
from the Brigadier:
To admit the fact, we have a class among us
who buy up these articles with some eagerness. I
can only account for it, by supposing they think
differing in their tastes from the mass, makes them
more enlightened and peculiar.
I'll take them all. An article that catches these
propensities is sure of a sale. `
Opinions on Events;
'
what can possibly be done with these?
That depends a little on their classification,
returned the Brigadier. If they relate to
Leaplow
10*
events, while they have a certain value, they
cannot be termed of current value; but if they refer
to the events of all the rest of the earth, take them,
for heaven's sake! for we trust altogether to this
market for our supplies.
On this hint I ordered the whole lot, trusting to
dispose of the least fashionable by aid of those that
were more in vogue.
`
Opinions on Domestic Literature
.'
You may buy all he has; we use no other.
`
Opinions on Continental Literature
.'
Why, we know little about the goods
themselves
but
I think a selection might answer.
I ordered the bale cut in two, and took one half,
at a venture.
`
Opinions on Leaplow Literature
, from No. 1, up
to No. 100.'
Ah! it is proper I should explain, put in the
broker, that we has two varieties of them 'ere
harticles. One is the true harticle, as is got up by
our great wits and philosophers, they says, on the
most approved models; but the other is nothing but
a sham harticle that is really manufactured in
Leaplow, and is sent out here to get our stamp.
That's allI never deceives a customerboth sell
well, I hear, on the other side, however.
I looked again at the Brigadier, who quietly
nodding assent, I took the whole hundred bales.
`
Opinions of the Institutions of Leaphigh
.'
Why, them 'ere is assorted, being of all sizes,
forms and colors. They came coastwise, and are
chiefly for domestic consumption; though I have
known 'em sent to Leaplow, with success.
The consumers of this article among us,
observed
the Brigadier, are very select, and rarely
take any but of the very best quality. But then
they are usually so well stocked, that I question if a
new importation would pay freight. Indeed, our
consumers cling very generally to the old fashions
in this article, not even admitting the changes
produced
by time. There was an old manufacturer
called Whiterock, who has a sort of Barlow-knife
reputation among us, and it is not easy to get
another
article to compete with his. Unless they are
very antiquated, I would have nothing to do with
them.
Yes, this is all true, sir. We still sends to
Leaplow
quantities of that 'ere manufacture; and the
more hantiquated the harticle, the better it sells;
but then the new fashions has a most wonderful run
at 'ome.
I'll stick to the real Barlow, through thick or
thin. Hunt me up a bale of his notions; let them
be as old as the flood. What have we here?
`
Opinions on the Institutions of Leaplow
.'
Take them, said the Brigadier, promptly.
This 'ere gentleman has an hidear of the state
of his own market, added the broker, giggling.
Wast lots of these things go across yearlyand I
don't find that any on 'em ever comes back.
`
Opinions on the State of Manners and Society in
Leaplow
.'
I believe I'll take an interest in that article
myself
,
Sir John, if you can give me a ton or two
between decks. Have you many of this
manufacture
?
Lots on 'em, sirand they
do
sell so!That
'ere are a good harticle both at 'ome and abroad.
My eye! how they does go off in Leaplow!
This appears to be also your expectation,
Brigadier
,
by your readiness to take an interest?
To speak the truth, nothing sells better in our
beloved country.
Permit me to remark that I find your readiness
to purchase this and the last article, a little singular.
If I have rightly comprehended our previous
conversations
,
you Leaplowers profess to have
improved
not only on the ancient principles of polity,
but on the social condition, generally.
We will talk of this during the passage
homeward
,
Sir John Goldencalf; but, by your leave, I
will take a share in the investment in `Opinions on
the State of Society and Manners in Leaplow,'
especially
if they treat at large on the deformities of
the government, while they allow us to be genteel.
This is the true notchsome of these goods have
been condemned because the manufacturers hadn't
sufficient skill in dyeing.
You shall have a share, Brigadier. Harkee,
Mr. Broker; I take it these said opinions come from
some very well known and approved manufactory?
All sorts, sir. Some good, and some good for
nothingeverything sells, however. I never was
in Leaplow, but we says over here, that the
Leaplowers
eat, and drink, and sleep on our opinions.
Lord, sir, it would really do your heart good to see
the stuff, in these harticles, that they does take from
us without higgling!
I presume, Brigadier, that you use them as an
amusementas a means to pass a pleasant hour,
of an eveninga sort of moral segar?
No, sir, put in the broker, they doesn't smoke
'em, my word on't, or they wouldn't buy 'em in
such lots!
I now thought enough had been laid in on my
own account, and I turned to see what the Captain
was about. He was higgling for a bale marked
Opinions on the lost condition of the monikin soul.
A little curious to know why he had made this
selection
,
I led him aside, and frankly put the question.
Why, to own the truth, Sir John, he said,
religion is an article that sells in every market, in
some shape or other. Now, we are all in the dark
about the Leaplow tastes and usages, for I always
suspect a native of the country to which I am bound,
on such a p'int; and if the things should n't sell
there, they'll at least do at Stunin'tun. Miss Poke
alone would use up what there is in that there bale,
in a twelvemonth. To give the woman her due,
she's a desperate consumer of snuff and religion.
We had now pretty effectually cleared the shelves,
and the cook, who had come ashore to dispose of
his slush, had not yet been able to get anything.
Here is a small bale as come
from
Leaplow,
and a pinched little thing it is, said the broker,
laughing; it don't take at all, here, and it might
do to go 'ome againat any rate you will get the
drawback. It is filled with `Distinctive Opinions
of the Republic of Leaplow.' The cook looked at
the Brigadier, who appeared to think the
speculation
doubtful. Still it was Hobson's choice; and,
after a good deal of grumbling, the doctor, as Noah
always called his cook, consented to take the
harticle
,
at half the prime cost.
Judge People's Friend now came trotting down
to the port, thoroughly
en rpublicain
, when we
immediately embarked, and in half an hour, Bob
was kicked to Noah's heart's content, and the
Walrus was fairly under way for Leaplow.
CHAPTER VIII.
Political boundariesPolitical rightsPolitical selections,
and political disquisitions; with political results.
The
aquatic mile-stones of the monikin seas have
been already mentioned; but I believe I omitted
to say, that there was a line of demarcation drawn
in the water, by means of a similar invention, to
point out the limits of the jurisdiction of each state.
Thus, all within these water-marks, was under the
laws of Leaphigh; all between them and those of
some other country, was the high seas; and all
within those of the other country, Leaplow for
instance, was under the exclusive jurisdiction of
that other country.
With a favorable wind, the Walrus could run
to the water-marks in about half a day; from
thence to the water-marks of Leaplow was two
days' sail, and another half day was necessary to
reach our haven. As we drew near the legal
frontiers of Leaphigh, several small fast-sailing
schooners were seen hovering just without the
jurisdiction of the King, quite evidently waiting our
approach. One boarded us, just as the outer end
of the spanker-boom got clear of the Leaphigh
sovereignty. Judge People's Friend rushed to the
side of the ship, and before the crew of the boat
could get on deck, he had ascertained that the
usual number of prizes had been put into the little
wheel.
A monikin in a bob of a most pronounced
character
,
or which appeared to have been subjected
to the second amputation, being what is called in
Leaplow a bob-upon-bob, now approached, and
inquired if there were any emigrants on board.
He was made acquainted with our characters and
objects. When he understood that our stay would
most likely be short, he was evidently a little
disappointed
.
Perhaps, gentlemen, he added, you may
still remain long enough to make naturalization
desirable?
It is always agreeable to be at home in foreign
countriesbut are there no legal objections?
I see none, siryou have no tails, I believe?
None but what are in our trunks. I did not
know, however, but the circumstance of our being
of a different species might throw some obstacles
in the way.
None in the world, sir. We act on principles
much too liberal for so narrow an objection. You
are but little acquainted with the institutions and
policy of our beloved and most happy country, I
see, sir. This is not Leaphigh, nor Leapup, nor
Leapdown, nor Leapover, nor Leapthrough, nor
Leapunder; but good old, hearty, liberal, free and
independent, most beloved, happy, and prosperous
beyond example, Leaplow. Species is of no account
under our system. We would as soon naturalize
one animal as another, provided it be a republican
animal. I see no deficiency about any of you. All
we ask is certain general principles. You go on
two legs
So do turkeys, sir.
Very truebut you have no feathers.
Neither has a donkey.
All very right, gentlemenyou do not bray,
however.
I will not answer for that, put in the captain,
sending his leg forward in a straight line, in a way
to raise an outcry in Bob, that almost upset the
Leaplower's proposition.
At all events, gentlemen, he observed, there
is a test that will put the matter at rest, at once.
He then desired us, in turn, to pronounce the
word our
Our
liberties
our
country
our
firesides
our
altars. Whoever expressed
a wish to be naturalized, and could use this word
in the proper manner, and in the proper place, was
entitled to be a citizen. We all did very well but
the second mate, who, being a Herefordshire man,
could not, for the life of him, get any nearer to the
Doric, in the latter shibboleth, than our halters.
Now, it would seem, that, in carrying out a great
philanthropic principle in Leaplow, halters had
been proscribed; for, whenever a rogue did any
thing amiss, it had been discovered that, instead
of punishing him for the offence, the true way to
remedy the evil was to punish the society against
which he had offended. By this ingenious turn,
society was naturally made to look out sharp how
it permitted any one to offend it. This excellent
idea is like that of certain Dutchmen, who, when
they cut themselves with an axe, always apply salve
and lint to the cruel steel, and leave the wound to
heal as fast as possible.
To return to our examination: we all passed but
the second mate, who hung in his halter, and was
pronounced to be incorrigible. Certificates of
naturalization were delivered on the spot, the fees
were paid, and the schooner left us.
That night it blew a gale, and we had no more
visiters until the following morning. As the sun
rose, however, we fell in with three schooners,
under the Leaplow flag, all of which seemed bound
on errands of life or death. The first that reached
us sent a boat on board, and a committee of six
bob-upon-bobs hurried up our side, and lost no
time in introducing themselves. I shall give their
own account of their business and characters.
It would seem that they were what is called a
nominating committee of the Horizontals, for
the city of Bivouac, the port to which we were
bound, where an election was about to take place
for members of the great National Council.
Bivouac
was entitled to send seven members; and
having nominated themselves, the committee were
now in quest of a seventh candidate to fill the
vacancy
.
In order to secure the naturalized interests,
it had been determined to select as new a comer
as possible. This would also be maintaining the
principle of liberality, in the abstract. For this
reason they had been cruising for a week, as near
as the law would allow to the Leaphigh
boundaries
,
and they were now ready to take any one
who would serve.
To this proposition I again objected the
difference
of species. Here they all fairly laughed in
my face, Brigadier Downright included, giving me
very distinctly to understand that they thought I had
very contracted notions on matters and things, to
suppose so trifling an obstacle could disturb the
harmony and unity of a Horizontal vote. They
went for a principle, and the devil himself could
not make them swerve from the pursuit of so
sacred an object.
I then candidly admitted that nature had not
fitted me, as admirably as it had fitted my friend
the Judge, for the throwing of summersets; and I
feared that when the order was given to go to the
right about, I might be found no better than a
bungler. This staggered them a little; and I
perceived
that they looked at each other, in doubt.
Vol. II. 11
But you can, at least, turn round suddenly, at
need? one of them asked, after a pause.
Certainly, sir, I answered, giving ocular
evidence
that I was no idle boaster, making a
complete
gyration on my heels, in very good time.
Very well!admirably well! they all cried
in a breath. The great political essential is to be
able to perform the evolutions in their essence,
the facility with which they are performed being
no more than a personal merit.
But, gentlemen, I know little more of your
constitution and laws, than I have learned in a
few broken discussions with my fellow-travellers.
This is a matter of no moment, sir. Our
constitution
,
unlike that of Leaphigh, is written down,
and he who runs can read; and then we have a
political fugleman in the house, who saves an
immense
deal of unnecessary study and reflection to
the members. All you will have to do, will be to
watch his movements; and, my life on it, you will
go as well through the manual exercise as the
oldest member there.
How, sir, do all the members take the man
uvres
from this fugleman?
All the Horizontals, sirthe Perpendiculars
having a fugleman of their own.
Well, gentlemen, I conceive this to be an affair
in which I am no judge, and I put myself entirely
in the hands of my friends.
This answer met with much commendation, and
manifested, as they all protested, great political
capabilities; the statesman who submitted all to
his friends never failing to rise to eminence in
Leaplow. The committee took my name in
writing
,
and hastened back to their schooner, in order
to get into port to promulgate the nomination.
These persons were hardly off the deck, before
another party came up the opposite side of the
ship. They announced themselves to be a
nominating
committee of the Perpendiculars, on exactly
the same errand as their opponents. They, too,
wished to propitiate the foreign interests, and were
in search of a proper candidate. Captain Poke
had been an attentive listener to all that occurred
during the circumstances that preceded my
nomination
;
and he now stepped promptly forward,
and declared his readiness to serve. As there was
quite as little squeamishness on one side as on the
other, and the Perpendicular committee, as it
owned itself, was greatly pressed for time, the
Horizontals having the start of them, the affair
was arranged in five minutes, and the strangers
departed with the name of NOAH POKE, THE
TRIED PATRIOT, THE PROFOUND
JURIST
,
AND THE HONEST MONIKIN,
handsomely
placarded on a large boardall but the
name having been carefully prepared in advance.
When the committee was fairly out of the ship,
Noah took me aside, and made his apologies for
opposing me in this important election. His
reasons
were numerous and ingenious, and, as usual,
a little discursive. They might be summed up as
follows: He never had sat in a parliament, and he
was curious to know how it would feel; it would
increase the respect of the ship's company, to find
their commander of so much account in a strange
port; he had had some experience at Stunin'tun
by reading the newspapers, and he didn't doubt
of his abilities at all, a circumstance that rarely
failed of making a good legislator; the
Congressman
in his part of the country was some such man
as himself, and what was good for the goose was
good for the gander; he knew Miss Poke would
be pleased to hear he had been chosen; he
wondered
if he should be called the Honorable Noah
Poke, and whether he should receive eight dollars
a day, and mileage from the spot where the ship
then was; the Perpendiculars might count on him,
for his word was as good as his bond; as for the
constitution, he had got on under the constitution
at home, and he believed a man who could do
that might get on under any constitution; he didn't
intend to say a great deal in parliament, but what
he did say he hoped might be recorded for the use
of his children; together with a great deal more
of the same sort of argumentation and apology.
The third schooner now brought us to. This
vessel sent another committee, who announced
themselves to be the representatives of a party
that was termed the Tangents. They were not
numerous, but sufficiently so to hold the balance
whenever the Horizontals and the Perpendiculars
crossed each other directly at right angles, as was
the case at present; and they had now determined
to run a single candidate of their own. They, too,
wished to fortify themselves by the foreign
interest
,
as was natural, and had come out in quest
of a proper person. I suggested the first mate; but
against this Noah protested, declaring that come
what would, the ship must on no account be
deserted
.
Time pressed; and, while the Captain and
the subordinate were hotly disputing the propriety
of permitting the latter to serve, Bob, who had
already tasted the sweets of political importance,
in his assumed character of Prince-Royal, stepped
slyly up to the committee, and gave in his name.
Noah was too much occupied to discover this
well-managed movement; and by the time he had
sworn to throw the mate overboard if he did not
instantly relinquish all ambitious projects of this
nature, he found that the Tangents were off.
Supposing
they had gone to some other vessel, the
Captain allowed himself to be soothed, and all
went on smoothly again.
From this time until we anchored in the bay
of Bivouac, the tranquillity and discipline of the
Walrus were undisturbed. I improved the
occasion
to study the constitution of Leaplow, of which
the Judge had a copy, and to glean such
information
from my companions, as I believed might be
useful in my future career. I thought how
pleasant
it would be for a foreigner to teach the
Leaplowers
their own laws, and to explain to them the
application of their own principles! Little,
however
,
was to be got from the Judge, who was just
then too much occupied with some calculations
concerning the chances of the little wheel, with
which he had been furnished by a leading man of
one of the nominating committees.
I now questioned the Brigadier touching that
peculiar usage of his country which rendered
Leaphigh opinions concerning the Leaplow
institutions
,
society and manners, of so much value in
the market of the latter. To this I got but an
indifferent
answer, except it was to say, that his
countrymen having cleared the interests connected
with the subjects from the rubbish of time, and set
everything at work, on the philosophical basis of
reason and common sense, were exceedingly
desirous
of knowing what other people thought of the
success of the experiment.
I expect to see a nation of sages, I can assure
you, Brigadier; one in which even the very children
are profoundly instructed in the great truths of
your system; and, as to the monikinas, I am not
without dread of bringing my theoretical ignorance
in collision with their great practical knowledge
of the principles of your government.
11 *
They are early fed on political pap.
No doubt, sir, no doubt. How different must
they be from the females of other countries!
Deeply imbued with the great distinctive
principles
of your system, devoted to the education of
their children in the same sublime truths, and
indefatigable
in their discrimination, among the meanest
of their households!
Hum!
Now, sir, even in England, a country which
I trust is not the most debased on earth, you will
find women, beautiful, intellectual, accomplished
and patriotic, who limit their knowledge of these
fundamental points to a zeal for a
clique
, and the
whole of whose eloquence on great national
questions
is bounded by a few heartfelt wishes for the
downfall of their opponents.
It is very much so at Stunin'tun, too, if truth must
be spoken, remarked Noah, who had been a listener.
Who, instead of instructing the young suckers
that cling to their sides in just notions of general,
social distinctions, nurture their young antipathies
with pettish philippics against some luckless chief
of the adverse party.
'T is pretty much the same at Stunin'tun, as I
live!
Who rarely study the great lessons of history
in order to point out to the future statesmen and
heroes of the empire the beacons of crime, the
incentives for public virtue, or the charters of their
liberties; but who are indefatigable in echoing
the cry of the hour, however false or vulgar, and
who humanize their attentive offspring by softly
expressed wishes that Mr. Canning, or some other
frustrator of the designs of their friends, `were
fairly hanged!'
Stunin'tun, all over!
Beings that are angels in formsoft, gentle,
refined, and tearful as the evening with its dews,
when there is a question of humanity or suffering;
but who seem strangely transformed into
she-tigers
,
whenever any but those of whom they can
approve attain to power; and who, instead of
entwining
their soft arms around their husbands and
brothers, to restrain them from the hot strife of
opinions, cheer them on by their encouragement,
and throw dirt with the volubility and wit of
fish-women
.
Miss Poke to the back-bone!
In short, sir, I expect to see an entirely
different
state of things at Leaplow. There, when
a political adversary is bespattered with mud,
your gentle monikinas, doubtless, appease anger
by the mild soothings of philosophy, tempering
zeal by wisdom, and regulating error by apt and
unanswerable quotations from that great charter
which is based on the eternal and immutable
principles
of right.
Well, Sir John, if you speak in this
elocutionary
manner in the house, cried the delighted
Noah, I shall be shy of answering! I doubt, now,
if the Brigadier himself could repeat all you have
just said.
I have forgotten to inquire, Mr. Downright, a
little about your Leaplow constituency. The
suffrage
is, beyond question, confined to those
members
of society who possess a `social stake.'
Certainly, Sir John. They who live and
breathe.
Surely none vote but those who possess the
money, and houses, and lands of the country?
Sir, you are altogether in error; all vote who
possess ears, and eyes, and noses, and bobs, and
lives, and hopes, and wishes, and feelings, and
wants. Wants we conceive to be a much truer
test of political fidelity, than possessions.
This is novel doctrine, indeed! but it is in
direct hostility to the social-stake system.
You were never more right, Sir John, as
respects your own theory, or never more wrong
as respects the truth. In Leaplow we contend
and contend justlythat there is no broader or
bolder fallacy than to say that a representation of
mere effects, whether in houses, lands,
merchandise
,
or money, is a security for a good
government
.
Property is affected by measures; and the
more a monikin has, the greater is the bribe to
induce him to consult his own interests, although
it should be at the expense of those of everybody
else.
But, sir, the interest of the community is
composed
of the aggregate of these interests.
Your pardon, Sir John; nothing is composed
of it, but the aggregate of the interests of a class.
If your government is instituted for their benefit
only, your social-stake system is all well enough;
but if the object be the general good, you have no
choice but to trust its custody to the general
keeping
.
Let us suppose two mensince you happen
to be a man, and not a monikinlet us suppose
two men perfectly equal in morals, intelligence,
public virtue and patriotism, one of whom shall be
rich and the other shall have nothing. A crisis
arrives in the affairs of their common country,
and both are called upon to exercise their
franchise
,
on a questionas almost all great questions
mustthat unavoidably will have some influence
on property generally. Which would give the
most impartial votehe who, of necessity, must
be swayed by his personal interest, or he who has
no inducement of the sort to go astray?
Certainly he who has nothing to influence
him to go wrong.But the question is not fairly
put
Your pardon, Sir John,it is put fairly as an
abstract question, and one that is to prove a
principle
.
I am glad to hear you say that a man
would be apt to decide in this manner; for it shows
his identity with a monikin. We hold that all
of us are apt to think most of ourselves on such
occasions.
My dear Brigadier, do not mistake sophistry
for reason. Surely, if power belonged only to the
poor,and the poor, or the comparatively poor,
always compose the mass,they would exercise
it in a way to strip the rich of their possessions.
We think not, in Leaplow. Cases might exist,
in which such a state of things would occur under
a reaction; but reactions imply abuses, and are
not to be quoted to maintain a principle. He who
was drunk yesterday, may need an unnatural
stimulus
to-day; while he who is uniformly
temperate
preserves his proper tone of body without
recourse to a remedy so dangerous. Such an
experiment
,
under a strong provocation, might
possibly
be made; but it could scarcely be made twice
among any people, and not even once among a
people that submits in season to a just division of
its authority, since it is obviously destructive of a
leading principle of civilization. According to our
monikin histories, all the attacks upon property
have been produced by property's grasping at
more than fairly belongs to its immunities. If you
make political power a concomitant of property,
both may go together, certainly; but if kept
separate
,
the danger to the latter will never exceed the
danger in which it is put daily by the arts of the
money-getters, who are, in truth, the greatest foes
of property, as it belongs to others.
I remembered Sir Joseph Job, and could not
but admit that the Brigadier had, at least, some
truth on his side.
But do you deny that the sentiment of
property
elevates the mind, ennobles, and purifies?
Sir, I do not pretend to determine what may
be the fact among men, but we hold among
monikins
,
that `the love of money is the root of all
evil.'
How, sir! do you account the education which
is a consequence of property, as nothing?
If you mean, my dear Sir John, that which
property
is most apt to teach, we hold it to be
selfishness
;
but if you mean that he who has money, as a
rule, will also have information to guide him aright,
I must answer, that experience, which is worth a
thousand theories, tells us differently. We find that
on questions which are purely between those who
have and those who have not, the
haves
are
commonly
united, and we think this would be the fact if
they were as unschooled as bears; but on all other
questions, they certainly do great discredit to
education
,
unless you admit that there are, in every
case,
two
rights; for, with us, the most highly
educated
generally take the two extremes of every
argument. I state this to be the fact with
monikins
,
you will rememberdoubtless, educated men
agree much better.
But, my good Brigadier, if your position about
the greater impartiality and independence of the
elector who is not influenced by his private
interests
,
be true, a country would do well to submit
its elections to a body of foreign umpires.
It would indeed, Sir John, if it were certain
these foreign umpires would not abuse the power
to their own particular advantage, if they could
have the feelings and sentiments which ennoble
and purify a nation far more than money, and if
it were possible they could thoroughly understand
the character, habits, wants, and resources of
another
people. As things are, therefore, we believe
it is wisest to trust our own elections to ourselves
not to a portion of ourselvesbut to all of
ourselves
.
Immigrunts included, put in the Captain.
Why, we do carry the principle well out in the
case of gentlemen like yourselves, returned the
Brigadier, politely; but liberality is a virtue. As
a principle, Sir John, your idea of referring the
choice of our representatives to strangers, has more
merit than you probably imagine, though,
certainly
,
impracticable, for the reasons already given.
When we seek justice, we commonly look out for
some impartial judge. Such a judge is unattainable,
however, in the matter of the interests of a state,
for the simple reason that power of this sort,
permanently
wielded, would be perverted on a
principle
which, after a most scrupulous analysis, we
have been compelled to admit is incorporated with
the very monikin natureviz. selfishness. I make
no manner of doubt that you men, however, are
altogether superior to an influence so unworthy?
Here I could only borrow the use of the
Brigadier's
Hum!
Having ascertained that it would not do to
submit the control of our affairs to utter strangers,
or to those whose interests are not identified with
our own, we set about seeing what could be done
with a selection from among ourselves. Here we
were again met by that same obstinate principle
of selfishness; and we were finally driven to take
shelter in the experiment of intrusting the interests
of all, to the management of all.
And, sir, are these the opinions of Leaphigh?
Very far from it. The difference between
Leaphigh and Leaplow is just this: the
Leaphighers
,
being an ancient people, with a thousand
vested interests, are induced, as time improves the
mind, to seek reasons for their facts; while we
Leaplowers, being unshackled by any such
restraints
,
have been able to make an effort to form
our facts on our reasons.
Why do you, then, so much prize Leaphigh
opinions on Leaplow facts?
Why does every little monikin believe his own
father and mother to be just the two wisest, best,
most virtuous, and discreetest old monikins in
the whole world, until time, opportunity, and
experience
show him his error?
Do you make no exceptions, then, in your
franchise, but admit every citizen who, as you say,
has a nose, ears, bob and wants, to the exercise of
the suffrage?
Perhaps we are less scrupulous on this head
than we ought to be, since we do not make
ignorance
and want of character bars to the privilege.
Qualifications beyond mere birth and existence
may be useful, but they are badly chosen when
they are brought to the test of purely material
possessions
.
This practice has arisen in the world
from the fact that they who had property had
power, and not because they ought to have it.
My dear Brigadier, this is flying in the face
of all experience.
For the reason just given, and because all
experience has hitherto commenced at the wrong
end. Society should be constructed as you erect
a house; not from the roof down, but from the
foundation upward.
Admitting, however, that your house has been
badly constructed at first,in repairing it, would
you tear away the walls at random, at the risk
of bringing all down about your ears?
I would first see that sufficient props were
reared, and then proceed with vigor, though always
with caution. Courage in such an experiment is
less to be dreaded than timidity. Half the evils
of life, social, personal and political, are as much
the effects of moral cowardice as of fraud.
I then told the Brigadier, that as his countrymen
rejected the inducements of property in the
selection
of the political base of their social compact, I
expected to find a capital substitute in virtue.
I have always heard that virtue is the great
essential of a free people, and doubtless you
Leaplowers
are perfect models in this important
particular
?
The Brigadier smiled, before he answered me;
first looking about, to the right and left, as if to
regale himself with the odor of perfection.
Many theories have been broached on these
subjects, he replied, in which there has been
some confusion between cause and effect. Virtue
is no more a cause of freedom, except as it is
connected
with intelligence, than vice is a cause of
slavery
.
Both may be consequences, but it is not easy
to say how either is necessarily a cause. There
is a homely saying among us monikins, which is
quite to the point in this matter: `Set a rogue to
catch a rogue.' Now, the essence of a free
government
is to be found in the responsibility of its
agents. He who governs without responsibility is
a master, while he who discharges the duties of a
functionary under a practical responsibility is a
servant
.
Vol. II. 12
This is the only true test of governments,
let them be mistified as they may in other respects.
Responsibility to the mass of the nation is the
criterion
of freedom. Now responsibility is the
substitute
for virtue in a politician, as discipline is the
substitute for courage, in a soldier. An army of
brave monikins without discipline, would be very
apt to be worsted by an army of monikins of less
natural spirit, with discipline. So a corps of
originally
virtuous politicians, without responsibility,
would be very apt to do more selfish, lawless, and
profligate acts, than a corps of less virtue, who
were kept rigidly under the rod of responsibility.
Unrestrained power is a great corrupter of virtue,
of itself; while the liabilities of a restrained
authority
are very apt to keep it in check. At least,
such is the fact with us monikinsmen very
possibly
get along better.
Let me tell you, Mr. Downright, you are now
uttering opinions that are diametrically opposed
to those of the world, which considers virtue an
indispensable ingredient in a republic.
The worldmeaning always the monikin
worldknows very little about real political
liberty
,
except as a theory. We of Leaplow are, in
effect, the only people who have had much to do
with it, and I am now telling you what is the result
of my own observation, in my own country. If
monikins were purely virtuous, there would be no
necessity for government at all; but, being what
they are, we think it wisest to set them to watch
each other.
But yours is self-government, which implies
self-restraint; and self-restraint is but another
word for virtue.
If the merit of our system depended on
self-government
,
in your signification, or on
self-restraint
,
in any signification, it would not be worth
the trouble of this argument, Sir John Goldencalf.
This is one of those balmy fallacies with which
illjudging
moralists endeavor to stimulate monikins
to good deeds. Our government is based on a
directly opposite principle; that of watching and
restraining each other, instead of trusting to our
ability to restrain ourselves. It is the want of
responsibility, and not its constant and active
presence, which infers virtue and self-control. No
one would willingly lay legal restraints on himself,
in any thing, while all are very happy to restrain
their neighbors. This refers to the positive and
necessary rules of intercourse, and the
establishment
of rights; as to mere morality, laws do very
little towards enforcing its ordinances. Morals
usually come of instruction; and when all have
political
power, instruction is a security that all desire.
But when all vote, all may wish to abuse their
trust to their own especial advantage, and a
political
chaos would be the consequence.
Such a result is impossible, except as especial
advantage is identified with general advantage. A
community can no more buy itself in this manner,
than a monikin can eat himself, let him be as
ravenous
as he will. Admitting that all are rogues,
necessity would compel a compromise.
You make out a plausible theory, and I have
little doubt that I shall find you the wisets, the
most logical, the discreetest, and the most
consistent
community I have yet visited. But another
word:How is it that our friend the Judge gave
such very equivocal instructions to his charg;
and why, in particular, did he lay so much stress
on the employment of means, which give the lie
flatly to all you have here told me?
Brigadier Downright hereupon stroked his chin,
and observed that he thought there might possibly
be a shift of wind; and he also wondered quite
audibly, when we should make the land. I
afterwards
persuaded him to allow that a monikin was
but a monikin, after all, whether he had the
advantages
of universal suffrage, or lived under a despot.
CHAPTER IX.
An arrivalAn electionArchitectureA rolling-pin, and
Patriotism of the most approved water.
In
due time the coast of Leaplow made its
appearance, close under our larboard bow. So
sudden was our arrival in this novel and
extraordinary
country, that we were very near running
on it, before we got a glimpse of its shores. The
seamanship of Captain Poke, however, stood us in
hand; and, by the aid of a very clever pilot, we
were soon safely moored in the harbor of Bivouac.
In this happy land, there was no registration, no
passports, no nothin'as Mr. Poke pointedly
expressed it. The formalities were soon observed,
although I had occasion to remark, how much
easier, after all, it is to get along in this world
with vice than with virtue. A bribe offered to a
custom-house officer was refused; and the only
trouble I had, on the occasion, arose from this
awkward obtrusion of a conscience. However,
the difficulty was overcome, though not quite as
soon or as easily as if
douceurs
had happened to
be in fashion; and we were permitted to land with
all our necessary effects.
The city of Bivouac presented a singular aspect,
as I first put foot within its hallowed streets.
The houses were all covered with large placards,
which, at first, I took to be lists of the wares to be
vended, for the place is notoriously commercial;
but which, on examination, I soon discovered were
merely electioneering handbills. The reader will
figure to himself my pleasure and surprise, on
reading
the first that offered. It ran as follows:
HORIZONTAL NOMINATION.
Horizontal-Systematic-Endoctrinated-Republicans, Attention!
Your sacred rights are in danger; your dearest liberties are
menaced; your wives and children are on the point of
dissolution
;
the infamous and unconstitutional position that the
sun gives light by day, and the moon by night, is openly and
impudently propagated, and now is the only occasion that
will probably ever offer to arrest an error so pregnant with
deception and domestic evils. We present to your notice a
suitable defender of all these near and dear interests, in the
person of
JOHN GOLDENCALF,
The known patriot, the approved legislator, the profound
philosopher
,
the incorruptible statesman. To our adopted
fellow-citizens
we need not recommend Mr. Goldencalf, for he is
truly one of themselves; to the native citizens we will only
say, Try him, and you will be more than satisfied.
I found this placard of great use, for it gave me
the first information I had yet had of the duty I
was expected to perform in the coming session of
the Great Council; which was merely to
demonstrate
that the moon gave light by day, and that
the sun gave light by night. Of course, I
immediately
set about, in my own mind, hunting up
the proper arguments by which this grave political
12 *
hypothesis was to be properly maintained. The
next placard was in favor of
NOAH POKE,
The experienced navigator, who will conduct the ship of
state into the haven of prosperitythe practical astronomer,
who knows by frequent observations, that Lunars are not
to be got in the dark.
Perpendiculars, be plumb, and lay your enemies on their
backs!
After this, I fell in with
THE HONORABLE ROBERT SMUT
Is confidently recommended to all their fellow-citizens by
the nominating committee of the
Anti-Approved-Sublimated-Politico-Tangents
,
as the real gentleman, a ripe scholar,
[2]
[2]
I afterwards found this was a common phrase in Leaplow,
being uniformly applied to every monikin who wore spectacles.
an
enlightened politician, and a sound democrat.
But I should fill the manuscript with nothing
else, were I to record a tithe of the commendations
and abuse that were heaped on us all, by a
community
to whom, as yet, we were absolutely
strangers
.
A single sample of the latter shall suffice.
AFFIDAVIT.
Personally appeared before me, John Equity, Justice of the
Peace, Peter Veracious, &c. &c., who, being duly sworn
upon the Holy Evangelists, doth depose and say, viz. That he
was intimately acquainted with one John Goldencalf in his
native country, and that he is personally knowing to the fact
that he, the said John Goldencalf, has three wives, seven
illegitimate children, is moreover a bankrupt without
character
,
and that he was obliged to emigrate in consequence of
having stolen a sheep.
Sworn, &c.
(Signed,) PETER VERACIOUS.
I naturally felt a little indignant at this impudent
statement, and was about to call upon the first
passer-by for the address of Mr. Veracious, when
the skirts of my skin were seized by one of the
Horizontal nominating committee, and I was
covered
with congratulations on my being happily
elected. Success is an admirable plaster for all
wounds, and I really forgot to have the affair of
the sheep and of the illegitimate children inquired
into; although I still protest, that had fortune been
less propitious, the rascal who promulgated this
calumny would have been made to smart for his
temerity. In less than five minutes it was the turn
of Captain Poke. He, too, was congratulated in
due form; for, as it appeared, the immigrunt
interest, as Noah termed it, had actually carried
a candidate on each of the two great opposing
tickets. Thus far, all was well; for, after sharing
his mess so long, I had not the smallest objection
to sit in the Leaplow parliament with the worthy
sealer; but our mutual surprise and, I believe I
might add, indignation, were a good deal excited,
by shortly encountering a walking notice, which
contained a programme of the proceedings to be
observed at the
Reception
of the Honorable
Robert
Smut.
It would seem that the Horizontals and the
Perpendiculars
had made so many spurious and
mistified
ballots, in order to propitiate the Tangents,
and to cheat each other, that this young blackguard
acutally stood at the head of the poll!a political
phenomenon, as I subsequently discovered,
however
,
by no means of rare occurrence in the
Leaplow
history of the periodical selection of the wisest
and best.
There was certainly an accumulation of interest
on arriving in a strange land, to find oneself both
extolled and vituperated on most of the corners of
its capital, and to be elected to its parliament, all in
the same day. Still, I did not permit myself to be
either so much elated or so much depressed, as
not to have all my eyes about me, in order to
get as correctly as possible, and as quickly as
possible
,
some insight into the characters, tastes, habits,
wishes and wants of my constituents.
I have already declared that it is my intention
to dwell chiefly on the moral excellencies and
peculiarities of the people of the monikin world.
Still I could not walk through the streets of
Bivouac
without observing a few physical usages,
that I shall mention, because they have an evident
connexion with the state of society, and the
historical
recollections of this interesting portion of the
polar region.
In the first place, I remarked that all sorts of
quadrupeds are just as much at home in the
promenades
of the town, as the inhabitants themselves,
a fact that I make no doubt has some very proper
connexion with that principle of equal rights, on
which the institutions of the country are established.
In the second place, I could not but see that their
dwellings are constructed on the very minimum
of base, propping each other, as emblematic of the
mutual support obtained by the republican system,
and seeking their development in height, for the
want of breadth; a singularity of customs that I
did not hesitate at once to refer to a usage of
living in trees, at an epocha not very remote. In
the third place, I noted, instead of entering their
dwellings near the ground, like men, and indeed
like most other unfledged animals, that they ascend
by means of external steps, to an aperture about
half-way between the roof and the earth, where,
having obtained admission, they go up or down,
within the building, as occasion requires. This
usage, I made no question, was preserved from
the period, and that, too, no distant one, when the
savage condition of the country induced them to
seek protection against the ravages of wild beasts,
by having recourse to ladders, which were drawn
up after the family, into the top of the tree, as the
sun sunk beneath the horizon. These steps or
ladders
are generally made of some white material,
in order that they may, even now, be found in the
dark, should the danger be urgent; although I do
not know that Bivouac is a more disorderly or
unsafe town than another, in the present day. But
habits linger in the usages of a people, and are
often found to exist as fashions, long after the motive
of their origin has ceased and been forgotten. As
a proof of this, many of the dwellings of Bivouac
have still enormous iron
chevaux-de-frise
before
the doors, and near the base of the stone-ladders;
a practice unquestionably taken from the original,
unsophisticated, domestic defences of this wary
and enterprising race. Among a great many of
these
chevaux-de-frise
, I remarked certain iron
images, that resemble the kings of chess-men,
and which I took, at first, to be symbols of the
calculating
qualities of the owners of the mansions, a
species of republican heraldry; but which the
Brigadier
told me, on inquiry, were no more than a
fashion that had descended from the custom of
having stuffed images before the doors, in the
early days of the settlement, to frighten away the
beasts at night, precisely as we station
scarecrows
in a corn-field. Two of these well-padded
sentinels, with a stick stuck up in a
firelock-attitude
,
he assured me, had often been known to
maintain
a siege of a week, against a she-bear and a
numerous family of hungry cubs, in the olden
times; and, now that the danger was gone, he
presumed the families which had caused these
iron monuments to be erected, had done so to
record
some marvellous risks of this nature, from
which their forefathers had escaped by means of
so ingenious an expedient.
Everything in Bivouac bears the impress of the
sublime principle of the institutions. The houses
of the private citizens, for instance, overtop the
roofs of all the public edifices, to show that the
public is merely a servant of the citizen. Even
the churches have this peculiarity, proving that
the road to heaven is not independent of the
popular
will. The great Hall of Justice, an edifice of
which the Bivouackers are exceedingly proud, is
constructed in the same recumbent style, the
architect
,
with a view to protect himself from the
imputation of believing that the firmament was
within reach of his hand, having taken the
precaution
to run up a wooden finger-board from the
centre of the building, which points to the place
where, according to the notions of all other people,
the ridge of the roof itself should have been raised.
So very apparent was this peculiarity, Noah
observed
that it seemed to him as if the whole
'arth had been rolled down by a great political
rolling-pin, by way of giving the country its
finishing
touch.
While making these remarks, one drew near at
a brisk trot, who, Mr. Downright observed, eagerly
desired our acquaintance. Surprised at his
pretending
to know such a fact without any previous
communication, I took the liberty of asking why
he thought that we were the particular objects of
the other's haste.
Simply because you are fresh arrivals. This
person is one of a sufficiently numerous class
among us, who, devoured by a small ambition,
seek notorietywhich, by the way, they are
near obtaining in more respects than they
probably
desireby obtruding themselves on every
stranger who touches our shore. Theirs is not a
generous and frank hospitality that would fain
serve others, but an irritable vanity that would
glorify themselves. The liberal and enlightened
monikin is easily to be distinguished from all of
this
clique
. He is neither ashamed of, nor bigoted
in favor of any usages, simply because they are
domestic. With him the criterions of merit are
propriety, taste, expediency and fitness. He
distinguishes
,
while these crave; he neither wholly
rejects, nor wholly lives by, imitation, but judges
for himself, and uses his experience as a
respectable
and useful guide; while these think that all
they can attain that is beyond the reach of their
neighbors, is, as a matter of course, the sole aim
of life. Strangers they seek, because they have
long since decreed that this country, with its
usages, its people, and all it contains, being
founded
on popular rights, is all that is debased and
vulgar
,
themselves and a few of their own particular
friends excepted; and they are never so happy as
when they are gloating on, and basking in, the
secondary refinements of what we call the `Old
Region.' Their own attainments, however, being
pretty much God-sends, or such as we all pick up
in our daily intercourse, they know nothing of any
foreign country but Leaphigh, whose language we
happen to speak; and, as Leaphigh is also the very
beau idal
of exclusion, in its usages, opinions and
laws, they deem all who come from that part of
the earth, as rather more entitled to their profound
homage than any other strangers.
Here Judge People's Friend, who had been
vigorously
pumping the nominating committee on the
subject of the chances of the little wheel, suddenly
left us, with a sneaking, self-abased air, and with
his nose to the ground, like a dog who has just
caught a fresh scent.
The next time we met the ex-envoy, he was in
mourning for some political backsliding that I
never comprehended. He had submitted to a
fresh amputation of the bob, and had so
thoroughly
humbled the seat of reason, that it was not
possible for the most envious and malignant
disposition
to fancy he had a particle of brains left.
He had, moreover, caused every hair to be shaved
off his body, which was as naked as the hand,
and altogether he presented an edifying picture
of penitence and self-abasement. I afterwards
understood that this purification was considered
perfectly satisfactory, and that he was thought to
be, again, within the limits of the most Patriotic
Patriots.
In the mean time the Bivouacker had
approached
me, and was introduced as Mr. Gilded Wriggle.
Count Poke de Stunin'tun, my good sir, said
the Brigadier, who was the master of ceremonies
on this occasion, and the Mogul Goldencalf
both noblemen of ancient lineage, admirable
privileges
,
and of the purest water;gentlemen, who,
when they are at home, have six dinners daily,
always sleep on diamonds, and whose castles are
none of them less than six leagues in extent.
My friend General Downright has taken too
much pains, gentlemen, interrupted our new
acquaintance
,
your rank and extraction being
self-evident
.
Welcome to Leaplow! I beg you will
make free with my house, my dog, my cat, my
horse, and myself. I particularly beg that your
first, your last, and all the intermediate visits, will
be to me. Well, Mogul, what do you really think
of us? You have now been on shore long enough
to have formed a pretty accurate notion of our
institutions and habits. I beg you will not judge
of all of us by what you see in the streets
It is not my intention, sir.
You are cautious, I perceive!We are in an
awful condition, I confess; trampled on by the
vulgar, and farvery far from being the people
that, I dare say, you expected to see. I couldn't
be made the assistant alderman of my ward, if I
wished it, sir; too much jacobinismthe people
are fools, sir; know nothing, sir; not fit to rule
themselves, much less their betters, sirhere have
a set of us, some hundreds in this very town, been
telling them what fools they are, how unfit they
are to manage their own affairs, and how fast
they are going to the devil, any time these twenty
years, and still we have not yet persuaded them to
intrust one of us with authority! To say the truth,
we are in a most miserable condition; and if
anything
could
ruin this country, democracy would
have ruined it, just thirty-five years ago.
Here the wailings of Mr. Wriggle were
interrupted
by the wailings of Count Poke de
Stunin'tun
.
The latter, by gazing in admiration at the
speaker, had inadvertently struck his toe against
one of the forty-three thousand seven hundred and
sixty inequalities of the pavement, (for everything
in Leaplow is exactly equal, except the streets and
highways,) and fallen forward on his nose. I have
already had occasion to allude to the sealer's
readiness
in using opprobrious epithets. This
contre-tems
happened in the principal street of Bivouac,
or in what is called the Wide-path, an avenue of
more than a league in extent; but, notwithstanding
its great length, Noah took it up at one end and
Vol. II. 13
abused it all the way to the other, with a
precision
,
fidelity, rapidity and point, that excited
general
admiration. It was the dirtiest, worst paved,
meanest, vilest street he had ever seen, and if they
had it at Stunin'tun, instead of using it as a street
at all, they would fence it up at each end, and turn
it into a hog-lot. Here Brigadier Downright
betrayed unequivocal signs of alarm. Drawing us
aside, he vehemently demanded of the Captain, if
he were mad, to berate in this unheard-of manner,
the touchstone of Bivouac sentiment, nationality,
taste and elegance! This street was never spoken
of except by the use of superlatives; a usage, by the
way, that Noah himself had by no means neglected.
It was commonly thought to be the longest and
the shortest, the widest and the narrowest, the
best built and the worst built avenue in the
universe
.
Whatever you say or do, he continued,
whatever you think or believe, never deny the
superlatives of the Wide-path. If asked if you ever
saw a street so crowded, although there be room
to wheel a regiment, swear it is stifling; if required
to name another promenade so free from
interruption
,
protest by your soul, that the place is a
desert
!
Say what you will of the institutions of the
country
How! I exclaimed; of the sacred rights of
monikins!
Bedaub them, and the mass of the monikins,
too, with just as much filth as you please. Indeed,
if you wish to circulate freely in genteel society, I
would advise you to get a pretty free use of the
words `jacobins,' `rabble,' `mob,' `agrarians,'
`
canaille
,' and `democrats;' for they recommend
many to notice who possess nothing else. In our
happy and independent country, it is a sure sign
of lofty sentiments, a finished education, a
regulated
intellect, and a genteel intercourse, to know
how to bespatter all that portion of your
fellow-creatures
,
for instance, who live in one-story
edifices
.
I find all this very extraordinary, your
government
being professedly a government of the mass!
You have intuitively discovered the reason
is it not fashionable to abuse the government
everywhere
?
Whatever you do, in genteel life, ought
to be based on liberal and elevated principles; and,
therefore, abuse all that is animate in Leaplow, the
present company, with their relatives and
quadrupeds
,
excepted; but do not raise your blaspheming
tongues against anything that is inanimate!
Respect
,
I entreat of you, the houses, the trees, the
rivers, the mountains, and, above all, in Bivouac,
respect the Wide-path! We are a people of lively
sensibilities, and are tender of the reputations of
even our stocks and stones. Even the Leaplow
philosophers are all of a mind on this subject.
King!
Can you account for this very extraordinary
peculiarity, Brigadier?
Surely you cannot be ignorant that all which
is property is sacred! We have a great respect
for property, sir, and do not like to hear our wares
underrated. But lay it on the mass so much the
harder, and you will only be thought to be in
possession
of a superior and a refined intelligence.
Here we turned again to Mr. Wriggle, who
was dying to be noticed once more.
Ah! gentlemen, last from Leaphigh!he had
been questioning one of our attendantsHow
comes on that great and consistent people?
As usual, sir;great and consistent.
I think, however, we are quite their equals,
eh?Chips of the same blocks?
No, sir,blocks of the same chips.
Mr. Wriggle laughed, and appeared pleased
with the compliment; and I wished I had even
laid it on a little thicker.
Well, Mogul, what are our great forefathers
about? Still pulling to pieces that sublime fabric
of a constitution, which has so long been the
wonder
of the world, and my especial admiration?
They are talking of changes, sir, although I
believe they have effected no great matter. The
Primate of all Leaphigh, I had occasion to remark,
still has seven joints to his tail.
Ah! they are a wonderful people, sir! said
Wriggle, looking ruefully at his own bob, which,
as I afterwards understood, was a mere natural
abortion. I detest change, sir; were I a
Leaphigher
,
I would die in my tail!
One for whom Nature has done so much in
this way, is to be excused a little enthusiasm.
A most miraculous people, sirthe wonder of
the worldand their institutions are the greatest
prodigy of the times!
That is well remarked, Wriggle, put in the
Brigadier; for they have been tinkering them,
and altering them, any time these five hundred and
fifty years, and still they remain precisely the
same!
Very true, Brigadier, very truethe marvel
of our times! But, gentlemen, what do you indeed
think of us? I shall not let you off with
generalities
.
You have now been long enough on shore
to have formed some pretty distinct notions about
us, and I confess I should be glad to hear them.
Speak the truth with candorare we not most
miserable, forlorn, disreputable devils, after all?
I disclaimed the ability to judge of the social
condition of a people on so short an acquaintance;
but to this Mr. Wriggle would not listen. He
insisted
that I must have been particularly disgusted
with the coarseness and want of refinement in the
rabble, as he called the mass, who, by the way,
had already struck me as being relatively much
the better part of the population, so far as I had
seen things!more than commonly decent, quiet
and civil. Mr. Wriggle, also, very earnestly and
piteously begged I would not judge of the whole
country by such samples as I might happen to fall
in with in the highways.
I trust, Mogul, you will have charity enough
to believe we are not all of us quite as bad as
appearances
,
no doubt, make us in your polished
eyes. These rude beings are spoiled by our
jacobinical
laws; but we have a class, sir, that
is
different
.
But, if you will not touch on the people,
how do you like the town, sir? A poor place, no
doubt, after your own ancient capitals?
Time will remedy all that, Mr. Wriggle.
Do you then think we really want time!
now, that house at the corner, there, to my taste
is fit for a gentleman in any countryeh?
No doubt, sir; fit for one.
This is but a poor street in the eyes of you
travellers, I know, this Wide-path of ours; though
we think it rather sublime?
You do yourself injustice, Mr. Wriggle
though not equal to many of the
How, sir, the Wide-path not equal to anything
on earth! I know several people who have been
in the old worldso the Leaplowers call the
region of Leaphigh, Leapup, Leapdown, &c.
and they swear there is not as fine a street in
any part of it. I have not had the good fortune
to travel, sir; but, sir, permit me, sir, to say, sir,
that some of them, sir, that
have
travelled, sir,
13 *
think, sir, the Wide-path, sir, the most magnificent
public avenue, sir, that their experienced eyes
ever beheld, siryes, sir, that their very
experienced
eyes ever beheld, sir.
I have seen so little of it, as yet, Mr. Wriggle,
that you will pardon me if I have spoken hastily.
Oh! no offenceI despise the monikin who is
not above local vanities and provincial
admiration
!
You ought to have seen that, sir, for I
frankly admit, sir, that no rabble can be worse
than ours, and that we are all going to the devil,
as fast as ever we can. No, sir, a most miserable
rabble, sir.But as for this street, and our houses,
and our cats, and our dogs, and certain
exceptions
you
understand me, sirit is quite a
different
thing. Pray, Mogul, who is the greatest
personage
,
now, in your nation?
Perhaps I ought to say the Duke of
Wellington
,
sir.
Well, sir, allow me to ask if he lives in a
better
house than that before us?I see you are
delighted
,
eh! We are a poor, new nation of pitiful
traders, sir, half savage, as everybody knows; but
we
do
flatter ourselves that we know how to build
a house! Will you just step in and see a new
sofa that its owner bought only yesterdayI know
him intimately, and nothing gives him so much
pleasure as to show his new sofa.
I declined the invitation on the plea of fatigue,
and by this means got rid of so troublesome an
acquaintance. On leaving me, however, he begged
that I would not fail to make his house my home,
swore terribly at the rabble, and invited me to
admire a very ordinary view that was to be
obtained by looking up the Wide-path in a
particular
direction, but which embraced his own abode.
When Mr. Wriggle was fairly out of ear-shot, I
demanded of the Brigadier if Bivouac, or
Leaplow
,
contained many such prodigies.
Enough to make themselves very troublesome,
and us ridiculous, returned Mr. Downright.
We are a young nation, Sir John, covering a
great surface, with a comparatively small
population
,
and, as you are aware, separated from the
older parts of the monikin region by a belt of
ocean. In some respects we are like people in the
country, and we possess the merits and failings
of those who are so situated. Perhaps no nation
has a larger share of reflecting and essentially
respectable inhabitants than Leaplow; but, not
satisfied with being what circumstances so
admirably
fit them to be, there is a
clique
among us,
who, influenced by the greater authority of older
nations, pine to be that which neither nature,
education
,
manners nor facilities will just yet allow
them to become. In short, sir, we have the
besetting
sin of a young communityimitation. In our
case the imitation is not always happy, either; it
being necessarily an imitation that is founded on
descriptions. If the evil were limited to mere
social absurdities, it might be laughed atbut
that inherent desire of distinction, which is the
most morbid and irritable, unhappily, in the minds
of those who are the least able to attain anything
more than a very vulgar notoriety, is just as active
here, as it is elsewhere; and some who have got
wealth, and and who can never get more than
what is purely dependent on wealth, affect to
despise
those who are not as fortunate as themselves
in this particular. In their longings for
pre-eminence
,
they turn to other statesLeaphigh more
especially, which is the
beau idal
of all nations
and people, who wish to set up a caste in opposition
to despotismfor rules of thought, and declaim
against that very mass which is at the bottom of
all their prosperity, by obstinately refusing to allow
of any essential innovation on the common rights.
In addition to these social pretenders, we have our
political Endoctrinated.
Endoctrinated! Will you explain the meaning
of the term?
Sir, an Endoctrinated is one of a political
school who holds to the validity of certain theories
which have been made to justify a set of
adventitious
facts, as is eminently the case in our own
great model, Leaphigh. We are peculiarly placed
in this country. Here, as a rule, factsmeaning
political and social factsare greatly in advance
of opinion, simply because the former are left
chiefly to their own free action, and the latter is
necessarily trammelled by habit and prejudice;
while in the `old-region' opinion, as a rule, and
meaning the leading or better opinion, is greatly
in advance of facts, because facts are restrained
by usage and personal interests, and opinion is
incited by study, and the necessity of change.
Permit me to say, Brigadier, that I find your
present institutions a remarkable result to follow
such a state of things.
They are a cause, rather than a consequence.
Opinion, as a whole, is everywhere on the advance;
and it is further advanced, even here,
as a whole
,
than anywhere else. Accident has favored the
foundation of the social compact; and once
founded
,
the facts have been hastening to their
consummation
faster than the monikin mind has been able
to keep company with them. This is a
remarkable
but true state of the whole region. In other
monikin countries, you see opinion tugging at
rooted
practices, and making desperate efforts to
eradicate
them from their bed of vested interests, while
here you see facts dragging opinion after them like
a tail wriggling behind a kite.
[3]
[3]
One would think that Brigadier Downright had lately paid
a visit to our own happy and much enlightened land. Fifty
years since, the negro was a slave in New-York, and
incapable
of contracting marriage with a white. Facts have,
however
,
been progressive; and, from one privilege to another,
he has at length obtained that of consulting his own tastes in
this matter, and, so far as he himself is concerned, of doing
as he pleases. This is the
fact;
but he who presumes to
speak
of it, has his windows broken by
opinion
, for his pains!
As to our purely
social imitation and social follies, absurd as they
are, they are necessarily confined to a small and an
immaterial class; but the
Endoctrinated
spirit is a
much more serious affair. That unsettles
confidence
,
innovates on the right, often innocently and
ignorantly, and causes the vessel of state to sail
like a ship with a drag towing in her wake.
This is truly a novel condition for an
enlightened
monikin nation!
No doubt, men manage better; but of all this
you will learn more in the Great Council. You
may, perhaps, think it strange that our facts
should preserve their ascendency in opposition to
so powerful a foe as opinion; but you will
remember
that a great majority of our people, if not
absolutely
on a level with circumstances, being purely
practical, are much nearer to this level, than the
class termed the Endoctrinated. The last are
troublesome
and delusive, rather than overwhelming.
To return to Mr. Wriggleis his sect
numerous
?
His class flourishes most in the towns. In
Leaplow we are greatly in want of a capital, where
the cultivated, educated, and well-mannered can
assemble, and, placed by their habits and tastes
above the ordinary motives and feelings of the less
instructed, they might form a more healthful,
independent
,
appropriate, and manly public sentiment
than that which now pervades the country. As
things are, the real
lite
of this community are so
scattered, as rather to receive an impression
from
,
than to impart one
to
society. The Leaplow
Wriggles
,
as you have just witnessed, are selfish and
exacting as to their personal pretensions, irritably
confident as to the merit of any particular
excellence
which limits their own experience, and
furiously
proscribing to those whom they fancy less
fortunate than themselves.
Good Heavens!Brigadierall this is
excessively
human!
Ah! it isis it? Well, this is certainly the way
with us monikins. Our Wriggles are ashamed of
exactly that portion of our population of which
they have most reason to be proud, viz. the mass;
and they are proud of precisely that portion of
which they have most reason to be ashamed, viz.
themselves. But plenty of opportunities will offer
to look farther into this; and we will now hasten to
the inn.
As the Brigadier appeared to chafe under the
subject, I remained silent, following him as fast as
I could, but keeping my eyes open, the reader may
be very sure, as we went along. There was one
peculiarity I could not but remark in this singular
town. It was this:all the houses were smeared
over with some coloured earth, and then, after all
this pains had been taken to cover the material, an
artist was employed to make white marks around
every separate particle of the fabric, (and they
were in millions,) which ingenious particularity
gives the dwellings a most agreeable air of detail,
imparting to the architecture, in general, a sublimity
that is based on the multiplication table. If to
this be added the black of the
chevaux-de-frise
, the
white of the entrance-ladders, and a sort of
standing-collar
to the whole, immediately under the
eaves, of some very dazzling hue, the effect is not
unlike that of a platoon of drummers, in scarlet
coats, cotton lace, and cuffs and capes of white.
What renders the similitude more striking, is the
fact that no two of the same platoon appear to be
exactly of a size, as is very apt to be the case with
your votaries in military music.
CHAPTER X.
A fundamental principle, a fundamental law, and a
fundamental
error.
The
people of Leaplow are remarkable for the
deliberation of their acts, the moderation of their
views, and the accumulation of their wisdom. As
a matter of course, such a people is never in an
indecent haste. Although I had now been legally
naturalized, and regularly elected to the Great
Council fully twenty-four hours, three entire days
were allowed for the study of the institutions, and
to become acquainted with the genius of a nation
who, according to their own account of the
matter
,
have no parallel in heaven or earth, or in the
waters under the earth, before I was called upon
to exercise my novel and important functions. I
profited by the delay, and shall seize a favorable
moment to make the reader acquainted with some
of my acquisitions on this interesting topic.
The institutions of Leaplow are divided into two
great moral categories, viz. the
legal
, and the
substitutive
.
The former embraces the provisions of
the great
elementary
, and the latter all the
provisions
of the great
alimentary
principle. The first,
accordingly, is limited by the constitution, or the
Great National Allegory, while the last is limited
by nothing but practice; one contains the
proposition
,
and the other its deductions; this is all
hypothesis
,
that, all corollary. The two great political
land-marks, the two public opinions, the
bob-upon-bobs
,
the rotatory action, and the great and little
wheels, are merely inferential; and I shall,
therefore
,
say nothing about them in my present treatise,
which has a strict relation only to the fundamental
law of the land, or to the Great and Sacred
National
Allegory.
It has been already stated that Leaplow was
originally
a scion of Leaphigh. The political separation
took place in the last generation, when the
Leaplowers
publicly renounced Leaphigh and all it
contained
,
just as your catechumen is made to renounce
the devil and all his works. This renunciation,
which is also sometimes called the
denunciation
,
was much more to the liking of Leaplow than to
that of Leaphigh; and a long and sanguinary war
was the consequence. The Leaplowers, after a
smart struggle, however, prevailed in their firm
determination to have no more to do with
Leaphigh
.
The sequel will show how far they were
right.
Even preceding the struggle, so active was the
sentiment of patriotism and independence, that the
citizens of Leaplow, though ill-provided with the
productions of their own industry, proudly
resorted
to the self-denial of refusing to import even a
pin from the mother country, actually preferring
nakedness to submission. They even solemnly voted
that their venerable progenitor, instead of being, as
she clearly ought to have been, a fond, protecting
and indulgent parent, was, in truth, no other than
a rapacious, vindictive and tyrannical step-mother.
This was the opinion, it will be remembered, when
the two communities were legally united, had but
one head, wore clothes, and necessarily pursued a
multitude of their interests in common.
By the lucky termination of the war, all this was
radically changed. Leaplow pointed her thumb
at Leaphigh, and declared her intention henceforth
to manage her own affairs in her own way. In
order to do this the more effectually, and, at the
same time, to throw dirt into the countenance of
her late step-mother, she determined that her own
polity should run so near a parallel, and yet should
be so obviously an improvement on that of
Leaphigh
,
as to demonstrate the imperfections of the
latter to the most superficial observer. That this
patriotic resolution was faithfully carried out in
practice, I am now about to demonstrate.
In Leaphigh, the old human principle had long
prevailed, that political authority came from God;
though why such a theory should ever have
prevailed
anywhere, as Mr. Downright once expressed
it, I cannot see, the devil very evidently having a
greater agency in its exercise than any other
influence
,
or intelligence, whatever. However, the
jus
divinum
was the regulator of the Leaphigh social
compact, until the nobility managed to get the
better
of the
jus
, when the
divinum
was left to shift
for itself. It was at this epocha the present
constitution
found its birth. Any one may have
observed
that one stick placed on end will fall, as a
matter of course, unless rooted in the earth. Two
sticks fare no better, even with their tops united;
but three sticks form a standard. This simple and
beautiful idea gave rise to the polity of Leaphigh.
Three moral props were erected in the midst of the
Vol. II. 14
community, at the foot of one of which was placed
the King, to prevent it from slipping; for all the
danger, under such a system, came from that of
the base slipping; at the foot of the second, the
nobles
;
and at the foot of the third, the people. On
the summit of this tripod was raised the machine
of state. This was found to be a capital invention
in theory, though practice, as practice is very apt
to do, subjected it to some essential modifications.
The King, having his stick all his own way, gave
a great deal of trouble to the two other sets of
stick-holders; and, unwilling to disturb the theory,
for that was deemed to be irrevocably settled and
sacred, the nobility, who, for their own particular
convenience, paid the principal workmen at the
base of the people's stick to stand steady, set about
the means of keeping the King's stick, also, in a
more uniform and serviceable attitude. It was on
this occasion that, discovering the King never could
keep his end of the great social stick in the place
where he had sworn to keep it, they solemnly
declared
that he must have forgotten where the
constitutional
foot-hole was, and that he had
irretrievably
lost his memory,a decision that was the
remote cause of the recent calamity of Captain
Poke. The King was no sooner constitutionally
deprived of his memory, than it was an easy matter
to strip him of all his other faculties; after which
it was humanely decreed, as indeed it ought to be
in the case of a being so destitute, that he could do
no wrong. By way of following out the idea on a
humane and Christian-like principle, and in order
to make one part of the practice conform to the
other, it was shortly after determined that he should
do nothing; his eldest first-cousin of the masculine
gender being legally proclaimed his substitute. In
the end, the crimson curtain was drawn before the
throne. As, however, this cousin might begin to
wriggle the stick in his turn, and derange the
balance
of the tripod, the other two sets of stick-holders
next decided that, though his Majesty had an
undeniable
constitutional right to say who
should be
his
eldest first-cousin of the masculine gender, they had
an undoubted constitutional right to say who he
should not be
. The result of all this was a
compromise
;
his Majesty, who, like other people, found the
sweets of authority more palatable than the bitter,
agreeing to get up on top of the tripod, where he
might appear seated on the machine of state, to
receive salutations, and eat and drink in peace,
leaving the others to settle among themselves who
should do the work at the bottom, as well as they
could. In brief, such is the history, and such was
the polity, of Leaphigh, when I had the honor of
visiting that country.
The Leaplowers were resolute to prove that all
this was radically wrong. They determined, in the
first place, that there should be but one great social
beam; and, in order that it should stand perfectly
steady, they made it the duty of every citizen to
prop its base. They liked the idea of a tripod
well enough, but, instead of setting one up in the
Leaphigh fashion, they just reversed its form, and
stuck it on top of their beam, legs uppermost, placing
a separate agent on each leg, to work their machine
of state; taking care, also, to send a new one aloft
periodically. They reasoned thus: If one of the
Leaphigh beams slipand they will be very apt to
slip in wet weather, with the King, nobles, and
people
wriggling and shoving against each otherdown
will come the whole machine of state, or, to say
the least, it will get so much awry as never to
work as well as at first; and therefore we will
have none of it. If, on the other hand, one of our
agents makes a blunder and falls, why, he will only
break his own neck. He will, moreover, fall in the
midst of us, and, should he escape with life, we can
either catch him and throw him back again, or we
can send a better hand up in his place, to serve out
the rest of his time. They also maintain that one
beam, supported by all the citizens, is much less
likely to slip than three beams, supported by three
powers of very uncertain, not to say unequal, forces.
Such, in effect, is the substance of the respective
National Allegories of Leaphigh and of Leaplow;
I say Allegories, for both governments seem to rely
on this ingenious form of exhibiting their great
distinctive
national sentiments. It would, in fact, be
an improvement, were all constitutions henceforth
to be written in this manner, since they would
necessarily
be more explicit, intelligible, and sacred,
than they are by the present attempt at literality.
Having explained the governing principles of
these two important states, I now crave the reader's
attention, for a moment, while I go a little into the
details of the
modus operandi
, in both cases.
Leaphigh acknowledged a principle, in the outset,
that Leaplow totally disclaimed, viz. that of
primogeniture
.
Being an only child myself, and having
no occasion for research on this interesting subject,
I never knew the basis of this peculiar right, until
I came to read the great Leaphigh commentator,
Whiterock, on the governing rules of the social
compact. I there found that the first-born,
morally
considered, is thought to have better claims to
the honors of the genealogical tree, on the father's
side, than these offspring whose origin is to be
referred to a later period in connubial life. On this
obvious and highly discriminating principle, the
crown, the rights of the nobles, and indeed all
other rights, are transferred from father to son,
in the direct male line, according to primogeniture.
Nothing of this is practised in Leaplow. There,
the supposition of legitimacy is as much in favor
of the youngest as of the oldest born, and the
practice
is in conformity. As there is no hereditary
chief to poise on one of the legs of the great tripod,
the people at the foot of the beam choose one
from among themselves, periodically, who is called
the Great Sachem. The same people choose
another
set, few in number, who occupy a common
seat, on another leg. These they term the Riddles.
Another set, still more numerous and popular in
aspect, if not in fact, fills a large seat on the third
leg. These last, from their being supposed to be
supereminently popular and disinterested, are
familiarly
known as the Legion. They are also
pleasingly
nicknamed the Bobees, an appellation that
took its rise in the circumstance that most of the
members of their body have submitted to the second
dock, and, indeed, have nearly obliterated every
sign of a
cauda
. I had, most luckily, been chosen
to sit in the House of Bobees, a station for which I
felt myself to be well qualified, in this great
essential
at least; for all the anointing and forcing
resorted
to by Noah and myself, during our voyage
out, and our residence in Leaphigh, had not
produced
so much as a visible sprout in either.
The Great Sachem, the Riddles, and the Legion,
had conjoint duties to perform, in certain respects,
and separate duties, in others. All three, as they
owed their allegorical elevation to, so were they
dependent on, the people at the foot of the great
social stick, for approbation and reward,that is
to say, for all rewards other than those which they
have it in their power to bestow on themselves.
There was another authority, or agent of the
public
,
that is equally perched on the social beam,
14 *
though not quite so dependent as the three just
named, upon the main prop of the people,being
also propped by a mechanical disposition of the
tripod itself. These are termed the Supreme
Arbitrators
,
and their duties are to revise the acts of the
other three agents of the people, and to decide
whether they are or are not in conformity with the
recognized principles of the Sacred Allegory.
I was greatly delighted with my own progress
in the study of the Leaplow institutions. In the
first place, I soon discovered that the principal
thing was to reverse the political knowledge I had
acquired in Leaphigh, as one would turn a tub
upside-down
,
when he wished to draw from its stores
at a fresh end, and then I was pretty sure of being
within at least the spirit of the Leaplow law. Every
thing seemed simple, for all was dependent on the
common prop, at the base of the great social beam.
Having got a thorough insight myself, into the
governing principles of the system under which I
had been chosen to serve, I went to look up my
colleague, Captain Poke, in order to ascertain how
he understood the great Leaplow Allegory.
I found the mind of the sealer, according to a
beautiful form of speech already introduced in this
narrative, considerably exercised, on the several
subjects that so naturally presented themselves to
a man in his situation. In the first place, he was
in a towering passion at the impudence of Bob in
presuming to offer himself as a candidate for the
Great Council; and having offered himself, the rage
of the Captain was in no degree abated by the
circumstance
of the young rascal's being at the head
of the poll. He most unreservedly swore that no
subordinate of his should ever sit in the same
legislative
body with himself; that he was a republican
by birth, and knew the usages of republican
governments
quite as well as the best patriot among
them; and although he admitted that all sorts of
critturs were sent to Congress in his country, no
man ever knew an instance of a cabin-boy's being
sent there. They might elect just as much as they
pleased; but coming ashore, and playing politician,
were very different things from cleaning his boots,
and making his coffee, and mixing his grog. The
Captain had just been waited on by a committee
of the Perpendiculars, (half the Leaplow
community
is on some committee or other,) by whom he
had been elected, and they had given notice, that
instructions would be sent in, forthwith, to all their
representatives, to perform Gyration No. 3., as
soon after the meeting of the Council as
possible
.
He was no tumbler, and he had sent for a
master of political saltation, who had just been with
him, practising. According to Noah's own
statement
,
his success was any thing but flattering. If
they would give a body room, Sir John, he said,
in a complaining accent, I should think nothing
of itbut you are expected to stand shoulder to
shoulderyard-arm and yard-arm,and throw
a flap-jack as handily as an old woman would toss
a johnny-cake! It's unreasonable to think of waring
ship without room; but give me room, and I'll
engage
to get round on the other tack, and to luff
into the line again, as safely as the oldest cruiser
among 'em, though not quite so quick. They do go
about spitefully, that's sartain!
Nor were the Great National Allegories without
their difficulties. Noah perfectly understood the
images of the two tripods, though he was disposed
to think that neither was properly secured. A mast
would make but bad weather, he maintained, let it
be ever so well rigged and stay'd, without being
also securely stepped. He saw no use in trusting
the heels of the beams to anybody. Good lashings
were what were wanted, and then the people might
go about their private affairs, and no fear the work
would fall. That the King of Leaphigh had no
memory, he could testify from bitter experience;
nor did he believe that he had any conscience; and,
chiefly he desired to know if we, when we got up
into our places on top of the three inverted beams,
among the other Bobees, were to make war on the
Great Sachem and the Riddles, or whether we
were to consider the whole affair as a good thing,
in which the wisest course would be to make fair
weather of it?
To all these remarks and questions, I answered
as well as my own limited experience would allow;
taking care to inform my friend that he had
conceived
the whole matter a little too literally, as all
that he had been reading about the great political
beams, the tripods, and the legislative boxes, was
merely an allegory.
And pray, then, Sir John, what may an
allegory
be?
In this case, my good sir, it is a constitution.
And what is a constitution?
Why, it is sometimes, as you perceive, an
allegory
.
And are we not to be mast-headed, then,
according
to the book?
Figuratively, only.
But there are actually such critturs as the Great
Sachem, and the Riddles, and above all, the Bobees!
We are boney fie-diddle-di-dee elected?
Boney fie-diddle-di-dee.
And may I take the liberty of asking, what it
is our duty to do?
We are to act practically, according to the
literality of the legal, implied, figurative,
allegorical
significations of the Great National Compact,
under a legitimate construction.
I fear we shall have to work double tides, Sir
John, to do so much in so short a time! Do you
mean that, in honest truth, there is no beam?
There is, and there is not.
No fore, main, and mizzen-tops, according to
what is here written down?
There is not, and there is.
Sir John, in the name of God, speak out!Is
all this about eight dollars a day, no better than a
take in?
That, I believe, is strictly literal.
As Noah now seemed a little mollified, I seized
the opportunity to tell him he must beware how he
attempted to stop Bob from attending the Council.
Members were privileged, going and coming; and
unless he was guarded in his course, he might have
some unpleasant collision with the serjeant-at-arms.
Besides, it was unbecoming the dignity of a
legislator
to be wrangling about
trisles
, and he to whom
was confided the great affairs of a state, ought to
attach the utmost importance to a grave exterior,
which commonly was of more account with his
constituents than any other quality. Any one could
tell whether he was grave or not, but it was by no
means so easy a matter to tell whether he or his
constituents had the greatest cause to appear so.
Noah promised to be discreet, and we parted, not
to meet again until we assembled to be sworn in.
Before continuing the narrative, I will just
mention
that we disposed of our commercial investments
that morning. All the Leaphigh opinions brought
good prices; and I had occasion to see how well
the Brigadier understood the market, by the
eagerness
with which, in particular, the opinions on the
state of society in Leaplow, were bought up. But,
by one of those unexpected windfalls which raise
up so many of the chosen of the earth to their high
places, the cook did better than any of us. It will
be remembered, that he had bartered an article of
merchandise that he called slush against a
neglected
bale of Distinctive Leaplow Opinions, which had
no success at all in Leaphigh. Coming as they did
from abroad, these articles had taken as a novelty
in Bivouac, and he sold them all before night, at
enormous advances; the cry being that something
new and extraordinary had found its way into the
market!
CHAPTER XI.
How to enact lawsOratory, logic and eloquence, all
considered
in their every-day aspects.
Political
oaths are very much the same sort
of thing everywhere, and I shall say no more about
our inauguration than simply to state it took place
as usual. The two houses were duly organized,
and we proceeded, without delay, to the transaction
of business. I will here state that I was much
rejoiced to find Brigadier Downright among the
Bobees, the Captain whispering that most probably
he had been mistaken for an immigrunt, and
chosen accordingly.
It was not a great while before the Great Sachem
sent us a communication, which contained a
compte
rendu
of the state of the nation. Like most accounts
it is my good fortune to receive, I thought it
particularly
long. Agreeably to the opinions of this
document, the people of Leaplow were, by a good
deal, the happiest people in the world; they were
also considerably more respected, esteemed,
beloved
,
honored, and properly appreciated, than any
other monikin community; and, in short, they were
the admiration and glory of the universe. I was
exceedingly glad to hear this, for some of the facts
were quite new to me; a circumstance which shows
one can never get correct notions of a nation
except
from itself.
These important facts properly digested, we all
of us set about our several duties with a zeal that
spoke fairly for our industry and integrity. Things
commenced swimmingly; and it was not long before
the Riddles sent us a resolution for concurrence,
by way of opening the ball. It was conceived in
the following terms:Resolved, that the color
which has hiterto been deemed to be black, is
really white.
As this was the first resolution that involved a
principle on which we had been required to vote, I
suggested to Noah the propriety of our going
round to the Brigadier, and inquiring what might
be the drift of so singular a proposition. Our
colleague
answered the question with great good
nature
,
giving us to understand that the Perpendiculars
and the Horizontals had long been at variance on
the mere coloring property of various important
questions, and the real matter involved in the
resolution
was not visible. The former had always
maintained, (by always, he meant ever since the
time they maintained the contrary,) the doctrine
of the resolution, and the latter its converse. A
majority of the Riddles, just at this moment, are
Perpendiculars; and, as it was now seen, they had
succeeded in getting a vote on their favorite
principle
.
According to this account of the matter, Sir
John, observed the Captain, I shall be compelled
to maintain that black is white, seeing that I am
in on the Parpendic'lar interest?
I thought with the Captain, and was pleased
that my own legislative debt was not to be
characterized
by the promulgation of any doctrine so
much at variance with my preconceived ways of
thinking. Curious, however, to know his opinion,
I asked the Brigadier in what light he felt disposed
to view the matter himself.
I am elected by the Tangents, he said; and,
by what I can learn, it is the intention of our friends
to steer a middle course; and one of our leaders is
already selected, who, at a proper stage of the
affair, is to move an amendment.
Can you refer me, my dear friend, to anything
connected with the Great National Allegory, that
bears on this point?
Why, there is a clause among the fundamental
and immutable laws, which it is thought was
intended
to meet this very case; but, unhappily, the sages
by whom our Allegory was drawn up, have not
paid quite as much attention to the phraseology as
the importance of the subject demanded.
Here the Brigadier laid his finger on the clause
in question, and I returned to a seat to study its
meaning. It was conceived as follows:Art. IV.
Clause 6: The Great National Council shall, in
no case whatever, pass any law, or resolution,
declaring
white to be black.
After studying this fundamental enactment to the
bottom, turning it on every side, and finally
considering
it upside-down, I came to the conclusion that
its tenor was, on the whole, rather more favorable
than unfavorable to the horizontal doctrine. It
struck me, a very good argument was to be made
out of the constitutional question, and that it
presented
a very fair occasion for a new member to
venture on a maiden speech. Having so settled the
matter, entirely to my own satisfaction, I held
myself
in reserve, waiting for the proper moment to
produce an effect.
It was not long before the Chairman of the
Committee
on the Judiciary (one of the effects of the
resolution was entirely to change the coloring of
all testimony throughout the vast republic of
Leaplow
)
made his report on the subject-matter of the
resolution. This person was a Tangent, who had
a besetting wish to become a Riddle, although the
leaning of our house was decidedly horizontal;
and, as a matter of course, he took the Riddle side
of this question. The report, itself, required seven
hours in the reading, commencing with the subject
at the epocha of the celebrated caucus that was
adjourned
sine die
, by the disruption of the earth's
crust, and previously to the distribution of the great
monikin family into separate communities, and
ending
with the subject of the resolution in his hand.
The reporter had set his political palette with the
utmost care, having completely covered the subject
with neutral tints, before he got through with it;
and glazing the whole down with ultramarine, in
such a way as to cause the eye to regard the
matter
through a fictitious atmosphere. Finally, he
repeated the resolution, verbatim, and as it came
from the other house.
Mr. Speaker now called upon gentlemen to
deliver
their sentiments. To my utter amazement,
Captain Poke arose, put his tobacco back into its
box, and opened the debate, without apology.
The Honorable Captain said he understood this
question to be one implicating the liberties of
everybody
.
He understood the matter literally, as it was
propounded in the Allegory, and set forth in the
resolution; and, as such, he intended to look at it
with unprejudyced eyes. The natur' of this
proposal
lay altogether in color. What is color, after
all? Make the most of it, and in the most favorable
position, which, perhaps, is the cheek of a comely
young woman, and it is but skin-deep. He
remembered
the time when a certain female in
another
part of the univarse, who is commonly called
Miss Poke, might have out-rosed the best rose in a
Vol. II. 15
place called Stunin'tun; and what did it all amount
to? He shouldn't ask Miss Poke herself, for
obvious
reasonsbut he would ask any of the
neighbors
how she looked now? Quitting female natur',
he would come to human natur' generally. He had
often remarked that sea-water was blue, and he had
frequently caused pails to be lowered, and the water
brought on deck, to see if he could come at any of
this blueing matterfor indigo was both scarce
and dear in his part of the world, but he never
could make out anything by the experiment; from
which he concluded that, on the whull, there was
pretty much no such thing as color, at all.
As for the resolution before the house, it
depended
entirely on the meaning of words. Now, after
all, what is a word? Why, some people's words
are good, and other people's words are good for
nothing. For his part, he liked sealed instruments
which might be because he was a sealerbut as
for mere words, he set but little store by them. He
once tuck a man's word for his wages; and the
long and short of it was, that he lost his money.
He had known a thousand instances in which words
had proved to be of no value, and he did not see
why some gentlemen wished to make them of so
much importance here. For his part, he was for
puffing up nothing, no, not even a word or a color,
above its desarts. The people seemed to call for a
change in the color of things, and he called upon
gentlemen to remember that this was a free
country
,
and one in which the laws ruled; and therefore
he trusted they would be disposed to adapt the laws
to the wants of the people. What had the people
asked of the house in this matter? So far as his
knowledge went, they had really asked nothing in
words, but he understood there was great
discontent
on the subject of the old colors; and he
construed
their silence into an expression of contempt
for words in general. He was a Parpendic'lar, and
he should always maintain parpendic'lar sentiments.
Gentlemen might not agree with him, but, for one,
he was not disposed to jipordyze the liberties of his
constituents, and therefore he gave the rizolution
just as it came from the Riddles, without altering
a letteralthough he did think there was one word
misspelthe meant `really,' which he had been
taught to spell `ra'ally'but he was ready to
sacrifice even his opinions on this point to the good
of the country; and therefore he went with the
Riddles
,
even to their misprints. He hoped the
rizolution
would pass, with the entire unanimity so
important a subject demanded.
This speech produced a very strong sensation.
Up to this time, the principal orators of the house
had been much in the practice of splitting hairs
about some nice technicality in the Great Allegory;
but Noah, with the simplicity of a truly great mind,
had made a home-thrust at the root of the whole
matter; laying about him with the
single-heartedness
of the illustrious Manchechan, when he couched
his lance against the wind-mills. The points
admitted
,
that there were no such things as colors,
and that words were of no moment, this, or indeed
any other resolution, might be passed with impunity.
The Perpendiculars in the house were singularly
satisfied, for, to say the truth, their arguments
hitherto had been rather flimsy. Out of doors, the
effect was greater still; for it wrought a complete
change in the whole tenor of the Perpendicular
argument. Monikins who the day before had
strenuously affirmed that their strength lay in the
phraseology of the Great Allegory, now suddenly
had their eyes opened, clearly perceiving that words
had no just value. The argument had certainly
undergone some modifications; but, luckily, the
deduction was undisturbed. The Brigadier noticed
this apparent anomaly; explaining, however, that
it was quite common in Leaplow, more especially
in all matters affecting politics; though he felt
persuaded
men must be more consistent.
No great time is required to put a
well-organized
political corps to the right-about, when
proper
attention has been paid to the preparatory drills.
Although several of the best speakers among the
Perpendiculars had appeared in their places, with
ample notes, and otherwise in readiness to show
that the phraseology of the resolution was
altogether
in favor of their views of the question, every
monikin of them promptly rejected his previous
argument, for the simple and more conclusive views
of Captain Poke. On the other hand, the
Horizontals
were so completely taken by surprise, that not
an orator among them all had a word to say for
himself. So far from replying, they actually
permitted
one of their antagonists to rise and to follow
up the blow of the Captain; a pretty certain sign
that they were bothered.
The new speaker was a very prominent leader
of the Perpendiculars. He was one of those
politicians
who are only the more dexterous from
having
been of all sides, knowing by experience the
weak and the strong points of each, and being
familiar
with every subdivision of political sentiment
that had ever existed in the country. This ingenious
orator took up the subject with spirit, treating it
throughout on the principle of the honorable
member
who had last spoken. According to his views
of the question, the
gist
of a resolution, or a law,
was to be found in things and not in words. Words
were so many false lights to mislead, andhe need
not tell this house a fact that was familiar to all
who heard himwords would be, and were, daily
moulded to suit the convenience of all sorts of
persons
.
It was a capital error in political life to be
lavish of words, for the time might come when the
garrulous and voluble would have cause to repent of
having used them. He asked the house if the
thing
proposed were necessarydid the public interests
require itwas the public mind prepared for it; if so,
he begged gentlemen to do their duties to themselves,
their characters, their consciences, their religion,
their property, and, lastly, their constituents.
This orator had endeavored to destroy words by
words, and I thought the house regarded his effort
rather favorably. I now determined to make a
rally in favor of the fundamental law, which
evidently
had as yet been but little regarded in the
discussion. I caught the Speaker's eye, accordingly,
and was on my feet in a moment.
I commenced by paying elaborate compliments
to the talents and motives of those who had
preceded
me, and made some proper allusions to the
known intelligence, patriotism, virtue, and legal
attainments of the house. All this was so well
received
,
that taking courage, I determined to come
down upon my adversaries, at once, with the text
of the written law. Prefacing the blow with an
eulogium on the admirable nature of those
institutions
which were universally admitted to be the
wonder of the world, and which were commonly
pronounced to be the second perfection of monikin
reason, those of Leaphigh being invariably deemed
the first, I made a few apposite remarks on the
necessity of respecting the vital ordinances of the
body politic, and asked the attention of my hearers
while I read to them a particular clause, which
it had struck me had some allusion to the very
point now in consideration. Having thus
cleared
the way, I had not the folly to defeat the
objects
of so much preparation, by an indiscreet
precipitancy. So far from it, previously to
reading
15*
the extract from the constitution, I waited until
the attention of every member present was attracted
more forcibly by the dignity, deliberation, and
gravity
of my manner, than by the substance of what
had yet been said. In the midst of this deep silence
and expectation I read aloud, in a voice that reached
every cranny of the hall
The Great Council shall, in no case whatever,
pass any law, or resolution, declaring white to be
black.
If I had been calm in the presentation of this
authority
,
I was equally self-possessed in waiting for
its effect. Looking about me, I saw surprise,
perplexity
,
doubt, wonder and uncertainty, in every
countenance, if I did not find conviction. One fact
embarrassed even me. Our friends the Horizontals
were evidently quite as much as fault as our
opponents
the Perpendiculars, instead of being, as I had
good reason to hope, in an ecstasy of pleasure on
hearing their cause sustained by an authority so
weighty.
Will the honorable member have the goodness to
explain from what author he has quoted? one of the
leading Perpendiculars at length ventured to inquire.
The language you have just heard, Mr.
Speaker
,
I resumed, believing that now was the
favorable
instant to follow up the matter, is language
that must find an echo in every heartit is
language
that can never be used in vain in this
venerable
hall, language that carries with it conviction
and commandI observed that the members were
now fairly gaping at each other with wonder
Sir, I am asked to name the author from whom I
have quoted these sententious and explicit words
Sir, what you have just heard is to be found in the
Article IV. Clause 6, of the Great National
Allegory
OrderOrderOrder! shouted a hundred
raven throats.
I stood aghast, even more amazed than the house
itself had been only the instant before.
OrderOrderOrderOrderOrder!
continued
to be yelled, as if a million of demons were
screeching in the hall.
The honorable member will please to recollect,
said the bland, and ex-officio impartial Speaker,
who, by the way, was a Perpendicular, elected by
fraud, that it is out of order to use personalities.
Personalities! I do not understand, sir
The instrument to which the honorable member
has alluded, his own good sense will tell him, was
never written by itselfso far from this, the very
members of the convention by which it was drawn
up, are at this instant members of this house, and
most of them supporters of the resolution now
before
the house; and it will be deemed personal to
throw into their faces former official acts, in this
unheard-of manner. I am sorry it is my duty to
say, that the honorable member is entirely out of
order.
But, sir, the Sacred National
Sacred, sir, beyond a doubtbut in a sense
different from what you imaginemuch too sacred,
sir, ever to be alluded to here. There are the works
of the commentators, the books of constructions,
and especially the writings of various foreign and
perfectly disinterested statesmen,need I name
Ekrub in particular!that are at the command of
members; but so long as I am honored with a seat
in this chair, I shall peremptorily decide against all
personalities.
I was dumb-founded. The idea that the authority
itself would be refused never crossed my mind,
though I had anticipated a sharp struggle on its
construction. The constitution only required that
no law should be passed declaring black to be
white, whereas the resolution merely ordered that
henceforth white should be black. Here was
matter
for discussion, nor was I at all sanguine as to
the result; but to be thus knocked on the head by a
club, in the outset, was too much for the modesty
of a maiden speech. I took my seat in confusion;
and I plainly saw that the Perpendiculars, by their
sneers, now expected to carry everything
triumphantly
their own way. This, most probably, would
have been the case, had not one of the Tangents
immediately got the floor, to move the amendment.
To the vast indignation of Captain Poke, and, in
some degree, to my own mortification, this duty
was intrusted to the Hon. Robert Smut. Mr. Smut
commenced with entreating members not to be led
away by the sophistry of the first speaker. That
honorable member, no doubt, felt himself called
upon to defend the position taken by his friends;
but those that knew him well, as it had been his
fate to know him, must be persuaded that his
sentiments
had, at least, undergone a sudden and
miraculous
change. That honorable member denied
the existence of color, at all! He would ask that
honorable member if he had never been
instrumental
himself in producing what is generally called
black and blue color? he should like to know
if that honorable member placed as little value,
at present, on blows as he now seemed to set on
wordshe begged pardon of the house, but this
was a matter of great interest to himselfhe knew
that there never had been a greater manufacturer
of black and blue color than that honorable
member, and he wondered at his now so
pertinaciously
denying the existence of colors, and at his
wish to underrate their value. For his part, he
trusted he understood the importance of words, and
the value of hues; and while he did not exactly see
the necessity of deeming black so inviolable as some
gentlemen appeared to think it, he was not by any
means prepared to go as far as those who had
introduced
this resolution. He did not believe that
public opinion was satisfied with maintaining that
black was black, but he thought it was not yet
disposed
to affirm that black was white. He did not
say that such a day might not arrive; he only
maintained that it had not yet arrived, and with a
view to meet that which he believed was the
public
sentiment, he should move, by way of
amendment
,
to strike out the whole of the resolution after
the word really, and insert that which would
cause the whole resolution to read as follows, viz.
Resolved, that the color which has hitherto
been deemed to be black, is really
lead-color
.
Hereupon, the Honorable Mr. Smut took his seat,
leaving the house to its own ruminations. The
leaders of the Perpendiculars, foreseeing that if
they got half-way this session, they might effect the
rest of their object the next, determined to accept
the compromise; and the resolution, as amended,
passed by a handsome majority. So this important
point was finally decided for the moment, leaving
great hopes among the Perpendiculars of being
able to lay the Horizontals even flatter on their
backs than they were just then.
The next question that presented itself was of far
less interest, exciting no great attention. To
understand
it, however, it will be necessary to refer a
little to history. The government of Leapthrough
had, about sixty-three years before, caused one
hundred
and twenty-six Leaplow ships to be burned on
the high seas, or otherwise destroyed. The pretence
was, that they incommoded Leapthrough.
Leaplow
was much too great a nation to submit to so
heinous an outrage, while, at the same time, she was
much too magnanimous and wise a nation to resent
it in an every-day and vulgar manner. Instead of
getting in a passion and loading her cannon, she
summoned all her logic and began to reason. After
reasoning the matter with Leapthrough for fifty-two
years, or until all the parties who had been wronged
were dead, and could no longer be benefited by her
logic, she determined to abate two-thirds of her
pretensions in a pecuniary sense, and all her
pretensions
in an honorary sense, and to compromise
the affair by accepting a certain insignificant sum
of money as a salve to the whole wrong.
Leapthrough
conditioned to pay this money, in the most
solemn and satisfactory manner; and everybody
was delighted with the amicable termination of a
very vexatious and a seemingly interminable
discussion
.
Leapthrough was quite as glad to get rid
of the matter as Leaplow, and very naturally, under
all the circumstances, thought the whole thing at
length was done with, when she conditioned to pay
the money. The Great Sachem of Leaplow, most
unfortunately, however, had a will of iron, or, in
other words, he thought the money ought to be paid
as well as conditioned to be paid. This despotic
construction of the bargain had given rise to
unheard-of
dissatisfaction in Leapthrough, as indeed
might have been expected; but it was, oddly enough,
condemned with some heat even in Leaplow itself,
where it was stoutly maintained by certain ingenious
logicians, that the only true way to settle a bargain
to pay money, was to make a new one for a less
sum, whenever the amount fell due; a plan that,
with a proper moderation and patience, would be
certain, in time, to extinguish the whole debt.
Several very elaborate patriots had taken this
matter in hand, and it was now about to be
presented
to the house, under four different categories.
Category No. 1, had the merit of simplicity and
precision. It proposed merely that Leaplow should
pay the money itself, and take up the bond, using
its own funds. Category No. 2, embraced a
recommendation
of the Great Sachem for Leaplow to
pay itself, using, however, certain funds of
Leapthrough
.
Category 3d, was a proposal to offer ten
millions to Leapthrough to say no more about the
transaction at all. Category 4th, was to commence
the negotiating or abating system mentioned,
without
delay, in order to extinguish the claim by
instalments
as soon as possible.
The question came up on the consideration of the
different projects connected with these four leading
principles. My limits will not admit of a detailed
history of the debate. All I can do, is merely to
give an outline of the logic that these various
propositions
set in motion, of the legislative ingenuity
of which they were the parents, and of the multitude
of legitimate conclusions that so naturally followed.
In favor of Category No. 1, it was urged that,
by adopting its leading idea, the affair would be
altogether in our own hands, and might consequently
be settled with greater attention to purely Leaplow
interests; that further delay could only proceed
from our own negligence; that no other project
was so likely to get rid of this protracted
negotiation
in so short a time; that by paying the debt
with the Leaplow funds, we should be sure of
receiving
its amount in the good legal currency of
the republic; that it would be singularly
economical
,
as the agent who paid might also be authorized
to receive, whereby there would be a saving in
salary; and, finally, that, under this category, the
whole affair might be brought within the limits of
a nut-shell, and the compass of any one's
understanding
.
In favor of Category No. 2, little more than very
equivocal sophisms, which savored strongly of
common-place
opinions, were presented. It was
pretended
,
for instance, that he who signed a bond was
in equity bound to pay it; that, if he refused, the
other party had the natural and legal remedy of
compulsion; that it might not always be convenient
for a creditor to pay all the obligations of other
people which he might happen to hold; that if his
transactions were extensive, money might be
wanting
to carry out such a principle; and that, as a
precedent, it would comport much more with
Leaplow
prudence and discretion to maintain the old and
tried notions of probity and justice, than to enter on
the unknown ocean of uncertainty that was
connected
with the new opinions, by admitting which, we
could never know when we were fairly out of debt.
Category No. 3, was discussed on an entirely new
system of logic, which appeared to have great favor
with that class of the members who were of the
more refined school of ethics. These orators referred
the whole matter to a sentiment of honor. They
commenced by drawing vivid pictures of the
outrages
in which the original wrongs had been
committed
.
They spoke of ruined families, plundered
mariners, and blasted hopes. They presented
minute
arithmetical calculations to show that just forty
times as much wrong had, in fact, been done, as
this bond assumed; and that, as the case actually
stood, Leaplow ought, in strict justice, to receive
exactly forty times the amount of the money that
was actually included in the instrument. Turning
from these interesting details, they next presented
the question of honor. Leapthrough, by attacking
the Leaplow flag, and invading Leaplow rights,
had made it principally a question of honor, and,
in disposing of it, the principle of honor ought never
to be lost sight of. It was honorable to
pay
one's
debtsthis no one could dispute; but it was not so
clear, by any means, that there was any honor in
receiving
one's dues. The national honor was
concerned; and they called on members, as they
cherished the sacred sentiment, to come forward
and sustain it by their votes. As the matter stood,
Leaplow had the best of it. In compounding with
her creditor, as had been done in the treaty,
Leapthrough lost some honorin refusing to pay
the bond, she lost still more; and now, if we should
send her the ten millions proposed, and she should
have the weakness to accept it, we should fairly
get our foot upon her neck, and she could never
look us in the face again!
The Category No. 4, brought up a member who
had made political economy his chief study. This
person presented the following case:According
to his calculations, the wrong had been committed
precisely sixty-three years, and twenty-six days, and
two-thirds of a day, ago. For the whole of that
long period Leaplow had been troubled with this
vexatious question, which had hung like a cloud
over the otherwise unimpaired brightness of her
political landscape. It was time to get rid of it.
The sum stipulated was just twenty-five millions,
to be paid in twenty-five annual instalments, of a
million each. Now, he proposed to reduce the
instalments to one half the number, but in no way
to change the sum. That point ought to be
considered
as irrevocably settled. This would
diminish
the debt one half. Before the first instalment
should become due, he would effect a postponement,
by diminishing the instalments again to six,
referring
the time to the latest periods named in the last
treaty, and always, always most sacredly keeping the sums
precisely the same. It would be impossible to touch
Vol. II. 16
the sums, which, he repeated, ought to be considered
as sacred. Before the expiration of the first seven
years, a new arrangement might reduce the
instalments
to two, or even to onealways respecting
the sum; and finally, at the proper moment, a treaty
could be concluded, declaring that there should be
no instalment at all, reserving the point, that if
there
had
been an instalment, Leaplow could never
have consented to reduce it below one million. The
result would be, that in about five-and-twenty years
the country would be fairly rid of the matter, and
the national character, which it was agreed on all
hands was even now as high as it well could be,
would probably be raised many degrees higher.
The negotiation had commenced in a spirit of
compromise
;
and our character for consistency required
that this spirit of compromise should continue to
govern our conduct as long as a single farthing
remained unpaid.
This idea took wonderfully; and I do believe it
would have passed by a handsome majority, had
not a new proposition been presented, by an orator
of singularly pathetic powers.
The new speaker objected to all four of the
categories
.
He said that each and every one of them
would lead to war. Leapthrough was a chivalrous
and high-minded nation, as was apparent by the
present aspect of things. Should we presume to
take up the bond, using our own funds, it would
mortally offend her pride, and she would fight us;
did we presume to take up the bond, using her
funds, it would offend her financial system, and she
would fight us; did we presume to offer her ten
millions
to say no more about the matter, it would
offend her dignity by intimating that she was to be
bought off from her rights, and she would fight us;
did we presume to adopt the system of new
negotiations
,
it would mortally offend her honor, by
intimating that she would not respect her old
negotiations
,
and she would fight us. He saw war in
all four of the categories. He was for a peace
category
,
and he thought he had in his hand a
proposition
,
that by proper management, using the most
tender delicacy, and otherwise respecting the
sensibilities
of the high and honorable nation in
question
,
we might possibly get out of this embarrassing
dilemma without actually coming to blowshe
said to blows, for he wished to impress on
honorable
members the penalties of war. He invited
gentlemen to recollect that a conflict between two
great nations was a serious affair. If Leapthrough
were a little nation, it would be a different matter,
and the contest might be conducted in a corner;
our honor was intimately connected with all we did
with great nations. What was war? Did
gentlemen
know?He would tell them.
Here the orator drew a picture of war that
caused suffering monikinity to shudder. He viewed
it in its four leading points: its religious, its
pecuniary
,
its political, and its domestic penalties. He
described war to be the demon-state of the monikin
mind; as opposed to worship, to charity, brotherly
love, and all the virtues. On its pecuniary
penalties
,
he touched by exhibiting a tax-sheet. Buttons
which cost six-pence a gross, he assured the house
would shortly cost seven-pence a gross.Here he
was reminded that monikins no longer wore
buttons
.No
matter, they bought and sold buttons,
and the effects on trade were just the same. The
political penalties of war he fairly showed to be
frightful; but when he came to speak of the
domestic
penalties, there was not a dry eye in the house.
Captain Poke blubbered so loud that I was in an
agony lest he should be called to order.
Regard that pure spirit, he cried, crushed as
it has been in the whirlwind of war. Behold her
standing over the sod that covers the hero of his
country, the husband of her virgin affections. In
vain the orphan at her side turns its tearful eye
upward
,
and asks for the plumes that so lately pleased
its infant fancy; in vain its gentle voice inquires
when he is to return, when he is to gladden their
hearts with his presenceBut I can write no more.
Sobs interrupted the speaker, and he took his seat
in an ecstasy of godliness and benevolence.
I hurried across the house, to beg the Brigadier
would introduce me to this just monikin without
a moment's delay. I felt as if I could take him to
my heart at once, and swear an eternal friendship
with a spirit so benevolent. The Brigadier was too
much agitated, at first, to attend to me; but, after
wiping his eyes at least a hundred times, he finally
succeeded in arresting the torrents, and looked
upward
with a bland smile.
Is he not a wonderful monikin?
Wonderful indeed! How completely he puts
us all to shame!Such a monikin can only be
influenced
by the purest love for the species.
Yes, he is of a class that we call the third
monikinity
.
Nothing excites our zeal like the principles
of the class of which he is a member!
How! Have you more than one class of the
humane?
Certainlythe Original, the Representative,
and the Speculative.
I am devoured by the desire to understand the
distinctions, my dear Brigadier.
The Original is an every-day class, that feels
under the natural impulses. The Representative is
a more intellectual division, that feels chiefly by
proxy. The Speculatives are those whose
sympathies
are excited by positive interests, like the last
speaker. This person has lately bought a farm by
the acre, which he is about to sell, in village lots,
by the foot, and war will knock the whole thing in
the head. It is this which stimulates his
benevolence
in so lively a manner.
Why, this is no more than a development of
the social-stake system
I was interrupted by the Speaker, who called the
house to order. The vote on the resolution of the
last orator was to be taken. It read as follows:
Resolved, that it is altogether unbecoming the
dignity and character of Leapthrough, for Leaplow
to legislate on the subject of so petty a consideration
as a certain pitiful treaty between the two
countries
.
Unanimityunanimity! was shouted by fifty
voices. Unanimity there was; and then the whole
house set to work, shaking hands and hugging each
other, in pure joy at the success of the honorable
and ingenious manner in which it had got rid of
this embarrassing and impertinent question.
CHAPTER XII.
An effect of logarithms on moralsAn obscuration, a
dissertation
,
and a calculation.
The
house had not long adjourned before
Captain
Poke and myself were favored with a visit
from our colleague Mr. Downright, who came on
an affair of absorbing interest. He carried in his
hand a small pamphlet; and the usual salutations
were scarcely over, before he directed our attention
16 *
to a portion of its contents. It would seem that
Leaplow was on the eve of experiencing a great
moral eclipse. The periods and dates of the
phenomenon
(if that can be called a phenomenon
which was of too frequent occurrence) had been
calculated, with surprising accuracy, by the
academy
of Leaphigh, and sent, through its minister, as
an especial favor, to our beloved country, in order
that we should not be taken by surprise. The
account
of the affair read as follows:
On the third day of the season of nuts, there
will be the commencement of a great moral eclipse,
in that portion of the monikin region which lies
immediately about the pole. The property in eclipse
will be the great moral postulate usually designated
by the term Principle; and the intervening body
will be the great immoral postulate, usually known
as Interest. The frequent occurrence of the
conjunction
of these two important postulates has
caused our moral mathematicians to be rather
negligent
of their calculations on this subject, of late
years; but, to atone for this inexcusable indifference
to one of the most important concerns of life, the
calculating committee was instructed to pay unusual
attention to all the obscurations of the present year
and this phenomenon, one of the most decided of
our age, has been calculated with the utmost nicety
and care. We give the results.
The eclipse will commence by a motive of
monikin
vanity coming in contact with the
sub-postulate
of charity, at 1 A. M. The postulate in question
will be totally hid from view, in the course of 6 h.
17 m. from the moment of contact. The passage
of a political intrigue will instantly follow, when
the several sub-postulates of truth, honesty,
disinterestedness
and patriotism, will all be obscured in
succession, beginning with the lower limb of the
first, and ending with all the limbs of the whole of
them, in 3 h. 42 m. from the moment of contact.
The shadow of vanity and political intrigue will
first be deepened by the approach of prosperity,
and this will be soon succeeded by the contact of a
great pecuniary interest, at 10 h. 2 m. 1 s.; and in
exactly 2 s. and 3-7 s., the whole of the great
moral postulate of Principle will be totally hid from
view. In consequence of this early passage of the
darkest shadow that is ever cast by Interest, the
passages of the respective shadows of ambition,
hatred
,
jealousy, and all the other minor satellites of
Interest, will be invisible.
The country principally affected by this eclipse
will be the republic of Leaplow, a community whose
known intelligence and virtues are perhaps better
qualified to resist its influence than any other. The
time of occulation will be 9 y. 7 m. 26 d. 4 h. 16
m. 2 s. Principle will begin to reappear to the
moral eye at the end of this period, first by the
approach of Misfortune, whose atmosphere being
much less dense than that of Interest, will allow of
imperfect views of the obscured postulate; but the
radiance of the latter will not be completely restored
until the arrival of Misery, whose chastening
colors invariably permit all truths to be discernible,
although through a sombre medium. To resume:
Beginning of eclipse,
1 A. M.
Ecliptic opposition,
in 4 y. 6 m. 12 d. 9 h. from
beginning of eclipse.
Middle,
in 4 y. 9 m. 0 d. 7. h. 9 m.
from beginning of eclipse.
End of eclipse,
9 y. 11 m. 20 d. 3 h. 2 m.
from beginning.
Period of occultation,
9 y. 7 m. 26 d. 4 h. 16 m. 2 s.
I gazed at the Brigadier in admiration and awe.
There was nothing remarkable in the eclipse itself,
which was quite an every-day affair; but the
precision
with which it had been calculated added to its
other phenomena the terrible circumstance of
obtaining
a glimpse into the future. I now began to
perceive the immense difference between living
consciously under a moral shadow, and living under
it unconsciously. The latter was evidently a trifle
compared to the former. Providence had most
kindly provided for our happiness in denying the
ability to see beyond the present moment.
Noah took the affair even more at heart than
myself. He told me, with a rueful and
prognosticating
countenance, that we were fast drawing near
to the autumnal equinox, when we should reach the
commencement of a natural night of six months'
duration; and although the benevolent substitute of
steam might certainly in some degree lessen the
evil, that it was a furious evil, after all, to exist for
a period so weary without enjoying the light of the
sun. He found the eternal glare of day bad enough,
but he did not believe he should be able to endure
its total absence. Natur' had made him a `watch
and watch' crittur'. As for the twilight of which so
much was said, it was worse than nothin', being
neither one thing nor the other. For his part, he
liked things `made out of whole cloth.' Then he
had sent the ship round to a distant roadstead, in
order that there might be no more post-captains
and rear-admirals among the people; and here had
he been as much as four days on nothing but nuts.
Nuts might do for the philosophy of a monkey, but
he found, on trial, that it played the devil with the
philosophy of a man. Things were bad enough as
they were. He pined for a little porkhe cared
not who knew it; it might not be very sentimental,
he knew, but it was capital sea-food; his natur'
was pretty much pork; he believed most men had,
in some way or other, more or less pork in their
human natur's; nuts might do for monikin natur',
but human natur' loved meat; if monikins did not
like it, monikins need not eat it; there would be so
much the more for those that did like ithe pined
for his natural aliment, and as for living nine years
in an eclipse, it was quite out of the question. The
longest Stunin'tun eclipses seldom went over three
hourshe once knew Deacon Spiteful pray quite
through one, from
apogee
to
perigee
. He therefore
proposed that Sir John and he should resign their
seats without delay, and that they should try to get
the Walrus to the north'ard as quick as possible, lest
they should be caught in the polar night. As for
the Hon. Robert Smut, he wished him no better luck
than to remain where he was all his life, and to
receive his eight dollars a day in acorns.
Although it was impossible not to hear, and,
having
heard, not to record the sentiments of Noah,
still my attention was much more strongly attracted
by the demeanor of the Brigadier, than by the
jeremiad
of the sealer. To an anxious inquiry if he
were not well, our worthy colleague answered
plaintively, that he mourned over the misfortune of
his country.
I have often witnessed the passage of the
passions
,
and of the minor motives, across the disk of
the great moral postulate, Principle; but an
occultation
of its light by a Pecuniary Interest, and for
so long a period, is fearful! Heaven only knows
what will become of us!
Are not these eclipses, after all, so many mere
illustrations of the social-stake system? I confess
this occultation, of which you seem to have so much
dread, is not so formidable a thing, on reflection, as
it at first appeared to be.
You are quite right, Sir John, as to the
character
of the eclipse itself, which, as a matter of
course, must depend on the character of the
intervening
body. But the wisest and best of our
philosophers
hold that the entire system of which we
are but insignificant parts, is based on certain
immutable
truths of a divine origin. The premises, or
postulates, of all these truths, are so many moral
guides in the management of monikin affairs; and,
the moment they are lost sight of, as will be the
case during these frightful nine years that are to
come, we shall be abandoned entirely to selfishness.
Now selfishness is only too formidable when
restrained
by Principle; but, left to its own grasping
desires and audacious sophisms, to me the moral
perspective is terrible. We are only too much
addicted
to turn our eyes from Principle, when it is
shining in heavenly radiance, and in full glory,
before us; it is not difficult, therefore, to foresee
the nature of the consequences which are to follow
its total and protracted obscuration.
You then conceive there is a rule superior to
interest, which ought to be respected in the control
of monikin affairs?
Beyond a doubt; else in what should we differ
from the beasts of prey?
I do not exactly see whether this does, or does
not, accord with the notions of the political
economists
of the social-stake system.
As you say, Sir John, it does, and it does not.
Your social-stake system supposes that he who has
what is termed a distinct and prominent interest in
society, will be the most likely to conduct its affairs
wisely, justly, and disinterestedly. This would be
true, if those great principles which lie at the root
of all happiness were respected; but unluckily, the
stake in question, instead of being a stake in
justice
and virtue, is usually reduced to be merely a
stake in property. Now, all experience shows that
the great property-incentives are to increase
property
,
protect property, and to buy with property,
those advantages which ought to be independent of
property, viz. honors, dignities, power and
immunities
.
I cannot say how it is with men, but our
histories are eloquent on this head. We have had
the property-principle carried out thoroughly in our
practice, and the result has shown that its chief
operation is to render property as intact as
possible
,
and the bones, and sinews, and marrow of all
who do not possess it, its slaves. In short, the time
has been, when the rich were even exempt from
contributing
to the ordinary exigencies of the state.
But it is quite useless to theorize on this subject, for,
by that cry in the streets, the lower limb of the great
postulate is beginning to be obscured, and, alas! we
shall soon have too much practical information.
The Brigadier was right. On referring to the
clocks, it was found that, in truth, the eclipse had
commenced some time before, and that we were
on the verge of an absolute occultation of
Principle
,
by the basest and most sordid of all motives,
Pecuniary Interest.
The first proof that was given of the true state
of things, was in the language of the people. The
word interest was in every monikin's mouth, while
the word principle, as indeed was no more than
suitable, seemed to be quite blotted out of the
Leaplow
vocabulary. To render a local term into
English, half of the vernacular of the country
appeared
to be compressed into the single word
dollar
.
Dollardollardollarnothing but
dollar
!
Fifty thousand dollarstwenty thousand
dollarsa hundred thousand dollarsmet one at
every turn. The words rang at the cornersin the
public waysat the exchangein the
drawing-rooms
ay,
even in the churches. If a temple had
been reared for the worship of the Creator, the first
question was, how much did it cost?If an artist
submitted the fruits of his labors to the taste of his
fellow-citizens, conjectures were whispered among
the spectators, touching its value in the current
coin of the republic.If an author presented the
offspring of his genius to the same arbiters, its
merits were settled by a similar standard; and one
divine, who had made a strenuous, but an ill-timed
appeal to the charity of his countrymen, by setting
forth the beauties as well as the rewards of the
god-like property, was fairly put down by a
demonstration
that his proposition involved a considerable
outlay, while it did not clearly show much was to
be gained by going to heaven!
Brigadier Downright had good reasons for his
sombre anticipations, for all the acquirements,
knowledge
,
and experience, obtained in many years of
travel, were now found to be worse than useless.
If my honorable colleague and co-voyager ventured
a remark on the subject of foreign policy, a portion
of politics to which he had given considerable
attention
,
it was answered by a quotation from the
stock-market
;
an observation on a matter of taste was
certain to draw forth a nice distinction between the
tastes of certain liquors, together with a shrewd
investigation
of their several prices; and once, when
the worthy monikin undertook to show, from what
struck me to be singularly good data, that the foreign
relations of the country were in a condition to
require
great firmness, a proper prudence, and much
foresight, he was completely silenced by an
antagonist
showing, from the last sales, the high value
of lots up-town!
In short, there was no dealing with any subject
that could not resolve itself into dollars, by means
of the customary exchanges. The infatuation spread
from father to son; from husband to wife; from
brother to sister, and from one collateral to
another
,
until it pretty effectually assailed the whole
of what is usually termed society. Noah swore
bitterly at this antagonist state of things. He
affirmed
that he could not even crack a walnut in a
corner, but every monikin that passed appeared to
grudge him the satisfaction, small as it was; and
that Stunin'tun, though a scramble-penny place as
any he knew, was paradise to Leaplow, in the
present state of things.
It was melancholy to remark how the lustre of
the ordinary virtues grew dim, as the period of
occultation
continued, and the eye gradually got to be
accustomed to the atmosphere cast by the shadow
of Pecuniary Interest. I involuntarily shuddered
at the open and undisguised manner in which
individuals
,
who might otherwise pass for respectable
monikins, spoke of the means that they habitually
employed in effecting their objects, and laid bare their
utter forgetfulness of the great postulate that was
hid. One coolly vaunted how much cleverer he was
than the law; another proved to demonstration that
he had outwitted his neighbor; while a third, more
daring or more expert, applied the same grounds
of exultation to the entire neighborhood. This had
the merit of cunning; that of dissimulation; another
of deception, and all of success!
The shadow cast its malign influence on every
interest connected with monikin life. Temples were
raised to God on speculation; the government was
perverted to a money-investment, in which profit,
and not justice and security, was the object; holy
wedlock fast took the aspect of buying and selling,
and few prayed who did not identify spiritual
benefits
with gold and silver.
The besetting propensity of my ancestor soon
began to appear in Leaplow. Many of these pure
Vol. II. 17
and unsophisticated republicans shouted Property
is in danger! as stoutly as it was ever roared by
Sir Joseph Job, and dark allusions were made to
revolutions and bayonets. But certain proof
of the prevalence of the eclipse, and that the shadow
of Pecuniary Interest lay dark on the land, was to
be found in the language of what are called the
few. They began to throw dirt at all opposed
to them, like so many fish-women; a sure symptom
that the spirit of selfishness was thoroughly
awakened
.
From much experience, I hold this sign
to be infallible that the sentiment of aristocracy is
active and vigilant. I never yet visited a country
in which a minority got into its head the crotchet
it was alone fit to dictate to the rest of its
fellow-creatures
,
that it did not, without delay, set about
proving its position, by reviling and calling names.
In this particular the few are like women, who,
conscious of their weakness, seldom fail to make
up for the want of vigor in their limbs, by having
recourse to the vigor of the tongue. The one
hangs; the many command by the dignity of
force; the few vituperate and scold. This is, I
believe, the case all over the world, except in those
peculiar instances, in which the few happen also
to enjoy the privilege of hanging.
It is worthy of remark that the terms rabble,
disorganizers, jacobins, and agrarians
[4]
[4]
It is scarcely necessary to tell the intelligent reader
there is no proof that any political community was ever so
bent on self-destruction as to enact agrarian laws, in the
vulgar
sense in which it has suited the arts of narrow-minded
politicians to represent them ever since the revival of letters.
The celebrated agrarian laws of Rome did not essentially
differ
from the distribution of our own military lands, or perhaps
the similitude is greater to the modern Russian military
colonies
.
Those who feel an interest in this subject would do
well to consult Niebuhr.
Note by the Editor
.
were
bandied from one to the other, in Leaplow, under
this malign influence, with precisely the same
justice
,
discrimination and taste, as they had been used
by my ancestor in London, a few years before.
Like causes notoriously produce like effects; and
there is no one thing so much like an Englishman
under the property-fever, as a Leaplow monikin
suffering under the same malady.
The effect produced on the state of parties by
the passage of the shadow of Pecuniary Interest,
was so singular as to deserve our notice. Patriots
who had long been known for an indomitable
resolution
to support their friends, openly abandoned their
claims on the rewards of the little wheel, and went
over to the enemy; and this, too, without recourse
to the mysteries of the flap-jack. Judge People's
Friend was completely annihilated for the moment
so much so, indeed, as to think seriously of taking
another missionfor, during these eclipses, long
service
,
public virtue, calculated amenity, and all the
other bland qualities of your patriot, pass for nothing,
when weighed in the scale against profit and loss.
It was fortunate the Leapthrough question was, in its
essence, so well disposed of, though the uneasiness
of those who bought and sold land by the inch,
pushed even that interest before the public again,
by insisting that a few millions should be expended
in destroying the munitions of war, lest the nation
might improvidently be tempted to make use of
them in the natural way. The cruisers were
accordingly
hauled into the stream and converted
into tide-mills, the gun-barrels were transformed
into gas-pipes, and the forts were converted, as fast
as possible, into warehouses and tea-gardens. After
this, it was much the fashion to affirm that the
advanced state of civilization had rendered all future
wars quite out of the question. Indeed, the impetus
that was given, by the effects of the shadow, in this
way, to humanity in gross, was quite as
remarkable
as were its contrary tendencies on humanity
in detail.
Public opinion was not backward in showing how
completely it was acting under the influence of the
shadow. Virtue began to be estimated by rent-rolls.
The affluent, without hesitation, or, indeed,
opposition
,
appropriated to themselves the sole use of the
word respectable, while taste, judgment, honesty,
and wisdom, dropped like so many heir-looms
quietly into the possession of those who had money.
The Leaplowers are a people of great acuteness,
and of singular knowledge of details. Every
considerable
man in Bivouac soon had his social station
assigned him, the whole community being divided
into classes, of hundred-thousand-dollar monikins
fifty-thousand-dollar monikins
twenty-thousand-dollar
monikins. Great conciseness in
language
was a consequence of this state of feeling.
The old questions of `is he honest?' `is he capable?'
`is he enlightened?' `is he wise?' `is he good?'
being all comprehended in the single interrogatory
of `is he rich?'
There was one effect of this very unusual state
of things, that I had not anticipated. All the
money-getting
classes, without exception, showed a
singular
predilection in favor of what is commonly called
a strong government; and Leaplow being not only
a republic, but virtually a democracy, I found that
much the larger portion of this highly respectable
class of citizens, was not at all backward in
expressing
its wish for a change.
How is this? I demanded of the Brigadier,
whom I rarely quitted; for his advice and opinions
were of great moment to me, just at this particular
crisishow is this, my good friend?I have
always been led to think that trade is especially
favorable to liberty; and here are all your
commercial
interests the loudest in their declamations
against the institutions.
The Brigadier smiled; it was but a melancholy
smile, after all; for his spirits appeared to have
quite deserted him.
There are three great divisions among
politicians
,
he said;they who do not like liberty at
allthey who like it, as low down as their own
particular classand they who like it, for the sake
of their fellow-creatures. The first are not
numerous
,
but powerful by means of combinations; the
second is a very irregular corps, including, as a
matter of course, nearly every body, but is
wanting
,
of necessity, in concert and discipline, since no
one descends below his own level; the third are but
few, alas, how few! and are composed of those
who look beyond their own selfishness. Now, your
merchants, dwelling in towns, and possessing
concert
,
means, and identity of interests, have been
able to make themselves remarkable for contending
with despotic power, a fact which has obtained for
them a cheap reputation for liberality of opinion;
but, so far as monikin experience goesmen may
have proved to be better disposedno government
that is essentially influenced by commerce has ever
been otherwise than exclusive, or aristocratic.
I bethought me of Venice, Genoa, Pisa, the Hanse
Towns, and all the other remarkable places of this
character in Europe, and I felt the justice of my
friend's distinction, at the same time I could not
but observe how much more the minds of men
are under the influence of names and abstractions,
than under the influence of positive things. To
this opinion the Brigadier very readily assented,
remarking, at the same time, that a well-wrought
17 *
theory had generally more effect on opinion than
fifty facts; a result that he attributed to the
circumstance
of monikins having a besetting predisposition
to save themselves the trouble of thinking.
I was, in particular, struck with the effect of the
occultation of Principle on motives. I had often
remarked that it was by no means safe to depend
on one's own motives, for two sufficient reasons;
first, that we did not always know what our own
motives were; and secondly, admitting that we did,
it was quite unreasonable to suppose that our
friends would believe them what we thought them
to be ourselves. In the present instance, every
monikin seemed perfectly aware of the difficulty;
and, instead of waiting for his acquaintances to
attribute some moral enormity as his governing
reason, he prudently adopted a moderately selfish
inducement for his acts, which he proclaimed with
a simplicity and frankness that generally obtained
credit. Indeed, the fact once conceded that the
motive was not offensively disinterested and just,
no one was indisposed to listen to the projects of
his friend, who usually rose in estimation, as he was
found to be ingenious, calculating and shrewd.
The effect of all this was to render society
singularly
sincere and plain-spoken; and one
unaccustomed
to so much ingenuousness, or who was
ignorant of the cause, might, plausibly enough,
suppose, at times, that accident had thrown him into
an extraordinary association with so many
artistes
,
who, as it is commonly expressed, live by their wits.
I will avow that, had it been the fashion to wear
pockets at Leaplow, I should often have been
concerned
for their contents; for sentiments so purely
unsophisticated, were so openly advanced under the
influence of the shadow, that one was inevitably
led, oftener than was pleasant, to think of the
relations
between
meum
and
tuum
, as well as of the
unexpected causes by which they were sometimes
disturbed.
A vacancy occurred, the second day of the
eclipse, among the representatives of Bivouac, and
the candidate of the Horizontals would certainly
have been chosen to fill it, but for a
contre-tems
connected with this affair of motives. The individual
in question had lately performed that which, in most
other countries, and under other circumstances,
would have passed for an act of creditable national
feeling; but which, quite as a matter of course, was
eagerly presented to the electors, by his opponents,
as a proof of his utter unfitness to be intrusted with
their interests. The friends of the candidate took
the alarm, and indignantly denied the charges of
the Perpendiculars, affirming that their monikin
had been well paid for what he had done. In an
evil hour, the candidate undertook to explain, by
means of a handbill, in which he stated that he had
been influenced by no other motive than a desire
to do that which he believed to be right. Such a
person was deemed to be wanting in natural
abilities
,
and, as a matter of course, he was defeated;
for your Leaplow elector was not such an ass as to
confide the care of his interests to one who knew
so little how to take care of his own.
About this time, too, a celebrated dramatist
produced
a piece in which the hero performed
prodigies
under the excitement of patriotism, and the
labor of his pen was incontinently damned for his
pains; both pit and boxesthe galleries dissenting
deciding that it was out of all nature to represent a
monikin incurring danger, in this unheard-of
manner
,
without a motive. The unhappy wight altered
the last scene, by causing his hero to be rewarded
by a good, round sum of money, when the piece
had a very respectable run for the rest of the
season
,
though I question if it ever were as popular as
it would have been, had this precaution been taken
before it was first acted.
CHAPTER XIII.
The importance of motives to a legislatorMoral
consecutiveness
,
comets, kites, and a convoy; with some every-day
legislation; together with cause and effect.
Legislation
, during the occultation of the great
moral postulate Principle by the passage of
Pecuniary
Interest, is, at the best, but a melancholy
affair. It proved to be peculiarly so with us just
at that moment, for the radiance of the divine
property had been a good deal obscured, in the
houses, for a long time previously, by the
interference
of various minor satellites. In nothing,
therefore, did the deplorable state of things which
existed make itself more apparent, than in our
proceedings.
As Captain Poke and myself, notwithstanding
our having taken different stands in politics, still
continued to live together, I had better
opportunities
to note the workings of the obscuration on the
ingenuous mind of my colleague than on that of
most other persons. He early began to keep a diary
of his expenses, regularly deducting the amount at
night from the sum of eight dollars, and regarding
the balance as so much clear gain. His
conversation
,
too, soon betrayed a leaning to his personal
interests
,
instead of being of that pure and elevated
cast which should characterize the language of a
statesman. He laid down the position, pretty
dogmatically
,
that legislation, after all, was work; that
the laborer was worthy of his hire; and that, for
his part, he felt no great disposition to go through
the vexation and trouble of helping to make laws,
unless he could see, with a reasonable certainty,
that something was to be got by it. He thought
Leaplow had quite laws enough as it wasmore
than she respected or enforcedand if she wanted
any more, all she had to do was to pay for them.
He should take an early occasion to propose that
all our wagesor, at any rate, his own; others
might do as they pleasedshould be raised, at the
very least, two dollars a day, and this while he
merely sat in the house; for he wished to engage
me to move, by way of amendment, that as much
more should be given to the committees. He did
not think it was fair to exact of a member to be a
committee-man for nothin', although most of them
were committee-men for nothin'; and if we were
called on to keep two watches, in this manner, the
least that could be done would be to give us
two
pays
. He said, considering it in the most favorable
point of view, that there was great wear and tear
of brain in legislation, and he should never be the
man he was before he engaged in the trade; he
assured me that his idees, sometimes, were so
complicated
that he did not know where to find the one
he wanted, and that he had wished for a
cauda
, a
thousand times, since he had been in the house, for,
by keeping the end of it in his hand, like the bight
of a rope, he might always have suthin' tangible
to cling to. He told me, as a great secret, that he
was fairly tired of rummaging among his thoughts
for the knowledge necessary to understand what
was going on, and that he had finally concluded to
put himself, for the rest of the session, under the
convoy of a God-like. He had been looking out for
a fit fugleman of this sort, and he had pretty much
determined to follow the signals of the great
God-like
of the Parpendic'lars, like the rest of them, for
it would occasion less confusion in the ranks, and
enable him to save himself a vast deal of trouble,
in making up his mind. He didn't know, on the
whole, but eight dollars a day might give a living
profit, provided he could throw all the thinking on
his God-like, and turn his attention to suthin' else; he
thought of writing his v'y'ges, for he understood
that anything from foreign parts took like wild-fire
in Leaplow; and if they didn't take, he could always
project charts for a living.
Perhaps it will be necessary to explain what
Noah meant by saying that he thought of engaging
a God-like. The reader has had some insight into
the nature of one set of political leaders in
Leaplow
,
who are known by the name of the Most
Patriotic Patriots. These persons, it is scarcely
necessary to say, are always with the majority, or
in a situation to avail themselves of the evolutions
of the little wheel. Their great rotatory principle
keeps them pretty constantly in motion, it Is true;
but while there is a centrifugal force to maintain
this action, great care has been had to provide a
centripetal counterpoise, in order to prevent them
from bolting out of the political orbit. It is supposed
to be owing to this peculiarity in their party
organizations
,
that your Leaplow patriot is so very
remarkable for going round and round a subject,
without ever touching it.
As an off-set to this party arrangement, the
Perpendiculars
have taken refuge in the God-likes. A
God-like, in Leaplow politics, in some respects
resembles
a saint in the Catholic calendar; that is to
say, he is canonized, after passing through a certain
amount of temptation and vice with a whole skin;
after having his cause pleaded for a certain number
of years before the high authorities of his party;
and, usually, after having had a pretty good taste
of purgatory. Canonization attained, however, all
gets to be plain sailing with him. He is spared,
singular as it may appear, even a large portion of
his former wear and tear of brains, as Noah had
termed it, for nothing puts one so much at liberty in
this respect, as to have full powers to do all the
thinking
.
Thinking in company, like travelling in
company
,
requires that we should have some respect to
the movements, wishes and opinions of others; but
he who gets a
carte blanche
for his sentiments,
resembles the uncaged bird, and may fly in
whatever
direction most pleases himself, and feel
confident
,
as he goes, that his ears will be saluted with
the usual traveller's signal of all's right. I can
best compare the operation of your God-like and his
votaries, to the action of a locomotive with its
rail-road
train. As that goes, this follows; faster or
slower, the movement is certain to be
accompanied
;
when the steam is up they fly, when the fire
is out they crawl, and that, too, with a very uneasy
sort of motion; and when a bolt is broken, they
who have just been riding without the smallest
trouble to themselves, are compelled to get out and
push the load ahead as well as they can, frequently
with very rueful faces, and in very dirty ways.
The cars whisk about, precisely as the locomotive
whisks about, all the turn-outs are necessarily
imitated
,
and, in short, one goes after the other very
much as it is reasonable to suppose will happen
when two bodies are chained together, and the
entire moving power is given to only one of them.
A God-like in Leaplow, moreover, is usually a
Riddle
.
It was the object of Noah to hitch on to one of
these moral steam-tugs, in order that he too might
be dragged through his duties without effort to
himself; an expedient, as the old sealer expressed
it, that would, in some degree, remedy his natural
want of a
cauda
, by rendering him nothing but tail.
I expect, Sir John, he said, for he had a
practice
of expecting by way of conjecture, I expect
this is the reason why the Leaplowers dock
themselves
.
They find it more convenient to give up
the management of their affairs to some one of
these God-likes, and fall into his wake like the tail of
a comet, which makes it quite unnecessary to have
any other
cauda
.
I understand you; they amputate to prevent
tautology.
Noah rarely spoke of any project until his mind
was fairly made up; and the execution usually soon
followed the proposition. The next thing I heard
of him, therefore, he was fairly under the convoy,
as he called it, of one of the most prominent of the
Riddles. Curious to know how he liked the
experiment
,
after a week's practice, I called his attention
to the subject, by a pretty direct inquiry.
He told me it was altogether the pleasantest
mode of legislating that had ever been devised. He
was now perfectly master of his own time, and
in fact, he was making out a set of charts for the
Leaplow marine, a task that was likely to bring
him in a good round sum, as pumpkins were cheap,
and in the polar seas he merely copied the monikin
authorities, and out of it he had things pretty much
his own way. As for the Great Allegory, when he
wanted a hint about it, or, indeed, about any other
point at issue, all he had to do was to inquire what
his God-like thought about it, and to vote
accordingly
.
Then he saved himself a great deal of breath
in the way of argument out of doors, for he and
the rest of the
clientelle
of this Riddle, having
officially
invested their patron with all their own parts,
the result had been such an accumulation of
knowledge
in this one individual, as enabled them
ordinarily
to floor any antagonist by the simple quotation
of his authority. Such or such is the opinion of
God-like this or of God-like that, was commonly
sufficient; and then there was no lack of material,
for he had taken care to provide himself with a
Riddle who, he really believed, had given an
opinion
,
at some time or other, on every side of every
subject that had ever been mooted in Leaplow. He
could nullify, or mollify, or qualify, with the best of
them; and these, which he termed the three
fies
, he
believed were the great requisites of a Leaplow
legislator. He admitted, however, that some show
of independence was necessary, in order to give
value to the opinions of even a God-like, for
monikin
nature revolted at anything like total mental
dependence; and that he had pretty much made
up his mind to think for himself on a question that
was to be decided that very day.
The case to which the Captain alluded was this.
The city of Bivouac was divided into three pretty
nearly equal parts, which were separated from each
other by two branches of a marsh; one part of the
town being on a sort of island, and the other two
parts on the respective margins of the low land.
It was very desirable to connect these different
portions
of the capital by causeways, and a law to that
effect had been introduced in the house.
Everybody
,
in or out of the house, was in favor of the
project, for the causeways had become, in some
measure, indispensable. The only disputed point
was the length of the works in question. One who
is but little acquainted with legislation, and who has
never witnessed the effects of an occultation of
Vol. II. 18
the great moral postulate Principle, by the orb of
Pecuniary Interest, would very plausibly suppose
that the whole affair lay in a nut-shell, and that all
we had to do was to pass a law ordering the
causeways
to extend just as far as the public
convenience
rendered it necessary. But these are mere
tyros in the affairs of monikins. The fact was
that there were just as many different opinions and
interests at work to regulate the length of the
causeways
,
as there were owners of land along their line
of route. The great object was to start in what was
called the business quarter of the town, and then to
proceed with the work as far as circumstances
would allow. We had propositions before us in
favor of from one hundred feet as far as up to ten
thousand. Every inch was fought for with as much
obstinacy as if it were an important breach that
was defended; and combinations and conspiracies
were as rife as if we were in the midst of a
revolution
.
It was the general idea that by filling in with
dirt, a new town might be built wherever the
causeway
terminated, and fortunes made by an act of
parliament. The inhabitants of the island rallied
en
masse
against the causeway leading one inch
from
their quarter, after it had fairly reached it; and, so
throughout the entire line, monikins battled for what
they called their interests, with an obstinacy worthy
of heroes.
On this great question, for it had, in truth, become
of the last importance by dragging into its
consideration
most of the leading measures of the day, as
well as six or seven of the principal ordinances of
the Great National Allegory, the respective
partisans
logically contending that, for the time being,
nothing should advance a foot in Leaplow that did
not travel along that causeway, Noah determined
to take an independent stand. This resolution was
not lightly formed, for he remained rather
undecided
,
until, by waiting a sufficient time, he felt
quite persuaded that nothing was to be got by
following
any other course. His God-like luckily was
in the same predicament, and everything promised
a speedy occasion to show the world what it was to
act on principle; and this, too, in the middle of a
moral eclipse.
When the question came to be discussed, the
landholders along the first line of the causeway
were soon reasoned down by the superior interests
of those who lived on the island. The rub was the
point of permitting the work to go any further.
The islanders manifested great liberality, according
to their account of themselves; for they even
consented
that the causeway should be constructed on
the other marsh to precisely such a distance as would
enable any one to go as near as possible to the
hostile
quarter, without absolutely entering it. To
admit the latter, they proved to demonstration,
would be changing the character of their own
island from that of an
entrept
to that of a mere
thoroughfare. No reasonable monikin could
expect
it of them.
As the Horizontals, by some calculation that I
never understood, had satisfied themselves it might
better answer their purposes to construct the entire
work, than to stop anywhere between the two
extremes, my duty was luckily, on this occasion, in
exact accordance with my opinions; and, as a
matter of course, I voted, this time, in a way of
which I could approve. Noah, finding himself a free
agent, now made his push for character, and took
sides with us. Very fortunately we prevailed, all
the beaten interests joining themselves, at the last
moment, to the weakest side, or, in other words, to
that which was right; and Leaplow presented the
singular spectacle of having a just enactment passed
during the occultation of the great moral postulate,
so often named. I ought to mention that I have
termed principle a postulate, throughout this
narrative
,
simply because it is usually in the dilemma of
a disputed proposition.
No sooner was the result known, than my
worthy
colleague came round to the Horizontal side
of the house, to express his satisfaction with
himself
for the course he had just taken. He said it
was certainly very convenient and very
labor-saving
to obey a God-like, and that he got on much
better with his charts now he was at liberty to give
his whole mind to the subject; but there was suthin'
he didn't know whatbut a sort of Stunin'tun
feeling in doing what one thought right, after all,
that caused him to be glad that he had voted for
the whole causeway. He did not own any land in
Leaplow, and, therefore, he concluded that what he
had done, he had done for the best; at any rate, if
he had got nothin' by it, he had lost nothin' by it,
and he hoped all would come right in the end. The
people of the island, it is true, had talked pretty fair
about what they would do for those who should
sustain their interests, but he had got sick of a
currency
in promises; and fair words, at his time of
life, didn't go for much; and so, on the whole, he
had pretty much concluded to do as he had done.
He thought no one could call in question his vote,
for he was just as poor and as badly off now he had
voted, as he was while he was making up his mind.
For his part, he shouldn't be ashamed, hereafter,
to look both Deacon Snort and the Parson in the
face, when he got home, or even Miss Poke. He
knew what it was to have a clean conscience, as
well as any man; for none so well knew what it
was to be without anything, as they who had felt
by experience its want. His God-like was a very
labor-saving God-like; but he had found, on inquiry,
that he came from another part of the island, and
that he didn't care a straw which way his kite-tail
(Noah's manner of pronouncing
clientelle
) voted.
In short, he defied any one say aught ag'in him
this time, and he was not sorry the occasion had
offered to show his independence, for his enemies
had not been backward in remarking that, for some
days, he had been little better than a
speaking-trumpet
to roar out anything his God-like might
wish to have proclaimed. He concluded by stating
that he could not hold out much longer without
meat of some sort or other, and by begging that I
would second a resolution he thought of offering, by
which regular substantial rations were to be dealt
out to all the human part of the house. The
inhumans
might live upon nuts still, if they liked them.
I remonstrated against the project of the rations
made a strong appeal to his pride, by demonstrating
that we should be deemed little better than brutes
if we were seen eating flesh, and advised him to
cause some of his nuts to be roasted, by way of
variety. After a good deal of persuasion, he
promised
further abstinence, although he went away
with a singularly carnivorous look about the mouth,
and an eye that spoke
pork
in every glance.
I was at home the next day, busy with my friend
the Brigadier, in looking over the Great National
Allegory, with a view to prevent falling,
unwittingly
,
into any more offences of quoting its
opinions
,
when Noah burst into the room, as rabid as a
wolf that had been bitten by a whole pack of
hounds. Such, indeed, was, in some measure, his
situation; for, according to his statement, he had
been baited that morning, in the public streets even,
by every monikin, monikina, monikino, brat and
beggar
,
18 *
that he had seen. Astonished to hear that my
colleague had fallen into this disfavor with his
constituents
,
I was not slow in asking an explanation.
The Captain affirmed that the matter was beyond
the reach of any explanation it was in his power to
give. He had voted in the affair of the causeway,
in strict conformity with the dictates of his
conscience
,
and yet here was the whole population
accusing him of briberynay, even the journals
had openly flouted at him for what they called his
barefaced and flagrant corruption. Here the
Captain
laid before us six or seven of the leading
journals
of Bivouac, in all of which his late vote was
treated with quite as little ceremony as if it had
been an unequivocal act of sheep-stealing.
I looked at my friend the Brigadier for an
explanation
.
After running his eye over the articles in
the journals, the latter smiled, and cast a look of
commiseration at our colleague.
You have certainly committed a grave fault
here, my friend, he said, and one that is seldom
forgiven in Leaplowperhaps I might say never,
during the occultation of the great moral postulate,
as happens to be the case at present.
Tell me my sins at once, Brigadier, cried
Noah, with the look of a martyr, and put me out
of pain.
You have forgotten to display a
motive
for your
stand during the late hot discussion; and, as a
matter
of course, the community ascribes the worst
that monikin ingenuity can devise. Such an
oversight
would ruin even a God-like!
But, my dear Mr. Downright, I kindly
interposed
,
our colleague, in this instance, is supposed
to have acted on principle.
The Brigadier looked up, turning his nose into
the air, like a pup that has not yet opened its
eyes, and then intimated that he could not see the
quality I had named, it being obscured by the
passage
of the orb of Pecuniary Interest before its
disk. I now began to comprehend the case, which
really was much more grave than, at first, I could
have believed possible. Noah himself seemed
staggered
;
for, I believe, he had fallen on the simple
and natural expedient of inquiring what he himself
would have thought of the conduct of a colleague
who had given a vote on a subject so weighty,
without
exposing a motive.
Had the Captain owned but a foot square of
earth, at the end of the causeway, observed the
Brigadier, mournfully, the matter might be cleared
up; but as things are, it is, beyond dispute, a most
unfortunate occurrence.
But Sir John voted with me, and he is no more
a freeholder in Leaplow, than I am myself.
True; but Sir John voted with the bulk of his
political friends.
All the Horizontals were not in the majority;
for at least twenty went, on this occasion, with the
minority.
Undeniableyet every monikin of them had a
visible
motive
. This owned a lot by the way-side;
that had houses on the island, and another was the
heir of a great proprietor at the same point of the
road. Each and all had their distinct and positive
interests at stake, and not one of them was guilty
of so great a weakness as to leave his cause to be
defended by the extravagant pretension of mere
Principle!
My God-like, the greatest of all the Riddles,
absented himself, and did not vote at all.
Simply because he had no good ground to
justify any course he might take. No public
monikin
can expect to escape censure, if he fail to put
his friends in the way of citing some plausible and
intelligible motive for his conduct.
How, sir! cannot a man, once in his life, do
an act without being bought like a horse or a dog,
and escape with an inch of character?
I shall not take upon myself to say what
men
can do, returned the Brigadier; no doubt they
manage this affair better than it is managed here;
but, so far as monikins are concerned, there is no
course more certain to involve a total loss of
character
I
may say so destructive to reputation even
for intellectas to act without a good, apparent
and substantial
motive
.
In the name of God, what is to be done,
Brigadier
?
I see no other course than to resign. Your
constituents
must very naturally have lost all
confidence
in you; for one who so very obviously
neglects
his own interests, it cannot be supposed will
be very tenacious about protecting the interests of
others. If you would escape with the little
character
that is left, you will forthwith resign. I do not
perceive the smallest chance for you by going
through Gyration No. 4, both public opinions
uniformly
condemning the monikin who acts without
a pretty obvious, as well as a pretty weighty,
motive
.
Noah made a merit of necessity; and, after some
further deliberation between us, he signed his name
to the following letter to the Speaker, which was
drawn up on the spot, by the Brigadier.
Mr. Speaker
:The state of my health obliges me to
return the high political trust which has been confided to me
by the citizens of Bivouac, into the hands from which it was
received. In tendering my resignation, I wish to express the
great regret with which I part from colleagues so every way
worthy of profound respect and esteem, and I beg you to
assure them, that wherever fate may hereafter lead me,
I shall ever retain the deepest regard for every honorable
member with whom it has been my good fortune to serve.
The emigrant interest, in particular, will ever be the nearest
and dearest to my heart.
Signed, NOAH POKE.
The Captain did not affix his name to this
letter
without many heavy sighs, and divers throes
of ambition; for even a mistaken politician yields
to necessity with regret. Having changed the
word emigrant to that of immigrunt, however,
he put as good a face as possible on the matter,
and wrote the fatal signature. He then left the
house, declaring that he didn't so much begrudge
his successor the pay, as nothing but nuts were to
be had with the money; and that, as for himself, he
felt as sneaking as he believed was the case with
Nebuchadnezzar, when he was compelled to get
down on all-fours, and eat grass.
CHAPTER XIV.
Some explanationsA human appetiteA dinner, and a
bonne bouche
.
The
Brigadier and myself remained behind to
discuss the general bearings of this unexpected
event.
Your rigid demand for motives, my good sir,
I remarked, reduces the Leaplow political
morality
very much, after all, to the level of the
social-stake
system of our part of the world.
They both depend on the crutch of personal
interests, it is true; though there is, between them,
the difference of the interests of a part and of the
interests of the whole.
And could a part act less commendably than
the whole appear to have acted in this instance?
You forget that Leaplow, just at this moment,
is under a moral eclipse. I shall not say that these
eclipses do not occur often, but they occur quite as
frequently in other parts of the region, as they occur
here. We have three great modes of controlling
monikin affairs, viz. the one, the few, and the
many
Precisely the same classification exists among
men! I interrupted.
Some of our improvements are reflected
backwards
;
twilight following as well as preceding the
passage of the sun, quite coolly returned the
Brigadier
.
We think that the many come nearest to
balancing the evil, although we are far from
believing
even them to be immaculate. Admitting
that the tendencies to wrong are equal in the three
systems, (which we do not, however, for we think
our own has the least,) it is contended that the
many escape one great source of oppression and
injustice, by escaping the onerous provisions which
physical weakness is compelled to make, in order
to protect itself against physical strength.
This is reversing a very prevalent opinion
among men, sir, who usually maintain that the
tyranny of the many is the worst sort of all
tyrannies
.
This opinion has got abroad simply because the
lion has not been permitted to draw his own picture.
As cruelty is commonly the concomitant of
cowardice
,
so is oppression nine times out of ten the result
of weakness. It is natural for the few to dread the
many, while it is not natural for the many to dread
the few. Then, under institutions in which the
many rule, certain great principles that are founded
on natural justice, as a matter of course, are openly
recognized; and it is rare, indeed, that they do not,
more or less, influence the public acts. On the other
hand, the control of a few requires that these same
truths should be either mistified or entirely
smothered
;
and the consequence is injustice.
But, admitting all your maxims, Brigadier, as
regards the few and the many, you must yourself
allow that here, in your beloved Leaplow itself,
monikins consult their own interests; and this, after
all, is acting on the fundamental principle of the
great European social-stake system.
Meaning that the goods of the world ought to
be the test of political power. By the sad confusion
which exists among us, at this moment, Sir John,
you must perceive that we are not exactly under
the most salutary of all possible influences. I take
it that the great desideratum of society is to be
governed by certain great moral truths. The
inferences
and corollaries of these truths are principles,
which come of heaven. Now, agreeably to the
monikin dogmas, the love of money is `of the earth,
earthy;' and, at the first blush, it would not seem
to be quite safe to receive such an inducement as
the governing motive of one monikin, and, by a
pretty fair induction, it would seem to be equally
unwise to admit it for a good many. You will
remember, also, that when none but the rich have
authority, they control not only their own property,
but that of others who have less. Your principle
supposes, that in taking care of his own, the elector
of wealth must take care of what belongs to the
rest of the community; but our experience shows
that a monikin can be particularly careful of
himself
,
and singularly negligent of his neighbor.
Therefore
do we hold that money is a bad foundation for
power.
You unsettle everything, Brigadier, without
finding a substitute.
Simply because it is easy to unsettle everything,
and very difficult to find substitutes. But, as
respects
the base of society, I merely doubt the wisdom
of setting up a qualification that we all know depends
on an unsound principle. I much fear, Sir John,
that, so long as monikins are monikins, we shall
never be quite perfect; and as to your social-stake
system, I am of opinion that as society is composed
of all, it may be well to hear what all have to say
about its management.
Many men, and, I dare say, many monikins,
are not to be trusted even with the management of
their own concerns.
Very true; but it does not follow that other
men, or other monikins, will lose sight of their own
interests on this account, if vested with the right
to act as their substitutes. You have been long
enough a legislator, now, to have got some idea
how difficult it is to make even a direct and
responsible
representative respect entirely the interests and
wishes of his constituents; and the fact will show
you how little he will be likely to think of others,
who believes that he acts as their master and not
as their servant.
The amount of all this, Brigadier, is that you
have little faith in monikin disinterestedness, in any
shape; that you believe he who is intrusted with
power will abuse it; and therefore you choose to
divide the trust, in order to divide the abuses; that
the love of money is an `earthy' quality, and not to
be confided in as the controlling power of a state;
and, finally, that the social-stake system is radically
wrong, inasmuch as it is no more than carrying
out a principle that is in itself defective?
My companion gaped, like one content to leave
the matter there. I wished him a good morning,
and walked up stairs in quest of Noah, whose
carnivorous
looks had given me considerable
uneasiness
.
The Captain was out; and, after searching
for him in the streets, for an hour or two, I returned
to our abode fatigued and hungry.
At no great distance from our own door, I met
Judge People's Friend, shorn and dejected, and I
stopped to say a kind word, before going up the
ladder. It was quite impossible to see a gentleman,
whom one had met in good society and in better
fortunes, with every hair shaved from his body, his
apology for a tail still sore from its recent
amputation
,
and his entire mien expressive of republican
humility, without a desire to condole with him. I
expressed my regrets, therefore, as succinctly as
possible, encouraging him with the hope of seeing
a new covering of down before long, but delicately
abstaining from any allusion to the
cauda
, whose
loss I knew was irretrievable. To my great surprise,
however, the Judge answered cheerfully;
discarding
,
for the moment, every appearance of
self-abasement
and mortification.
How is this? I cried; you are not then
miserable
!
Very far from it, Sir JohnI never was in
better spirits, or had better prospects, in my life.
I remembered the extraordinary manner in which
the Brigadier had saved Noah's head, and was fully
resolved not to be astonished at any manifestation
of monikin ingenuity. Still I could not forbear
demanding
an explanation.
Why, it may seem odd to you, Sir John, to find
a politician, who is apparently in the depths of
despair
,
Vol. II. 19
really on the eve of a glorious preferment.
Such, however, is in fact my case. In Leaplow,
humility is everything. The monikin who will take
care and repeat sufficiently often that he is just
the poorest devil going, that he is absolutely unfit
for even the meanest employment in the land, and
in other respects ought to be hooted out of society,
may very safely consider himself in a fair way to
be elevated to some of the dignities he declares
himself the least fitted to fill.
In such a case, all he will have to do, then,
will be to make his choice, and denounce himself
loudest touching his especial disqualifications for that
very station?
You are apt, Sir John, and would succeed, if
you would only consent to remain among us! said
the Judge, winking.
I begin to see into your managementafter
all, you are neither miserable nor ashamed?
Not the least in the world. It is of more
importance
for monikins of my calibre to seem to be
anything than to be it. My fellow-citizens are
usually satisfied with this sacrifice; and, now
Principle
is eclipsed, nothing is easier.
But how happens it, Judge, that one of your
surprising dexterity and agility should be caught
tripping? I had thought you particularly expert,
and infallible in all the gyrations. Perhaps the
little affair of the
cauda
has leaked out?
The Judge laughed in my face.
I see you know little of us, after all, Sir John.
Here have we proscribed
cauda
, as anti-republican,
both public opinions setting their faces against them;
and yet a monikin may wear one abroad a mile
long with impunity, if he will just submit to a new
dock when he comes home, and swear that he is
the most miserable wretch going. If he can throw
in a favorable word, too, touching the Leaplow
cats and dogsLord bless you, sir! they would
pardon treason!
I begin to comprehend your policy, Judge, if
not your polity. Leaplow being a popular
government
,
it becomes necessary that its public agents
should be popular too. Now, as monikins naturally
delight in their own excellencies, nothing so
disposes
them to give credit to another, as his
professions
that he is worse than themselves.
The Judge nodded and grinned.
But another word, dear siras you feel
yourself
constrained to commend the cats and dogs of
Leaplow, do you belong to that school of philocats,
who take their revenge for their amenity to the
quadrupeds, by berating their fellow-creatures?
The Judge started, and glanced about him as if
he dreaded a thief-taker. Then earnestly imploring
me to respect his situation, he added in a whisper,
that the subject of the people was sacred with him,
that he rarely spoke of them without a reverence,
and that his favorable sentiments in relation to the
cats and dogs were not dependent on any
particular
merits of the animals themselves, but merely
because they were the people's cats and dogs.
Fearful that I might say something still more
disagreeable
,
the Judge hastened to take his leave, and
I never saw him afterwards. I make no doubt,
however, that in good time his hair grew as he
grew again into favor, and that he found the means
to exhibit the proper length of tail on all suitable
occasions.
A crowd in the street now caught my attention.
On approaching it, a colleague who was there was
kind enough to explain its cause.
It would seem that certain Leaphighers had been
travelling in Leaplow; and, not satisfied with this
liberty, they had actually written books concerning
things that they had seen, and things that they had
not seen. As respects the latter, neither of the
public
opinions was very sensitive, although many of
them reflected severely on the Great National
Allegory and the sacred rights of monikins; but as
respects the former, there was a very lively
excitement
.
These writers had the audacity to say that
the Leaplowers had cut off all their
cauda
, and the
whole community was convulsed at an outrage so
unprecedented. It was one thing to take such a
step, and another to have it proclaimed to the
world in books. If the Leaplowers had no tails, it
was clearly their own fault. Nature had formed
them with tails. They had bobbed themselves
on a republican principle; and no one's principles
ought to be thrown into his face, in this rude
manner, more especially during a moral eclipse.
The dispensers of the essence of lopped tails
threatened vengeance; caricaturists were put in
requisition; some grinned, some menaced, some
swore, and all read!
I left the crowd, taking the direction of my door
again, pondering on this singular state of society,
in which a peculiarity that had been deliberately
and publicly adopted, should give rise to a
sensitiveness
of a character so unusual. I very well
knew that men are commonly more ashamed of
natural imperfections than of those which, in a
great measure, depend on themselves; but then men
are, in their own estimation at least, placed by
nature at the head of creation, and in that capacity
it is reasonable to suppose they will be jealous of
their natural privileges. The present case was
rather Leaplow than generic; and I could only
account for it, by supposing that Nature had placed
certain nerves in the wrong part of the Leaplow
anatomy.
On entering the house, a strong smell of roasted
meat saluted my nostrils, causing a very
unphilosophical
pleasure to the olfactory nerves, a
pleasure
which acted very directly, too, on the gastric
juices of the stomach. In plain English, I had very
sensible evidence that it was not enough to
transport
a man to the monikin region, send him to
parliament
and keep him on nuts for a week, to render
him exclusively ethereal. I found it was vain to
kick against the pricks. The odor of roasted
meat was stronger than all the facts just named,
and I was fain to abandon philosophy, and
surrender
to the belly. I descended incontinently to the
kitchen, guided by a sense no more spiritual than
that which directs the hound in the chase.
On opening the door of our refectory, such a
delicious perfume greeted the nose, that I melted
like a romantic girl at the murmur of a waterfall,
and, losing sight of all the sublime truths so lately
acquired, I was guilty of the particular human
weakness which is usually described as having the
mouth water.
The sealer had quite taken leave of his monikin
forbearance, and was enjoying himself in a
peculiarly
human manner. A dish of roasted meat was
lying before him, and his eyes fairly glared as he
turned them from me to the viand, in a way to
render
it a little doubtful whether I was a welcome
visiter. But that honest old principle of seamen,
which never refuses to share equally with an ancient
messmate, got the better even of his voracity.
Sit down, Sir John, the Captain cried, without
ceasing to masticate, and make no bones of it.
To own the fact, the latter are almost as good as
the flesh. I never tasted a sweeter morsel!
19 *
I did not wait for a second invitation, the reader
may be sure; and in less than ten minutes the dish
was as clear as a table that had been swept by
harpies. As this work is intended for one in which
truth is rigidly respected, I shall avow that I do not
remember any cultivation of sentiment which gave
me half so much satisfaction as that short and
hurried
repast. I look back to it, even now, as to the
very
beau idal
of a dinner! Its fault was in the
quantity, and not in quality.
I gazed greedily about for more. Just then, I
caught a glimpse of a face that seemed looking at
me with melancholy reproach. The truth flashed
upon me in a flood of horrible remorse. Rushing
upon Noah like a tiger, I seized him by the throat,
and cried, in a voice of despair:
Cannibal! what hast thou done?
Loosen your gripe, Sir Johnwe do not relish
these hugs at Stunin'tun.
Wretch! thou hast made me the participator
of thy crime! We have eaten Brigadier
Downright
!
Loosen, Sir John, or human natur' will rebel.
Monster! give up thy unholy repastdost not
see a million reproaches in the eyes of the innocent
victim of thy insatiable appetites?
Cast off, Sir John, cast off, while we are friends.
I care not if I have swallowed all the Brigadiers in
Leaplowoff hands!
Never, monster! until thou disgorgest thy
unholy
meal!
Noah could endure no more; but, seizing me by
the throat, on the retaliating principle, I soon had
some such sensations as one would be apt to feel
if his gullet were in a vice. I shall not attempt to
describe very minutely the miracle that followed.
Hanging ought to be an effectual remedy for many
delusions; for, in my case, the bow-string I was
under certainly did wonders in a very short time.
Gradually the whole scene changed. First came a
mist, then a vertigo; and finally, as the Captain
relaxed
his hold, objects appeared in new forms, and
instead
of being in our lodgings in Bivouac, I found
myself
in my old apartment in the Rue de Rivoli, Paris.
King! exclaimed Noah, who stood before me,
red in the face with exertion; this is no boy's
play, and if it's to be repeated, I shall use a
lashing
!
Where would be the harm, Sir John, if a
man had eaten a monkey?
Astonishment kept me mute. Every object, just
as I had left it the morning we started for London,
on our way to Leaphigh, was there. A table, in
the centre of the room, was covered with sheets of
paper closely written over, which, on examination,
I found contained this manuscript as far as the last
chapter. Both the Captain and myself were attired
as usual; I  la Parisienne, and he  la Stunin'tun.
A small ship, very ingeniously made, and very
accurately rigged, lay on the floor, with Walrus
written on her stern. As my bewildered eye caught
a glimpse of this vessel, Noah informed me that,
having nothing to do except to look after my
welfare
,
(a polite way of characterizing his ward over
my person, as I afterwards found,) he had employed
his leisure in constructing the toy.
All was inexplicable. There was really the
smell of meat. I had also that peculiar
sensation
of fullness which is apt to succeed a dinner,
and a dish well filled with bones was in plain view.
I took up one of the latter, in order to ascertain its
genus
. The Captain kindly informed me that it
was the remains of a pig, which it had cost him a
great deal of trouble to obtain, as the French viewed
the act of eating a pig but very little less heinous
than the act of eating a child. Suspicions began to
trouble me, and I now turned to look for the head
and reproachful eye of the Brigadier.
The head was where I had just before seen it,
visible over the top of a trunk; but it was so far
raised as to enable me to see that it was still planted
on its shoulders. A second look, enabled me to
distinguish the meditative, philosophical countenance
of Dr. Reasono, who was still in the hussar-jacket
and petticoat, though, being in the house, he had
very properly laid aside the Spanish hat with
bedraggled
feathers.
A movement followed in the ante-chamber, and
a hurried conversation, in a low earnest tone,
succeeded
.
The Captain disappeared, and joined the
speakers. I listened intently, but could not catch
any of the intonations of a dialect founded on the
decimal principle. Presently the door opened, and
Dr. Etherington stood before me!
The good divine regarded me long and earnestly.
Tears filled his eyes, and, stretching out both hands
towards me, he asked:
Do you know me, Jack?
Know you, dear sir!Why should I not?
And do you forgive me, dear boy?
For what, sir?I am sure, I have most reason
to demand your pardon for a thousand follies.
Ah! the letterthe unkindthe inconsiderate
letter!
I have not had a letter from you, sir, in a
twelvemonth
:
the last was anything but unkind.
Though Anna wrote, it was at my dictation.
I passed a hand over my brow, and had
dawnings
of the truth.
Anna?
Is herein Paris,and miserablemost
miserable
!on
your account.
Every particle of monikinity that was left in my
system instantly gave way to a flood of human
sensations
.
Let me fly to her, dear sira moment is an
age!
Not just yet, my boy. We have much to say
to each other, nor is she in this hotel. To-morrow,
when both are better prepared, you shall meet.
Add, never to separate, sir, and I will be patient
as a lamb.
Never to separate, I believe it will be better to
say.
I hugged my venerable guardian, and found a
delicious relief from a most oppressive burthen of
sensations, in a flow of tears.
Dr. Etherington soon led me into a calmer tone
of mind. In the course of the day, many matters
were discussed and settled. I was told that Captain
Poke had been a good nurse, though in a sealing
fashion; and that the least I could do was to send
him back to Stunin'tun, free of cost. This was
agreed to, and the worthy but dogmatical mariner
was promised the means of fitting out a new
Debby and Dolly.
These philosophers had better be presented to
some academy, observed the Doctor, smiling, as
he pointed to the family of amiable strangers,
being
already F.U.D.G.E's and H.O.A.X's. Mr.
Reasono, in particular, is unfit for ordinary society.
Do with them as you please, my more than
father. Let the poor animals, however, be kept
from physical suffering.
Attention shall be paid to all their wants, both
physical and moral.
And in a day or two, we shall proceed to the
rectory?
The day after to-morrow, if you have strength.
And to-morrow?
Anna will see you.
And the next day?
Nay, not quite so soon, Jack; but the moment
we think you perfectly restored, she shall share
your fortunes for the remainder of your common
probation.
CHAPTER XV.
ExplanationsA leave-takingLoveConfessions, but no
penitence.
A
night
of sweet repose left me refreshed, and
with a pulse that denoted less agitation than on the
preceding day. I awoke early, had a bath, and sent
for Captain Poke to take his coffee with me, before
we parted; for it had been settled, the previous
evening, that he was to proceed towards Stunin'tun,
forthwith. My old messmate, colleague,
co-adventurer
,
and fellow-traveller, was not slow in obeying
the summons. I confess his presence was a
comfort
to me, for I did not like looking at objects that
had been so inexplicably replaced before my eyes,
unsupported by the countenance of one who had
gone through so many grave scenes in my
company
.
This has been a very extraordinary voyage of
ours, Captain Poke, I remarked, after the worthy
sealer had swallowed sixteen eggs, an omelette,
seven
cotelettes
, and divers accessaries. Do you
think of publishing your private journal?
Why, in my opinion, Sir John, the less that
either of us says of v'y'ge the better.
And why so? We have had the discoveries of
Columbus, Cook, Vancouver and Hudsonwhy
not those of Captain Poke?
To own the truth, we sealers do not like to
speak of our cruising groundsand, as for these
monikins, after all, what are they good for? A
thousand of them wouldn't make a quart of 'ile, and
by all accounts their fur is worth next to nothin'.
Do you account their philosophy for nothing?
and their jurisprudence?you, who were so near
losing your head, and who did actually lose your
tail, by the axe of the executioner?
Noah placed a hand behind him, fumbling
about the seat of reason, with evident uneasiness.
Satisfied that no harm had been done, he very
coolly placed half a muffin in what he called his
provision-hatchway.
You will give me this pretty model of our good
old Walrus, Captain?
Take it, o' Heaven's sake, Sir John, and good
luck to you with it. You, who give me a full-grown
schooner, will be but poorly paid with a toy.
It's as like the dear old craft, as one pea is like
another!
I dare say it may be. I never knew a model
that hadn't suthin' of the original in it.
Well, my good shipmate, we must part. You
know I am to go and see the lady who is soon to
be my wife, and the
diligence
will be ready to take
you to Havre, before I return.
God bless you! Sir John, God bless you!
Noah blew his nose till it rung like a French horn.
I thought his little coals of eyes were glittering,
too, more than common, most probably with
moisture. You're a droll navigator, and make no
more of the ice than a colt makes of a rail. But
though the man at the wheel is not always awake,
the heart seldom sleeps.
When the Debby and Dolly is fairly in the
water, you will do me the pleasure of letting me
know it.
Count on me, Sir John. Before we part, I have,
however, a small favor to ask.
Name it.
Here Noah drew out of his pocket a sort of
basso
relievo
carved in pine. It represented Neptune
armed with a harpoon instead of a trident; the
Captain
always contending that the god of the seas
should never carry the latter, but that, in its place,
he should be armed either with the weapon he had
given him, or with a boat-hook. On the right of
Neptune was an English gentleman holding out a
bag of guineas. On the other was a female who,
I was told, represented the goddess of Liberty,
while it was secretly a rather flattering likeness of
Miss Poke. The face of Neptune was supposed
to have some similitude to that of her husband.
The Captain, with the modesty which is invariably
the companion of merit in the arts, asked
permission
to have a copy of this design placed on the
schooner's stern. It would have been churlish to
refuse such a compliment; and I now offered Noah
my hand, as the time for parting had arrived. The
sealer grasped me rather tightly, and seemed
disposed
to say more than adieu.
You are going to see an angel, Sir John.
How!Do you know anything of Miss
Etherington
?
I should be as blind as an old bum-boat else.
During our late v'y'ge, I saw her often.
This is strange!But there is evidently
something
on your mind, my friend: speak freely.
Well, then, Sir John, talk of anything but of our
v'y'ge, to the dear crittur. I do not think she is
quite prepared yet to hear of all the wonders we
saw.
I promised to be prudent; and the Captain,
shaking me cordially by the hand, finally wished
me farewell. There were some rude touches of
feeling in his manner, which reacted on certain
chords in my own system; and he had been gone
several minutes before I recollected that it was time
to go to the Hotel de Castile. Too impatient to
wait for the carriage, I flew along the streets on
foot, believing that my own fiery speed would
outstrip
the zig-zag movement of a
fiacre
or a
cabriolet
de place
.
Dr. Etherington met me at the door of his
appartement
,
and led me to an inner room without
speaking. Here he stood gazing, for some time,
in my face, with parental concern.
She expects you, Jack, and believes that you
rang the bell.
So much the better, dear sir. Let us not lose
a moment; let me fly and throw myself at her feet,
and implore her pardon.
For what, my good boy?
For believing that any social-stake can equal
that which a man feels in the nearest, dearest, ties
of earth!
The excellent rector smiled, but he wished to
curb my impatience.
You have already every stake in society, Sir
John Goldencalf, he answered, assuming the air
which human beings have, by a general convention,
settled shall be dignified, that any reasonable man
can desire. The large fortune left by your late
father, raises you, in this respect, to the height
of the richest in the land; and now that you are a
baronet, no one will dispute your claim to
participate
in the councils of the nation. It would perhaps
be better, did your creation date a century or two
nearer the commencement of the monarchy; but,
Vol. II. 20
in this age of innovations, we must take things as
they are, and not as we might wish to have them.
I rubbed my forehead, for the Doctor had
incidentally
thrown out an embarrassing idea.
On your principle, my dear sir, society would
be obliged to begin with its great-grandfathers to
qualify itself for its own government.
Pardon me, Jack, if I have said anything
disagreeable
no
doubt all will come right in Heaven.
Anna will be uneasy at our delay.
This suggestion drove all recollection of the
good rector's social-stake system, which was
exactly
the converse of the social-stake system of
my late ancestor, quite out of my head. Springing
forward, I gave him reason to see that he would
have no farther trouble in changing the subject.
When we had passed an ante-chamber, he pointed
to a door, and admonishing me to be prudent,
withdrew.
My hand trembled as it touched the door-knob,
but the lock yielded. Anna was standing in the
middle of the room, (she had heard my footstep,)
an image of womanly loveliness, womanly faith,
and womanly feeling. By a desperate effort she
was, however, mistress of her emotions. Though
her pure soul seemed willing to fly to meet me, she
obviously restrained the impulse, in order to spare
my nerves.
Dear Jack!and both her soft, white, pretty
little hands met me, as I eagerly approached.
Anna!dearest Anna!I covered the rosy
fingers with kisses.
Let us be tranquil, Jack, and, if possible,
endeavor
to be reasonable, too.
If I thought this could really cost one
habitually
discreet as you an effort, Anna!
One habitually discreet as I, is as likely to feel
strongly on meeting an old friend, as another.
I think it would make me perfectly happy, could
I see thee weep.
As if waiting only for this hint, Anna burst into
a flood of tears. I was frightened, for her sobs
became hysterical and convulsed. Those precious
sentiments which had been so long imprisoned in
her gentle bosom, obtained the mastery, and I
was well paid for my selfishness, by experiencing
an alarm little less violent than her own outpouring
of feeling.
Touching the incidents, emotions, and language
of the next half-hour, it is not my intention to be
very communicative. Anna was ingenuous,
unreserved
,
and, if I might judge by the rosy blushes
that suffused her sweet face, and the manner in
which she extricated herself from my protecting
arms, I believe I must add she deemed herself
indiscreet in that she had been so unreserved and
ingenuous.
We can now converse more calmly, Jack, the
dear creature resumed, after she had erased the
signs of emotion from her cheeksmore calmly,
if not more sensibly.
The wisdom of Solomon is not half so precious
as the words I have just heardand as for the
music of the spheres
It is a melody that angels only enjoy.
And art not thou an angel!
No, Jack, only a poor, confiding girl; one
instinct with the affections and weaknesses of her
sex, and one whom it must be your part to sustain
and direct. If we begin by calling each other by
these superhuman epithets, we may awake from
the delusion sooner than if we commence with
believing
ourselves to be no other than what we
really are. I love you for your kind, excellent
and generous heart, Jack; and as for these poetical
beings, they are rather proverbial, I believe, for
having no hearts at all.
As Anna mildly checked my exaggeration of
languageafter ten years of marriage I am
unwilling
to admit there was any exaggeration of idea
she placed her little velvet hand in mine again,
smiling away all the severity of the reproof.
Of one thing, I think you may rest perfectly
assured, dear girl, I resumed after a moment's
reflection
.
All my old opinions concerning
expansion
and contraction are radically changed. I have
carried out the principle of the social-stake system
in the extreme, and cannot say that I have been at
all satisfied with its success. At this moment I am
the proprietor of vested interests which are
scattered
over half the world. So far from finding that
I love my kind any more for all these social stakes,
I am compelled to see that the wish to protect one,
is constantly driving me into acts of injustice against
all the others. There is something wrong, depend
on it, Anna, in the old dogmas of the political
economists
!
I know little of these things, Sir John, but to
one ignorant as myself, it would appear that the
most certain security for the righteous exercise of
power is to be found in just principles.
If available, beyond a question. They who
contend that the debased and ignorant are unfit to
express their opinions concerning the public weal,
are obliged to own that they can only be restrained
by force. Now, as knowledge is power, their first
precaution is to keep them ignorant; and then they
quote this very ignorance, with all its debasing
consequences
,
as an argument against their
participation
in authority with themselves. I believe there
can be no safe medium between a frank admission
of the whole principle
You should remember, dear Goldencalf, that
this is a subject on which I know but little. It ought
to be sufficient for us that we find things as they
are; if change is actually necessary, we should
endeavor to effect it with prudence and a proper
regard to justice.
Anna, while kindly leading me back from my
speculations, looked both anxious and pained.
TruetrueI hurriedly rejoined, for a world
would not tempt me to prolong her suffering for a
moment. I am foolish and forgetful, to be talking
thus, at such a moment; but I have endured too
much to be altogether unmindful of ancient
theories
.
I thought it might be grateful to you, at
least, to know, Anna, that I have ceased to look
for happiness in my affections for all, and am only
so much the better disposed to turn in search of it
to one.
To love our neighbor as ourself, is the latest
and highest of the divine commands, the dear
girl answered, looking a thousand times more
lovely than ever, for my conclusion was very far
from being displeasing to her. I do not know
that this object is to be attained by centering in
our persons as many of the goods of life as
possible
;
but I do think, Jack, that the heart which loves
one truly, will be so much the better disposed to
entertain kind feelings towards all others.
I kissed the hand she had given me, and we now
began to talk a little more like people of the world,
concerning our movements. The interview lasted
an hour longer, when the good Doctor interposed
and sent me home, to prepare for our return to
England.
In a week we were again in the old island. Anna
20*
and her father proceeded to the rectory, while I
was left in town, busied with lawyers, and looking
after the results of my numerous investments.
Contrary to what many people will be apt to
suppose, most of them had been successful. On the
whole, I was richer for the adventures; and with
such prospects accompanying the risks, I had little
difficulty in disposing of them to advantage. The
proceeds, together with a large balance of
dividends
that had accrued during my absence, was
lodged with my banker, and I advertised for
further
landed property.
Knowing the taste of Anna, I purchased one of
those town residences which look out on St. James's
Park, where the sight of fragrant shrubbery and
verdant fields will be constantly before her
serene
eyes, during the period of what is called a
London winter,or from the Easter holidays to
midsummer.
I had a long and friendly interview with my
Lord Pledge, who was not a man to abandon a
ministry, but who continued in place just as active,
as respectable, as logical and as useful as ever.
Indeed, so conspicuous was he for the third of
these qualities, that I caught myself peeping, once
or twice, to see if he were actually destitute of a
cauda
. He gave me the comfortable assurance
that all had gone on well in parliament during my
absence, politely intimating, at the same time, that
he did not believe I had been missed. We settled
certain preliminaries together, which will be
explained
in the next chapter; when I hurried, on the
wings of love, alias, in a post-chaise and four,
towards
the rectory, and to the sweetest, kindest,
gentlest
,
truest girl in an island which has so many
of the sweet, the kind, the gentle and the true.
CHAPTER XVI.
BlissThe best investment in societyThe result of much
experience, and The End.
That
day two months found me at the rectory
of Tenthpig, the happiest man in England. The
season had advanced to the middle of July, and the
shrubbery near the bow-window of my excellent
father-in-law's library, was in full verdure. The
plant, in particular, whose flowers had so well
emulated the bloom of Anna's cheek, was rioting in
the luxuriance of renewed fertility, its odors stealing
gently over the senses of my young wife and
myself
,
as we sat alone, enjoying the holy calm of a
fine summer morning, and that delicious happiness
which is apt to render the bliss of the first months
of a well-assorted union almost palpable.
Anna was seated so near the window that the
tints of the rose-bush suffused her spotless robe,
rendering her whole figure a perfect picture of that
attractive creature the poets have so often sunga
blushing bride. The quiet light had to traverse a
wilderness of sweets before it fell on her bland
features
,
every polished lineament of which was
eloquent
of felicity, and yet, if it be not a
contradiction
,
I would also add, not entirely without the
shadows
of thought. She was never more lovely, and
I had never known her so subdued and tender, as
within the last half-hour. We had been speaking,
without reserve, of the past, and Anna had just
faithfully described the extreme suffering with which
she had complied with the command of the good
rector, in writing the letter that had so completely
unmanned me.
I ought to have known you better, love, than to
suspect you of the act, I rejoined to one of her
earnest protestations of regret, and gazing fondly
into those eyes which have so much of the serenity,
as they have the hues, of heaven. You never yet
were so unkind to one who was offensive; much
less could you willingly have plotted this cruelty
to one you regard!
Anna could no longer control herself, but her
cheeks were wetted with the usual signs of feeling
in her sex. Then smiling in the midst of this little
outbreaking of womanly sensibility, her countenance
became playful and radiant.
That letter ought not to be altogether
proscribed
,
neither, Jack. Had it not been written,
you would never have visited Leaphigh, nor
Leaplow
,
nor have seen any of those wonderful
spectacles
which are here recorded.
The dear creature laid her hand on a roll of
manuscript which she had just returned to me, after
its perusal. At the same time, her face flushed, as
vivid and transient feelings are reflected from the
features of the innocent and ingenuous, and she
made a faint effort to laugh.
I passed a hand over my brow, for whenever this
subject is alluded to between us, I invariably feel
that there is a species of mistiness, in and about the
region of thought. I was not displeased, however,
for I knew that a heart which loved so truly would
not willingly cause me pain, nor would one
habitually
so gentle and considerate, utter a syllable that
she might have reason to think would seriously
displease.
Hadst thou been with me, love, that journey
would always be remembered as one of the
pleasantest
events of my life; for, while it had its perils
and its disagreeables, it had also its moments of
extreme satisfaction.
You will never be an adept in political saltation,
John!
Perhaps notbut here is a document that will
render it less necessary than formerly.
I threw her a packet which had been received
that morning from town, by a special messenger,
but of whose contents I had not yet spoken. Anna
was too young a wife to open it without an
approving
look from my fond eye. On glancing over its
contents, she perceived that I was raised to the
House of Peers by the title of Viscount
Householder
.
The purchase of three more boroughs, and
the influence of my old friend Lord Pledge, had
done it all.
The sweet girl looked pleased, for I believe it is
in female nature to like to be a Viscountess; but,
throwing herself into my arms, she protested that
her joy was at my elevation and not at her own.
I owed you this effort, Anna, as some
acknowledgment
for your faith and disinterestedness in the
affair of Lord M'Dee.
And yet, Jack, he had neither high cheek-bones,
nor red hair; and his accent was such as might
please a girl less capricious than myself!
This was said playfully and coquettishly, but in a
way to make me feel how near folly would have been
to depriving me of a treasure, had the heart I so
much prized been less ingenuous and pure. I drew
the dear creature to my bosom, as if afraid my rival
might yet rob me of her possession. Anna looked
up, smiling through her tears; and, making an effort
to be calm, she said, in a voice so smothered as to
prove how delicate she felt the subject to be:
We will speak seldom of this journey, dear
John, and try to think of the long and dark journey
which is yet before us. We will speak of it, how
ever, for there should be nothing totally concealed
between us.
I kissed her serene and humid eyes, and repeated
what she had just said, syllable for syllable. Anna
has not been unmindful of her words; for rarely,
indeed, has she touched on the past, and then
oftener in allusion to her own sorrows, than in
reference to my impressions.
But, while the subject of my voyage to the
monikin
region is, in a measure, forbidden between me and
my wife, there exists no such restraint as between
me and other people. The reader may like to know,
therefore, what effect this extraordinary adventure
has left on my mind, after an interval of ten years.
There have been moments when the whole has
appeared a dream; but, on looking back, and
comparing it with other scenes in which I have
been an actor, I cannot perceive that this is not
quite as indelibly stamped on my memory as those.
The facts themselves, moreover, are so very like
what I see daily in the course of occurrence around
me, that I have come to the conclusion, I did go
to Leaphigh in the way related, and that I must
have been brought back during the temporary
insanity of a fever. I believe, therefore, that there
are such countries as Leaphigh and Leaplow; and,
after much thought, I am of opinion that great
justice
has here been done to the monikin character in
general.
The result of much meditation on what I
witnessed
,
has been to produce sundry material changes
in my former opinions, and to unsettle even many
of the notions in which I may be said to have been
born and bred. In order to consume as little of the
reader's time as possible, I shall set down a
summary
of my conclusions, and then take my leave
of him, with many thanks for his politeness in
reading
what I have written. Before completing my
task in this way, however, it will be well to add a
word on the subject of one or two of my
fellow-travellers
.
I never could make up my mind relating to the
fact whether we did or did not actually eat
Brigadier
Downright. The flesh was so savory, and it
tasted so delicious after a week of philosophical
meditation on nuts, and the recollection of its
pleasures
is so very vivid, that I am inclined to think
nothing but a good material dinner could have left
behind it impressions so lively. I have had many
melancholy thoughts on this subject, especially in
November; but observing that men are constantly
devouring each other, in one shape or another, I
endeavor to make the best of it, and to persuade
myself that a slight difference in species may
exonerate
me from the imputation of cannibalism.
I often get letters from Captain Poke. He is not
very explicit on the subject of our voyage, it is
true; but, on the whole, I have decided that the
little ship he constructed was built on the model of,
and named after, our own Walrus, instead of our
own Walrus being built on the model of, and named
after, the little ship constructed by Captain Poke.
I keep the latter, therefore, to show my friends as
a proof of what I tell them, knowing the importance
of visible testimony with ordinary minds.
As for Bob and the mates, I never heard any
more of them. The former most probably continued
a
kickee
, until years and experience enabled him
to turn the tables on humanity, when, as is usually
the case with Christians, he would be very likely to
take up the business of a kicker with so much
the greater zeal, on account of his early sufferings.
To conclude, my own adventures and
observations
lead to the following inferences, viz.
That every man loves liberty for his own sake,
and very few for the sake of other people.
That moral saltation is very necessary to
political
success at Leaplow, and quite probably in many
other places.
That civilization is very arbitrary, meaning one
thing in France, another thing at Leaphigh, and
still a third in Dorsetshire.
That there is no sensible difference between
motives
in the polar region and motives anywhere else.
That truth is a comparative and local property,
being much influenced by circumstances;
particularly
by climate and by different public opinions.
That there is no portion of human wisdom so
select and faultless that it does not contain the
seeds of its own refutation.
That of all the 'ocracies, (aristocracy and
democracy
included) hypocrisy is the most flourishing.
That he who is in the clutches of the law may
think himself lucky if he escape with the loss of his
tail.
That liberty is a convertible term, which means
exclusive privileges in one country, no privileges in
another, and
inclusive
privileges in all.
That religion is a paradox, in which self-denial
and humility are proposed as tenets, in direct
contradiction
to every man's senses.
That
phrenology
and
caudology
are sister sciences,
one being quite as demonstrable as the other, and
more too.
That philosophy, sound principles, and virtue, are
really delightful; but, after all, that they are no more
than so many slaves of the belly; a man usually
preferring to eat his best friend to starving.
That a little wheel and a great wheel are as
necessary to the motion of a commonwealth, as to
the motion of a stage-coach, and that what this
gains in periphery that makes up in activity, on the
rotatory principle.
That it is one thing to have a king, another to
have a throne, and another to have neither.
That the reasoning which is drawn from
particular
abuses, is no reasoning for general uses.
That, in England, if we did not use blinkers, our
cattle would break our necks; whereas, in Germany
we travel at a good pace, allowing the horse the
use of his eyes; and in Naples we fly, without even
a bit!
That the converse of what has just been said of
horses is true of men, in the three countries named.
That occultations of truth are just as certain as
the aurora borealis, and quite as easily accounted
for.
That men who will not shrink from the danger
and toil of penetrating the polar basin, will shrink
from the trouble of doing their own thinking, and
put themselves, like Captain Poke, under the
convoy
of a God-like.
That all our wisdom is insufficient to protect us
from frauds, one outwitting us by gyrations and
flapjacks, and another by adding new joints to the
cauda
.
That men are not very scrupulous touching the
humility due to God, but are so tenacious of their
own privileges in this particular, they will confide in
plausible rogues rather than in plain-dealing honesty.
That they who rightly appreciate the foregoing
facts, are People's Friends, and become the salt of
the earthyea, even the Most Patriotic Patriots!
That it is fortunate all will come right in
Heaven
,
Vol. II. 21
for it is certain too much goes wrong on
earth.
That the social-stake system has one distinctive
merit; that of causing the owners of vested rights
to set their own interests in motion, while those of
their fellow-citizens must follow, as a matter of
course, though perhaps a little clouded by the dust
raised by their leaders.
That he who has an Anna, has the best
investment
in humanity; and that if he has any repetition
of his treasure, it is better still.
That money commonly purifies the spirit as wine
quenches thirst; and therefore it is wise to commit
all our concerns to the keeping of those who have
most of it.
That others seldom regard us in the same light
we regard ourselves; witness the manner in which
Dr. Reasono converted me from a benefactor into
the travelling tutor of Prince Bob.
That honors are sweet even to the most humble,
as is shown by the satisfaction of Noah in being
made a Lord High Admiral.
That there is no such stimulant of humanity, as
a good moneyed stake in its advancement.
That though the mind may be set on a very
improper
and base object, it will not fail to seek a good
motive for its justification, few men being so
hardened
in any grovelling passion, that they will not
endeavor to deceive themselves, as well as their
neighbors.
That academies promote good fellowship in
knowledge
,
and good fellowship in knowledge promotes
F. U. D. G. E.s, and H. O. A. X.es.
That a political rolling-pin, though a very good
thing to level rights and privileges, is a very bad
thing to level houses, temples, and other matters
that might be named.
That the system of governing by proxy is more
extended than is commonly supposed; in one
country
a king resorting to its use, and in another the
people.
That there is no method by which a man can be
made to covet a tail, so sure as by supplying all
his neighbors, and excluding him by an especial
edict.
That the perfection of consistency in a nation, is
to dock itself at home, while its foreign agents
furiously cultivate
caud
abroad.
That names are far more useful than things,
being more generally understood, less liable to
objections, of greater circulation, besides
occupying
much less room.
That ambassadors turn the back of the throne
outward, aristocrats draw a crimson curtain before
it, and a king sits on it.
That nature has created inequalities in men and
things, and, as human institutions are intended to
prevent the strong from oppressing the weak,
ergo
,
the laws should encourage natural inequalities as a
legitimate consequence.
That, moreover, the laws of nature having made
one man wise and another man foolishthis strong,
and that weak, human laws should reverse it all,
by making
another
man wise and
one
man foolish
that
strong and
this
weak. On this conclusion I
obtained a peerage.
That God-likes are commonly Riddles, and
Riddles
,
with many people, are, as a matter of course,
God-likes.
That the expediency of establishing the base of
society on a principle of the most sordid character,
one that is denounced by the revelations of God,
and proved to be insufficient by the experience of
man, may at least be questioned without properly
subjecting the dissenter to the imputation of being
a sheep-stealer.
That we seldom learn moderation under any
political
excitement, until forty thousand square miles
of territory are blown from beneath our feet.
That it is not an infallible sign of great mental
refinement to bespatter our fellow-creatures, while
every nerve is writhing in honor of our pigs, our
cats, our stocks and our stones.
That select political wisdom, like select schools,
propagates much questionable knowledge.
That the whole people is not infallible, neither is
a part of the people infallible.
That love for the species is a godlike and pure
sentiment; but the philanthropy which is dependent
on buying land by the square mile, and selling it by
the square foot, is stench in the nostrils of the just.
That one thoroughly imbued with republican
simplicity invariably squeezes himself into a little
wheel, in order to show how small he can become
at need.
That habit is invincible, an Esquimaux preferring
whale's blubber to beef-steak, a native of the Gold
Coast cherishing his tom-tom before a band of
music, and certain travelled countrymen of our
own saying Commend me to the English skies.
That arranging a fact by reason is embarrassing,
and admits of cavilling; while adapting a reason to
a fact is a very natural, easy, every-day, and
sometimes
necessary, process.
That what men affirm for their own particular
interests they will swear to in the end, although it
should be a proposition as much beyond the
necessity
of an oath, as that black is white.
That national allegories exist everywhere, the
only difference between them arising from
gradations
in the richness of imaginations.
And finally:
That men have more of the habits,
propensities
,
dispositions, cravings, antics, gratitude,
flap-jacks
,
and honesty of monikins, than is generally
known.
THE ENDGeneral-Commodore-Judge-Colonel,
People
's
Friend
:
Envoy Extraordinary and Minister
Plenipotentiary
from the Republic of Leaplow
near his Majesty the King of Leaphigh.
Sir, said I, pulling off my hat with a profound
reverence, I was not aware to whom I had the
honor of speaking. You appear to fill a variety
of employments, and I make no doubt, with equal
skill.
Yes, sir, I believe I am about as good at one
of my professions, as at another.
You will permit me to observe, however,
General
aaJudgeaaI
scarcely know, dear
sir, which of these titles is the most to your taste?
Use which you please, sir.I began with
General
,
but had got as low as Colonel before I left
home. People's Friend is the only appellation of
which I am at all tenacious. Call me People's
Friend, sir, and you may call me anything else you
find most convenient.
Sir, you are only too obliging. May I venture
to ask if you have really,
propri person
, filled all
these different stations in life?
Certainly, sirI hope you do not mistake me
for an impostor!
As far from it as possible.But a judge and a
commodore, for instance, are characters whose
duties are so utterly at variance, in human affairs,
that I will allow I find the conjunction, even in a
monikin, a little extraordinary.
Not at all, sir. I was duly elected to each,
served my time out in them all, and have honorable
discharges to show in every instance.
You must have found some perplexity in the
performance of duties so very different?
3 *
AhI see you have been long enough in
Leaphigh
to imbibe some of its prejudices! It is a sad
country for prejudice. I got my foot mired in some
of them myself, as soon as it touched the land.
Why, sir, my card is an illustration of what we
call, in Leaplow, rotation in office.
Rotation in office!
Yes, sir, rotation in office; a system that we
invented for our personal convenience, and which
is likely to be firm, as it depends on principles that
are eternal.
Will you suffer me to inquire, Colonel, if it has
any affinity to the social-stake system?
Not in the least. That, as I understand it, is a
stationary, while this is a rotatory system. Nothing
is simpler. We have in Leaplow two enormous
boxes made in the form of wheels. Into one we
put the names of the citizens, and into the other the
names of the offices. We then draw forth, in the
manner of a lottery; and the thing is settled for a
twelvemonth.
I find this rotatory plan exceedingly simple
pray, sir, does it work as well as it promises?
To perfection.We grease the wheels, of
course, periodically.
And are not frauds sometimes committed by
those who are selected to draw the tickets?
Oh! they are chosen precisely in the same
way.
But those who draw
their
tickets?
All rotatorythey are drawn exactly on the
same principle.
But there must be a beginning. Those, again,
who draw
their
ticketsthey may betray their
trusts?
Impossible
they
are always the most Patriotic
Patriots of the land! No, no, sirwe are not such
dunces as to leave anything to corruption. Chance
does it all. Chance makes me a commodore
today
a
judge to-morrow. Chance makes the lottery
boys, and chance makes the patriots. It is
necessary
to see in order to understand how much purer
and useful is your chance patriot, for instance, than
one that is bred to the calling.
Why, this savors, after all, of the doctrine of
descents, which is little more than a matter of
chance.
It would be so, sir, I confess, were it not
that our chances centre in a system of patriots.
Our approved patriots are our guarantees against
abuses
Hem!interrupted the companion of
Commodore
People's Friend, with an awkward
distinctness
,
as if to recall himself to our recollection.
Sir John, I crave pardon for great remissness
allow me to present my fellow-citizen, Brigadier
Downright, a gentleman who is on his travels, like
yourself; and as excellent a fellow as is to be found
in the whole monikin region.
Brigadier Downright, I crave the honor of your
acquaintance.But, gentlemen, I too have been
sadly negligent of politeness. A banquet that has
cost a hundred promises is waiting my appearance;
and, as some of the expected guests are
unavoidably
absent, if you would favor me with your
excellent
society, we might spend an agreeable hour
in the further discussion of these important
interests
.
As neither of the strangers made the smallest
objection to the proposal, we were all soon
comfortably
seated at the dinner-table. The
Commodore
,
who, it would seem, was habitually well fed,
merely paid a little complimentary attention to the
banquet; but Mr. Downright attacked it tooth and
nail, and I had no great reason to regret the
absence of Mr. Poke. In the mean time, the
conversation
did not flag.
I think I understand the outline of your system,
Judge People's Friend, I resumed, with the
exception
of the part that relates to the Patriots.
Would it be asking too much to request a little
explanation on that particular point?
Not in the least, sir. Our social arrangement
is founded on a hint from nature; a base, as you
will concede, that is broad enough to sustain the
universe. As a people, we are a hive that formerly
swarmed from Leaphigh; and finding ourselves
free and independent, we set about forthwith
building
the social system on not only a sure foundation,
but on sure principles. Observing that nature dealt
in duplicates, we pursued the hint, as the leading
idea
In duplicates, Commodore!
Certainly, Sir Johna monikin has two eyes,
two ears, two nostrils, two lungs, two arms, two
hands, two legs, two feet, and so on to the end of
the chapter. On this hint, we ordered that there
should be drawn, morally, in every district of
Leaplow
,
two distinct and separate lines, that should
run at right angles to each other. These were
termed the political land-marks of the country;
and it was expected that every citizen should range
himself along one or the other.All this you will
understand, however, was a moral contrivance, not
a physical one.
Is the obligation of this moral contrivance
imperative
?
Not legally, it is true; but then, he who does not
respect it is like one who is out of fashion, and he is so
generally esteemed a poor devil, that the usage has
a good deal more than the force of a law. At first,
it was intended to make it a part of the
constitution
;
but one of our most experienced
statesmen
so clearly demonstrated that, by so doing, we
should not only weaken the nature of the
obligation
,
but most probably raise a party against it, the
idea was abandoned. Indeed, if any thing, both the
letter and the spirit of the fundamental law have
been made to lean a little against the practice; but
having been cleverly introduced, in the way of
construction
,
it is now bone of our bone, and flesh of
our flesh. Well, sir, these two great political
land-marks
being fairly drawn, the first effort of one
who aspires to be thought a Patriot, is to acquire
the practice of `toeing the mark' promptly and
with facility. But should I illustrate my positions
by a few experiments, you might comprehend the
subject all the better.For though, in fact, the true
evolutions are purely moral, as I have just had the
honor to explain, yet we have instituted a physical
parallel that is very congenial to our habits, with
which the neophyte always commences.
Here the Commodore took a bit of chalk and
drew two very distinct lines, crossing each other
at right angles, through the centre of the room.
When this was done, he placed his feet together,
and then he invited me to examine if it were
possible
to see any part of the planks between the
extremities
of his toes and the lines. After a rigid look,
I was compelled to confess it was not.
This is what we call `toeing the mark;' it is
`Social Position, No. 1.' Almost every citizen gets
to be expert in practising it, on one or the other of
the two great political lines. After this, he who
would push his fortunes further, commences his
career on the great rotatory principle.
Your pardon, Commodore;we call the word
rotary, in English.
Sir, it is not expressive enough for our
meaning
;
and therefore we term it `rotatory.' I shall
now give you an example of Position No. 2.
Here the Commodore made a spring, throwing
his body, as a soldier would express it, to the right
about, bringing, at the same time, his feet entirely
on the other side of the line; always rigidly
toeing
the mark.
Sir, said I, this was extremely well done;
but is this evolution as useful as certainly it is
dexterous?
It has the advantage of changing front, Sir
John; a manuvre quite as useful in politics as in
war. Most all in the line get to practise this, too,
as my friend Downright, there, could show you,
were he so disposed.
I don't like to expose my flanks, or my rear,
more than another, growled the Brigadier.
If agreeable, I will now show you Gyration
2d, or Position No. 3.
On my expressing a strong desire to see it, the
Commodore put himself again in Position No. 1;
and then he threw what Captain Poke was in the
habit of calling a `flap-jack,' or a summerset;
coming down in a way tenaciously to toe the
mark.
I was much gratified with the dexterity of the
Commodore, and frankly expressed as much;
inquiring
,
at the same time, if many attained to the
same skill. Both the Commodore and the
Brigadier
laughed at the simplicity of the question; the
former answering that the people of Leaplow
were exceedingly active and adventurous, and both
lines had got to be so expert, that, at the word of
command, they would throw their summersets in
as exact time, and quite as promptly, as a
regiment
of guards would go through the evolution
of slapping their cartridge-boxes.
What, sir, I exclaimed, in admiration, the
entire population!
Virtually, sir. There is, now and then, a
stumbler; but he is instantly kicked out of sight,
and uniformly counts for nothing.
But as yet, Commodore, your evolutions are
altogether too general to admit of the chance
selection of patriots, since patriotism is usually a
monopoly.
Very true, Sir John; I shall therefore come to
the main point without delay. Thus far, it is
pretty much an affair of the whole population, as
you say; few refusing to toe the mark, or to
throw the necessary flap-jacks, as you have
ingeniously
termed them. The lines, as you may
perceive
,
cross each other at right angles; and there
is consequently some crowding, and, occasionally,
a good deal of jostling, at and near the point of
junction. We begin to term a monikin a Patriot,
when he can perform this evolution.
Here the Commodore threw his heels into the
air with such rapidity that I could not very well
tell what he was about, though it was sufficiently
apparent that he was acting entirely on the
rotatory
principle. I observed that he alighted, with
singular accuracy, on the very spot where he had
stood before, toeing the mark with beautiful
precision
.
That is what we call Gyration 3d, or Position
No. 4. He who can execute it is considered an
adept in our politics; and he invariably takes his
position near the enemy, or at the junction of the
hostile lines.
How, sir, are these lines, then, manned as they
are with citizens of the same country, deemed
hostile!
Are cats and dogs hostile, sir?Certainly,
although standing, as it might be, face to face,
acting on precisely the same principle, or the
rotatory
impulse, and professing to have exactly the
same object in view, viz. the common good, they
are social, political, and I might almost say, the
moral antipodes of each other. They rarely
intermarry
,
never extol, and frequently refuse to speak
to one another. In short, as the Brigadier could tell
you, if he were so disposed, they are antagonist,
body and soul. To be plain, sir, they are enemies.
This is very extraordinary for fellow-citizens!
'Tis the monikin nature, observed Mr.
Downright
;
no doubt, sir, men are much wiser?
As I did not wish to divert the discourse from
the present topic, I merely bowed to this remark,
and begged the Judge to proceed.
Well, sir, continued the latter, you can
easily imagine that they who are placed near the
point where the two lines meet, have no sinecures.
To speak the truth, they blackguard each other
with all their abilities, he who manifests the most
inventive genius in this high accomplishment, being
commonly thought the cleverest fellow. Now, sir,
none but a patriot could, in the nature of things,
endure this without some other motive than his
country's good, and so we esteem them.
But the most Patriotic Patriots, Commodore?
The minister of Leaphigh now toed the mark
again, placing himself within a few feet of the
point of junction between the two lines; and then
he begged me to pay particular attention to his
evolution. When all was ready, the Commodore
threw himself, as it were, invisibly into the air
again, head over heels, so far as I could discover,
and alighted on the antagonist line, toeing the
mark with a most astonishing particularity. It was
a clever gyration, beyond a doubt; and the
performer
looked towards me, as if inviting
commendation
.
Admirably executed, Judge, and in a way to
induce one to believe that you must have paid great
attention to the practice.
I have performed this manuvre, Sir John, five
times in real life; and my claim to be a Patriotic
Patriot is founded on its invariable success. A
single false step might have ruined me; but as
you say, practice makes perfect, and perfection is
the parent of success.
And yet I do not rightly understand how so
sudden a desertion of one's own side, to go over, in
this active manner, head over heels, I may say, to
another side, constitutes a fair claim to be deemed
so pure a character as that of a patriot.
What, sir, is not he who throws himself
defencelessly
into the very middle of the ranks of the
enemy, the hero of the combat? Now, as this is a
political struggle, and not a warlike struggle, but
one in which the good of the country is alone
uppermost
,
the monikin who thus manifests the greatest
devotion to the cause, must be the purest patriot. I
give you my honor, sir, all my own claims are
founded entirely on this particular merit.
He is right, Sir John; you may believe every
word he says, observed the Brigadier, nodding.
I begin to understand your system, which is
certainly well adapted to the monikin habits, and
must give rise to a noble emulation in the practice
of the rotatory principle. But I understood you to
say, Colonel, that the people of Leaplow are from
the hive of Leaphigh?
Just so, sir.
Vol. II. 4
How happens it then, that you dock yourselves
of the nobler member, while the inhabitants of this
country cherish it as the apple of the eyenay, as
the seat of reason itself?
You allude to our tails?Why, sir, Nature has
dealt out these ornaments with a very unequal
hand, as you may perceive on looking out of the
window. We agree that the tail is the seat of
reason
,
and that the extremities are the most
intellectual
parts; but, as governments are framed to
equalize these natural inequalities, we denounce
them as anti-republican. The law requires,
therefore
,
that every citizen, on attaining his majority,
shall be docked agreeably to a standard measure,
that is kept in each district. Without some such
expedient, there might be an aristocracy of intellect
among us, and there would be an end of our
liberties
.
This is the qualification of a voter, too, and
of course we all seek to obtain it.
Here the Brigadier leaned across the table and
whispered that a great patriot, on a most trying
occasion, had succeeded in throwing a summerset
out of his own into the antagonist line, and that, as
he carried with him all the sacred principles for
which his party had been furiously contending for
many years, he had been unceremoniously dragged
back by his tail, which unfortunately came within
reach of those quondam friends on whom he had
turned his back; and that the law had, in truth, been
passed in the interests of the patriots. He added,
that the lawful measure allowed a longer stump
than was commonly used; but that it was considered
under-bred for any one to wear a dock that reached
more than two inches and three quarters of an inch
into society, and that most of their political
aspirants
,
in particular, chose to limit themselves to one
inch and one quarter of an inch, as a proof of
excessive
humility.
Thanking Mr. Downright for his clear and
sensible
explanation, the conversation was resumed.
I had thought, as your institutions are founded
on reason and nature, Judge, I continued, that
you would be more disposed to cultivate this
member than to mutilate it; and this the more
especially, as I understand all monikins believe it
to be the very quintessence of reason.
No doubt, sir; we do cultivate our tails, but it
is on the vegetable principle, or as the skilful
gardener
lops the branch that it may throw out more
vigorous shoots. It is true, we do not expect to see
the tail itself sprouting out anew; but then we look
to the increase of its reason, and to its more
general
diffusion in society. The extremities of our
caud
, as fast as they are lopped, are sent to a great
intellectual mill, where the mind is extracted from
the matter, and the former is sold, on public
account
,
to the editors of the daily journals. This is
the reason our Leaplow journalists are so
distinguished
for their ingenuity and capacity, and the
reason, too, why they so faithfully represent the
average of the Leaplow knowledge.
And honesty, you ought to add, growled the
Brigadier.
I see the beauty of the system, Judge, and very
beautiful it is! This essence of lopped tails
represents
the average of Leaplow brains, being a
compound
of all the tails of the country; and as a daily
journal is addressed to the average intellect of the
community, there is a singular fitness between the
readers and the readees. To complete my stock
of information on this head, however, will you just
allow me to inquire what is the effect of this system
on the totality of Leaplow intelligence?
Wonderful! As we are a commonwealth, it is
necessary to have a unity of sentiment on all
leading
matters, and by thus compounding all the
extremes
of our reasons, we get what is called `
public
opinion;' which public opinion is uttered through
the public journals
And a most Patriotic Patriot is always chosen
to be the inspector of the mill, interrupted the
Brigadier
.
Better and better! you send all the finer parts
of your several intellects to be ground up and
kneaded together; the compound is sold to the
journalists, who utter it anew, as the results of the
united wisdom of the country!
Or, as public opinion.We make great
account
of reason in all our affairs, invariably calling
ourselves the most enlightened nation on earth;
but then we are especially averse to anything like
an insulated effort of the mind, which is offensive,
anti-republican, aristocratic and dangerous. We
put all our trust in this representation of brains,
which is singularly in accordance with the
fundamental
base of our society, as you must perceive.
We are a commercial people, too, put in
the Brigadier; and being much accustomed to
the laws of insurance, we like to deal in
averages
.
Very true, brother Downright; very true. We
are particularly averse to anything like inequality.
Ods zooks! it is almost as great an offence for a
monikin to know more than his neighbors, as it
is for him to act on his own impulses. Nono
we are truly a free and an independent
commonwealth
,
and we hold every citizen as amenable to
public opinion, in all he does, says, thinks or
wishes.
Pray, sir, do both of the two great political
lines send their tails to the same mills, and respect
the same general sentiments?
No, sir; we have two public opinions, in
Leaplow
.
Two
public opinions!
Certainly, sir; the horizontal and the
perpendicular
.
This infers a most extraordinary fertility of
thought, and one that I hold to be almost
impossible
!
Here the Commodore and the Brigadier
incontinently
both laughed as hard as they could; and
that, too, directly in my face.
Dear me, Sir Johnwhy, my dear Sir John!
you are really the drollest creature!gasped the
Judge, holding his sides,the very funniest
question
I have evevever encountered! He
now stopped to wipe his eyes; after which he
was better able to express himself. The same
public opinion, forsooth!Dear medear me,
that I should not have made myself understood!
I commenced, my good Sir John, by telling you
that we deal in duplicates, on a hint from Nature;
and that we act on the rotatory principle. In
obedience to the first, we have always
two
public
opinions; and, although the great political
land-marks are drawn in what may be called a
stationary sense, they, too, are in truth rotatory.
One, which is thought to lie parallel to the
fundamental
law, or the constitutional meridian of
the country, is termed the horizontal, and the other
the perpendicular line. Now, as nothing is really
stationary in Leaplow, these two great land-marks
are always acting, likewise, on the rotatory
principle
,
changing places periodically; the perpendicular
becoming the horizontal, and
vice vers;
they who
toe their respective marks, necessarily taking new
4 *
views of things, as they vary the line of sight.
These great revolutions are, however, very slow,
and are quite as imperceptible to those who
accompany
them, as are the revolutions of our planet to
its inhabitants.
And the gyrations of the patriots, of which the
Judge has just now spoken, added the Brigadier,
are much the same as the eccentric movements
of the comets that embellish the solar system,
without deranging it by their uncertain courses.
No, sir, we should be poorly off, indeed, if we
had but
one
public opinion, resumed the Judge.
Ecod, I do not know what would become of the
most Patriotic Patriots, in such a dilemma!
Pray, sir, let me ask, as you draw for places,
if you have as many places as there are citizens?
Certainly, sir. Our places are divided, firstly,
into the two great subdivisions of the inner and
the outer. Those who toe the mark on the most
popular line occupy the former, and those who toe
the mark on the least popular line take all the rest,
as a matter of course. The first, however, it is
necessary to explain, are the only places worth
having. As great care is had to keep the
community
pretty nearly equally divided
Excuse the interruptionbut in what manner
is this effected?
Why, as only a certain number can
toe the
mark
, we count all those who are not successful
in getting up to the line, as outcasts; and, after
fruitlessly hanging about our skirts for a time,
they invariably go over to the other line; since it
is better to be first in a village, than second in
Rome. We thus keep up something like an
equilibrium
in the state, which, as you must know, is
necessary to liberty. The minority take the outer
places, and all the inner are left to the majority.
Then comes another subdivision of the places;
that is to say, one division is formed of the
honorary
,
and another of the profitable places. The
honorary, or about nine-tenths of all the inner
places, are divided, with great impartiality, among
the mass of those who have toed the mark on the
strongest side, and who usually are satisfied with
the glory of the victory. The names of the
remainder
are put into the wheels to be drawn for
against the prizes, on the rotatory principle.
And the patriots, sir;are they included in this
chance-medley?
Far from it. As a reward for their dangers,
they have a little wheel to themselves, although
they, also, are compelled to submit to the rotatory
principle. Their cases differ from those of the
others, merely in the fact that they always get
something
.
I would gladly have pursued the conversation,
which was opening a flood of light upon my
political
understanding; but, just then, a fellow with
the air of a footman entered, carrying a packet
tied to the end of his
cauda
. Turning round, he
presented his burthen, with profound respect, and
withdrew. I found that the packet contained three
notes, with the following addresses:
To his Royal Highness Bob, Prince of Wales, &c. &c. &c.
To my Lord High Admiral Poke, &c. &c. &c.
To Master Goldencalf, Clerk, &c. &c. &c.
Apologizing to my guests, the seal of my own
note was eagerly opened. It read as follows:
The Right Honorable the Earl of Chatterino, Lord of the
Bed-Chamber in waiting on his Majesty, informs Master
John Goldencalf, Clerk, that he is commanded to attend the
drawing-room, this evening, when the nuptial ceremony will
take place between the Earl of Chatterino and the Lady
Chatterissa, the first Maid of Honor to her Majesty the
Queen.
N. B.
The gentlemen will appear in full dress
.
On explaining the contents of my note to the
Judge, he informed me that he was aware of the
approaching ceremony, as he had also an
invitation
to be present, in his official character. I
begged, as a particular favor, England having no
representative at Leaphigh, that he would do me
the honor to present me, in his capacity of a
foreign minister. The Envoy made no sort of
objection, and I inquired as to the costume
necessary
to be observed; as, so far as I had seen, it
was good breeding at Leaphigh to go naked. The
Envoy had the goodness to explain, that, although,
in point of mere attire, clothing was extremely
offensive to the people of both Leaphigh and
Leaplow
,
yet, in the former country, no one could
present
himself at court, foreign ministers excepted,
without a
cauda
. As soon as we understood each
other on these points, we separated, with an
understanding
that I was to be in readiness (together
with my companions, of whose interest I had not
been forgetful) to attend the Envoy and the
Brigadier
,
when they should call for me, at an hour
that was named.Sir
,
The undersigned, Envoy Extraordinary and Minister
Plenipotentiary
of the North-Western Leaplow Confederate Union,
has the honor to inform the Secretary of State, that our
interests
in this portion of the earth are, in general, on the best
possible footing; our national character is getting every day
to be more and more elevated; our rights are more and more
respected, and our flag is more and more whitening every
sea. After this flattering and honorable account of the state
of our general concerns, I hasten to communicate the
following
interesting particulars.
The treaty between our beloved North-Western Confederate
Union and Leaphigh, has been dishonored in every one of its
articles; nineteen Leaplow seamen have been forcibly
impressed
into a Leapthrough vessel of war; the King of
Leapup
has made an unequivocal demonstration with a very
improper
part of his person, at us; and the King of Leapover
has caused seven of our ships to be seized and sold, and the
money to be given to his mistress.
Sir, I congratulate you on this very flattering condition of
our foreign relations; which can only be imputed to the
glorious
constitution of which we are the common servants, and
to the just dread which the Leaplow name has so universally
inspired in other nations.
The King has just had a drawing-room, in which I took
great care to see that the honor of our beloved country should
be faithfully attended to. My
cauda
was at least three inches
longer than that of the representative of Leapup, the
Minister
most favored by Nature in this important particular; and
I have the pleasure of adding, that her Majesty the Queen
deigned to give me a very gracious smile. Of the sincerity
of that smile there can be no earthly doubt, sir; for, though
there is abundant evidence that she did apply certain
unseemly
words to our beloved country, lately, it would quite
exceed the rules of diplomatic courtesy, and be unsustained
by proof, were we to call in question her royal sincerity on
this public occasion. Indeed, sir, at all the recent
drawing-rooms
I have received smiles of the most sincere and
encouraging
character, not only from the King, but from all his
ministers, his first-cousin in particular; and I trust they will
have the most beneficial effects on the questions at issue
between
the Kingdom of Leaphigh and our beloved country.
If they would now only do us justice in the very important
affair of the long-standing and long-neglected redress, which
we have been seeking in vain at their hands, for the last
seventy-two years, I should say that our relations were on
the best possible footing.
Sir, I congratulate you on the profound respect with which
the Leaplow name is treated, in the most distant quarters of
the earth, and on the benign influence this fortunate
circumstance
is likely to exercise on all our important interests.
I see but little probability of effecting the object of my
special mission, but the utmost credit is to be attached to the
sincerity of the smiles of the King and Queen, and of all
the royal family.
In a late conversation with his Majesty, he inquired in the
kindest manner after the health of the Great Sachem, [this
is the title of the head of the Leaplow government,] and
observed that our growth and prosperity put all other nations to
shame; and that we might, on all occasions, depend on his
most profound respect and perpetual friendship. In short, sir,
all nations, far and near, desire our alliance, are anxious to
open new sources of commerce, and entertain for us the
profoundest
respect, and the most inviolable esteem.You can
tell the Great Sachem that this feeling is surprisingly
aug-mented
under his administration, and that it has at least
quad-rupled
during my mission. If Leaphigh would only respect
its treaties, Leapthrough would cease taking our seamen,
Leapup have greater deference for the usages of good society,
and the King of Leapover would seize no more of our ships
to supply his mistress with pocket-money, our foreign
relations
might be considered to be without spot. As it is, sir, they
are far better off than I could have expected, or indeed, had
ever hoped to see them; and of one thing you may be
diplo-matically
certain, that we are universally respected, and that
Vol. II. 7
the Leaplow name is never mentioned without all in
company
rising and waving their
caud
.
(Signed.)
Judas People's Friend
.
Hon.  , &c
P. S. [Private.]
Dear Sir
,If you publish this dispatch, omit the part
where the difficulties are
repeated
. I beg you will see that
my name is put in with those of the other patriots, against
the periodical rotation of the little wheel; as I shall certainly
be obliged to return home soon, having consumed all my
means. Indeed, the expense of maintaining a tail, of which
our people have no notion, is so very great, that I think none
of our missions should exceed a week in duration.
I would especially advise that the message should dilate
on the subject of the high standing of the Leaplow character,
in foreign nations; for, to be frank with you, facts require
that this statement should be made as often as possible.AFFIDAVIT.
Personally appeared before me, John Equity, Justice of the
Peace, Peter Veracious, &c. &c., who, being duly sworn
upon the Holy Evangelists, doth depose and say, viz. That he
was intimately acquainted with one John Goldencalf in his
native country, and that he is personally knowing to the fact
that he, the said John Goldencalf, has three wives, seven
illegitimate children, is moreover a bankrupt without
character
,
and that he was obliged to emigrate in consequence of
having stolen a sheep.
Sworn, &c.
(Signed,) PETER VERACIOUS.